d
e

z

i

r

o
h

t

u

A

e

r

u

s

o

l

c
s

i

D

c

i
l

b
u

P

d
e

z

i

r

o
h

t

u

A

e

r

u

s

o

l

c
s

i

D

c

i
l

b
u

P

d
e

z

i

r

o
h

t

u

A

e

r

u

s

o

l

c
s

i

D

c

i
l

b
u

P

d
e

z

i

r

o
h

t

u

A

e

r

u

s

o

l

c
s

i

D

c

i
l

b
u

P

Document of
The World Bank

Report No. 20354

MEMORANDUM OF THE PRESIDENT

OF THE

INTERNATIONAL BANK FOR RECONSTRUCTION AND DEVELOPMENT

TO THE

EXECUTIVE DIRECTORS

ON A

COUNTRY ASSISTANCE STRATEGY

OF THE

WORLD BANK GROUP

FOR THE

ARGENTINE REPUBLIC

September 8, 2000

Country Management Unit Argentina, Chile and Uruguay
PREM Network
Latin America and Caribbean Regional Office

The International Finance Corporation
Latin America and Caribbean Departmnent

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The FYO1-04 Country Assistance Strategy (CAS), Report N. 20354, dated May 5,
2000, was discussed by the Executive Directors on June 27, 2000. Based on this
discussion, and in agreement with the Government of Argentina, the CAS document
has been revised and made available for public information.

CURRENCY AND EQUIVALENTS
Currency Unit: Argentina Peso (Arg.$)
ARG$I = US$1

WEIGHTS AND MEASURES
Metric System

FISCAL YEAR

January 1 - December 31

CAS 
1DB 
IMF 
IFC 
MERCOSUR 
MIGA 
NBI 
NGO 
PSE 
REPO 
TRABAJAR 
SME 
SSAL 

ABBREVIATIONS AND ACRONYMS

Country Assistance Strategy
Inter-American Development Bahk
International Monetary Fund
International Finance Corporation
Southern Cone Common Market
Multilateral Investment Guarantee Agency
Indice de Necesidades Basicas (Index of Basic Needs)
Non-governmental Organization
Plan Social Educativo (Social Education Program)
Special Repurchase Facility
Public Works Employment Scheme
Small and Medium Size Enterprises
Special Structural Adjustment Loan

WB Managers and Staff Responsible for this CAS
Vice President 
Mr. David de Ferranti
Country Director 
Ms. Myrna Alexander
Sector Director 
Mr. Guillermo Perry
Task Manager 
Mr. Mark Hagerstrom

IFC Managers and Staff Responsible for this CAS
Executive Vice President 
Mr. Peter Woicke
Vice President, Investment Operations 
Mr. Assaad Jabre
LAC Director 
Mr. Karl Voltaire
Manager 
Mr. Bernard Sheahan
Task Manager 
Mr. Toshiya Masuoka

THE ARGENTINE REPUBLIC

COUNTRY ASSISTANCE STRATEGY

TABLE OF CONTENTS

Executive Summary 
Message from the Minister of Economy 

i-vi
vii- viii

A. 

ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL PERFORMANCE 

Economic Reform and Growth 
External Shocks 
Recent Economic Developments 
Medium-Term Prospects 
Social Performance 
The Poor 

B. MAIN DEVELOPMENT CHALLENGES 

Poverty and Human Resource Development 
Infrastructure 
Environmental Concems 
Gender 
Consolidating Macroeconomic Reforms 
PrLvate Sector Development 
Institutional Capacity and Governance 
Provincial Reform 

C. 

GOVERNMENT DEVELOPMENT STRATEGY 

The First Steps 
Medium-term Agenda 

D. 

BANK GROUP COUNTRY ASSISTANCE STRATEGY 

Progress and Portfolio Performance 
Client Survey and Feedback 
Sector Perspectives on Performance 
Renewing the Country Strategy 
Exposure, Net Flows 
Selectivity in Setting Priorities 
Comparative Roles of Other Multilateral Institutions 

1

1
3
3
5
6
8

9

9
14
16
17
18
20
21
22

24

24
24

27

27
28
29
34
35
35
42

An Evolving Relationship 
Risks 

42
45

ANNEXES

Annex A 
Annex A2 
Annex B2 
Annex B3 
Annex B3 
Annex B4 
Annex B5 
Annex B6 
Annex B7 
Annex B8 
Annex B8 
Annex B9 

Private Sector Strategy
Country At a Glance
Selected Indicators of Bank Portfolio Performance and Management
Bank Group Program Summary
Bank Group Fact Sheet - IFC and MIGA Program
Summary of Nonlending Services
Poverty and Social Development Indicators
Key Economic Indicators
Key Exposure Indicators
Operations Portfolio
Statement of IFC's Held and Disbursed Portfolio
CAS Program Matrix

MAP 

IBRD 29348

Executive Summary

The last Country Assistance Strategy (CAS)for Argentina was considered in May 1997
for FY98-00, when the country had regained its economicfootingfollowing the regional
financial crisis of 1995. A Progress Report was provided in March 1998 in the midst of
the emerging crisis in Asia. The proposed program for the Bank Group would span
FY01-04, the period of the new administration that took office in late 1999. Regular
progress reports would be provided to the Board in the intervening period

The Long Road to Reform

Since the launch of the Convertibility Plan in 1991, the Argentine economy has been
undergoing a massive transformation. The main feature of this program, supported by the
World Bank Group, IDB and IMF, was the establishment of a currency board
arrangement. This was part of a sweeping set of reforms that altered the monetary
system, improvedfiscal and tax policies, liberalized trade, and reformed the public sector,
including a rapid privatization program and changes to the social security system.

All of this was intended to reverse the historical pattern ofpoor economic management
and volatility the country had sufferedfor the previous 25 years. Public institutions had
deteriorated and, importantly, poor performance severely eroded confidence in the
financial sector, resulting in large savings held abroad Externalfinancing both for the
private andpublic sector dominated thel970s, leading to the 1982 debt crisis. Attempts
at stabilizing the economy, with Bank and Fund support, were made in the 1980s but
none succeeded Each time, inflation returned and surged to higher levels, culminating
in hyperinflation in 1989. Nonetheless, efforts to open and deregulate Argentina's
economy and a debate on the role of the state were started

Another attempt at reform began in 1989 and the results have been dramatic. Argentina
has experienced strong average economic growth in the 1990s. The size of the economy
expandedfrom $141 billion in 1990 to $282 billion in 1999, despite being hit by external
shocks and two severe recessions. Argentina has now one of the world's lowest inflation
rates and productivity has rapidly increased, responding to the new economic signals.
The banking system has been strengthened through improvements in regulation and
supervision, privatization, restructuring and consolidation. The role of the state has been
changed, mainly as a result ofprivatization and decentralization to the provinces of
health and education. Tax reforms removed many distortions and reduced tax handles
and a newfederal public sector financial management system was implemented Poverty
quickly fellfrom the peak of 41 percent reached in 1989-90.

Remaining Challenges

Despite this undeniable progress, major issues remain, including the vulnerability of the
economy to external shocks, compounded by lagging competitiveness, persistent poverty
(29%), including over 40 percent of children, rising income inequality and high
unemployment (14%), especiallyfor the unskilled These statistics point to the fact that
the benefits of growth in the 1990s have not been shared Infrastructure is deficient,

-1i-

labor regulations rigid, and investments in education, research and development, low.
And there is still a long way to go to increase savings and deepen the domestic capital
market. Moreover, Argentina does not have an adequate safety net, nor has it yet
completed the modernization ofpublic institutions. This is particularly true at the
provincial level which experiences wide variation in performance and capacity.

Today, Argentina remains heavily indebted, despite the fact that total external debt is
now a more manageable 51 percent of GDP, as compared to almost 100 percent in 1989.
The public sector continues to rely on international capital markets to refinance its debt
stock. Part of this debt stems from the take over ofprivate sector debts in the early 1980s
and domestic debts, converted to US dollar obligations, during the 1980s and early
1990s. More recently public debt has risen to cope with the large fiscal deficits
associated with the Tequila and Russia/Brazil crises.

Social progress and economic progress go hand in hand and Argentina is clearly one of
the more developed countries in Latin America. However, certain social indicators have
been deteriorating-such as income equity and poverty-- and compare unfavorably with
neighboring Chile and Uruguay. Average statistics for Argentina also mask significant
variations with the provinces in the North east and North west being the most
disadvantaged Moreover, for its income level, Argentina has serious lags in social
infrastructure and it is notably weaker as regards policies for social inclusion/equity.
Public sector management also needs strengthening when it comes to transparency,
accountability and corruption.

Social spending in general at 18 percent of GDP compares favorably with Argentina's
neighbors. Much of thefiscal space created in the 1990s byprivatization has been used
to expand social programs. However, the bulk of this spending is for the contributory
pension system and is not targeted Additionally, public programs for housing and
higher education--which is free for all-- could clearly be more equitable. Among
programs specifically for the poor, there are no major problems in targeting per se and
they are strongly pro-poor but their coverage is limited to only about 25 percent ofpoor
families. Furthermore, even this spending tends to be pro-cyclical and suffers from
budget cuts during fiscal tightening. Health indicators in Greater Buenos Aires are
comparable to many developed countries but third world problems remain in the poorer,
northern provinces. Looking at education, attainment at the primary level is satisfactory,
but secondary and higher education fare poorly relative to comparator countries and
progress in improving the system has been slow. In higher education, inefficiency in
public universities is compounded by regressive public spending.

A particular area for increased attention is the labor market and employment. At the end
of the 1980s, Argentina had low productivity and accumulated excess employment in both
the public and private sectors. Reforms redressed this situation but in the meantime
Argentina's economic transformation had shifted demand to more qualified workers and
use of technology. This has left unskilled workers unemployed or with depressed wages
and many below the poverty line. Moreover, reforms to make the labor market more
flexible have lagged A negative consequence has been the increase in the informal
sector, as both firms and employers seek to escape high costs and restrictive regulations.

-

ii 

-

The down side is that these workers are excludedfrom many safety net programs, and
firms, mainly SMEs, cannot qualify for credit nor do they pay taxes.

At the same time, Argentina has experienced widening gaps in wages paid to those with
modern skills and a stagnation in wages to those with low skills. Wage disparity, in turn,
has led to increased income inequality and disillusionment especially among older
workers with obsolete skills and women and youths who lack both experience and skills.
These problems compound the sense of vulnerability felt by the poor whose biggest
concern, as expressed in the Voices for the Poor, is securing stable work.

Argentina is a diverse country with significant regional disparities. The reforms enacted
during the 1990s are changing these regional economies, with a substantial shift in favor
of natural resources. The growth of these regional economies make new demands on
provincial and municipal governments to provide services andfoster investment in
addition to their responsibilities in health and education. At present, that capacity
rangesfrom very good to very poor and infrastructure investment has lagged Access to
water and sewage systems in urban areas remains deficient, and is even worse in rural
areas. Poor households suffer from overcrowding, lack running water, and often live in
areas of high risk offlooding. Next to securing better employment, improving
infrastructure was the greatest concern heard in the Voices of the Poor.

Continuing the Transformation

Bank support, along with that of the IDB and IMF, has been critical in Argentina 's
transformation. But this process is not yet complete and it will take more time and effort
to address a complex set of economic, institutional and social issues. Some of these are
part of the unfinished agenda from the 1990s, and others are part of the process of
adapting to the global economy. From the point of view of the poor, job creation is the
highest priority. This will require:

-

* 

* 

* 

reductions in the cost of capital and improving access of the private sector
(particularly middle-market and SMEs) to long term financing through capital
market development. These developments will also stimulate sectors such as
construction that offer employment opportunities for the unskilled;

the reduction of non-wage labor costs (payroll taxes and other mandatory
contributions) in the formal labor market with a commensurate expansion of workers
covered by health insurance and pensions;

improvement in skills and education, particularly in secondary education, the
inadequacy of which became apparent in the course of economic restructuring under
the Convertibility Plan;

reduction of transaction costs, due to the incomplete transformation of institutions
such as the tax system, judiciary, and customs, both at the federal and sub-national
levels, and high logistic and inventory costs, which are nearly three times higher than
OECD countries and over 30 percent of GDP.

- 111 -

Beyond sound economic management, investment in education, and pro-employment
growth policies, there are a number ofpolicies that would help the poor and address
their concerns of vulnerability and access to public services. These include:

* expanding the coverage of social safety nets, which are generally well targeted and
effective, and making these programs counter cyclical. At the same time, some
programs, such qs in nutrition, housing andjob training, should be restructured

* focusing public health care expenditures on those without health insurance, by
improving cost recovery and the efficiency of the public system.

* because of the large number ofpoor children, promoting responsible parenthood and
family capacity development, including access to reproductive health services.

* 

in urban areas, providing basic infrastructure services, such as water, sanitation and
roads, and providing regular land titles in areas of illegal or informal settlement.

* for the rural poor, including indigenous populations, who have been largely
forgotten, addressing sustainable development, income generation, access to safe
water and other services, and community development.

Finally, environmental degradation poses a threat to the health and livelihood of both
the poor and non-poor. Stronger policies and programs are required to reduce the
threats to water supplies posed by industrial and hazardous wastes in urban areas, to
improve water management in rural areas, and to stop excessive soil erosion and
overexploitation of marine and other sensitive resources.

In many of these areas, the Bank is already engaged, with relatively good progress being
made, as reflected in OED 's recent Country Evaluation Update. In other areas, we
would be opening up new activities, supporting the next phase ofArgentina 's
development agenda.

The Government's Program

The new administration ofPresident de la Rua is firmly committed to improving social
and economic performance within the framework of the Convertibility Plan and
MERCOSUR. Enhancing Argentina 's competitiveness and promoting new avenues of
growth, including investment in human capital, is a key goal. A prerequisite for this is to
reduce Argentina 's vulnerability to external shocks that not only disrupt growth but inflict
considerable social costs on those least able to protect themselves. A major element will
be to reduce country risk as high risk perceptions by the markets burden, via the
increased cost of capital, all sectors of the economy. This implies reducing the
accumulation ofpublic debt at the federal and provincial levels and expanding exports.

Faced with a prolonged recession, high unemployment and high levels ofpoverty, plus a
fiscal deficit of more than 2 percent in 1999, the new administration placed its initial

-

iv 

-

priority on the fiscal side, including bringing the fiscal situation under control and
negotiating a new program with the IMF. It reached an early agreement with the
provinces on stabilizing provincial transfers and has embarked on a debt-reliefprogram
with the most heavily indebtedprovinces. All of these measures served to restore
confidence in the markets and resulted in a sharp reduction in country risk. The
Government was also quick to reaffirm the importance of MERCOSUR and to propose a
major piece of legislation on labor reform.

These early measures form part of a medium term strategy focused on deepening reform
of the state and making Argentina more competitive. At the federal level, there is still a
major adjustment to make to comply with the law offiscal responsibility, to increase
transparency and to attack private sector tax evasion. Increased investment in
infrastructure is seen as a key for enhancing competitiveness and improving coverage of
the poor. Education spending would be increasinglyfocused on the poor and health
spending wouldfocus on insurance for the uninsured, primary health care and
prevention programs. Finally, social assistance would be revamped to increase
targeting, coverage of critical groups, and efficiency.

The Bank Group's Role

Given the continuing development challenges faced by Argentina and the success of the
Bank in supporting the Government in meeting them so far, the World Bank Group 's CAS
for FYO]-04 would continue to focus on the poor and promoting equitable, sustained
growth. The Bank would continue to emphasize three themes: i) enhancing social
development, including poverty alleviation and human resource development; ii)
improving the performance of the state, particularly at the sub-national level; and iii)
consolidating structural reforms. This strategy has been by and large successful, with
high rates of achievement ofproject objectives, and low levels ofportfolio problems.

IFC 'sfocus would be closely aligned with that of the Bank and include: improving access
to investment financing by companies that will create growth and employment, activities
which demonstrate tangible benefits of growth and reform, and supporting frontier
activities which could be replicated in other World Bank Group countries. MIGA would
support the strategy through its guarantee program and investment marketing services.

In view ofArgentina 's high level ofper capita income, the future program would aim to
improve a series of economic and social indicators designed to guide the evolution of the
Bank's role during the comingyears. The proposed base case lending of $3 billion for
FYO0-04, as compared to average annual lending of $1.5 billion during FY97-00, takes
into account Argentina 's changing needs and absorptive capacity. A gradual reduction
in the program would also help to attenuate negative netflows when Argentina is still
vulnerable to sharp economic downturns andproblems in accessingfinancial markets.
Under the base case, lending wouldfocus on provincial reform, governance, education,
continuing reforms in health and improving service for the poor. Infrastructure
operations would support increasing competitiveness by reducing logistic costs with

-v -

private sectorfinancing, and enhancing access by the poor. Other targetedprograms
would include supportfor the urban and long neglected ruralpoor.

A high case for lending would be considered under special conditions as in the past when
Argentina has been hit by an external shock, assuming satisfactory policies were in
place. Such lending would be in the context of coordinated efforts among the Bank, IMF,
and IDB and consistent with the Bank's policies on lending to a single large borrower,
our lending capacity at the time, and burden-sharing. Additional support for reforms
would also be considered as a supplement of $ 500 million to the base case, if there were
to be advances in areas such as deepening of health sector reforms, consolidation and
simplification of social programs, further reforms in the pension system, or in a new
agreement on transfers to provinces. The move to the high case scenario would take into
account progress made in addressing the issues of the unfinished reform agenda,
including progress towards a revenue-sharing arrangement, as well as the scope and
budgetary impact of the reforms that could be supported by the Bank. In turn, a low case
scenario would become operative if there were policy slippage and portfolio performance
were to worsen. The low case program wouldfocus on poverty targeted operations.

The following questions are suggested as possible issues for Board discussion:

• 

-

Is the proposed pace and timing of the reduction in Bank assistance to Argentina
appropriate to the country's current social and economic status?
Is the proposed assistance program appropriately targeted to Argentina 's
development challenges?
* Is the proposed monitoringframework appropriate?

- vi -

Washington D.C., June 22, 2000

Mr. James D. Wolfensohn
President
The World Bank Group
Washington, 1O.C.

Dear Mr. Wolfensohn:

I am pleased to refer to your memorandum dated May 5 conceming the document
"Argentina-Country Assistance Strategy", which will be submitted to consideration of the
Bank's Board of Directors next Tuesday, June 27.

In the first place, I would like to thank you and the Bank team that elaborated this
document. This CAS is the result of an extensive consultation process, which included
not only Government officials, but also a large canvas of our civil society.

Your letter provides us with an excellent opportunity to comment on the way we
see the future of the Argentina-Bank relationship. I wish to emphasize our agreement
with the general thrust of the strategy. In particular, we agree with the emphasis on social
development, on the improvement of public sector performance -especially at sub-
national level- and on the consolidation of structural reforms.

The Govemment of Argentina also wishes to highlight the importance of the
Bank's support to consolidate its efforts to strengthen public finances and improve
economic competitiveness. President De la Ruia is committed to these objectives since
the beginning of his mandate on December 10, 1999. His administration considers that
these issues are an essential condition for growth and, consequently, a necessary
condition to achieve social equity as well.

The main reason for this special emphasis stems from the fact that, despite
important reforms carried out in the last decade in different sectors of the economy, the
public sector has not as yet reached a sustainable equilibrium. Moreover, the extemal
situation of Argentina that -as rightly pointed out in the Bank's report - is a reason of
permanent concern, takes its roots from previous increases in public expenditure and the
accumulation of fiscal imbalances that occurred during great part of the 1990's. These
developments were concealed by favorable conditions that generated a swift increase in
the economic activity, and by the widespread privatization program that provided fiscal
resources. Today, under a different international panorama and in the absence of
extraordinary revenues for the public sector, the constraints faced by the present
administration emerge in all clarity.

- vii -

In this context, our Government considers that the relationship of our country
with the Bank should not experience significant changes in our next operational program.
Poverty is still widespread in Argentina and the average per capita income conceals
striking regional differences in the distribution of products and wealth. In this sense, we
wish to share with you the need to face the operational program of the next triennium
with an open mind. We hope to count with the Bank's support to consolidate the
achievements already attained and to complement the agenda of the present
administration.

I would like to stress the fact that the relative participation of our country in
financing operations through multilateral credit organizations, particularly the World
Bank, is decreasing gradually, while our access to financial markets is increasing.

In response to the consultation regarding disclosure of this report, I am herewith
conveying our authorization, and I would greatly appreciate your including the text of
this letter in it.

I have asked our Executive Director to read this letter at the time the CAS
document is submitted to the consideration of the Bank's Board of Directors.

Very truly yours,

Jose Luis Machinea
Minister of Economy and Finance

viii -

MEMORANDUM OF THE PRESIDENT
OF THE INTERNATIONAL BANK FOR RECONSTRUCTION AND
DEVELOPMENT
TO THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTORS ON A
COUNTRY ASSISTANCE STRATEGY
OF THE WORLD BANK GROUP
FOR THE
ARGENTINE REPUBLIC

A. ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL PERFORMANCE

Economic Reform and Growth

1. Since the launch of the Convertibility Plan in 1991, the Argentine economy has been
transformed through the establishment of a currency board arrangement that has provided
price stability. This was part of a sweeping set of reforms during the 1990s that altered
the monetary system, improved fiscal and tax policies, liberalized trade, and reformed the
public sector including privatization and changes to the social security system.

2. All of this was intended to reverse the long-term trend of slow growth, state
domination, poor labor productivity, low domestic savings, weak investment, high
volatility, and chronic inflation that the country had suffered for the previous 25 years.
Public institutions in health and education had deteriorated as did the judiciary and tax
administration. Importantly, the extended period of poor performance severely eroded
confidence, resulting in large savings held abroad. External financing both for the private
and public sector dominated thel 970s and contributed to the 1982 debt crisis, exacerbated
by the war with the United Kingdom.

3. Attempts at stabilizing the economy, with Bank and Fund support, were made in the
1980s but none was able to rein in the public sector in the face of resistance from the
opposition, unions and other interested groups. Each time, inflation returned and surged
to higher levels. During the 1980s, the public sector deficit averaged over 8 percent of
GDP and investment fell from a high of 22 percent of GDP to a low of 10 percent in 1989.
Hyperinflation broke out in 1989. Tax collections amounted to no more than 16 percent
of GDP, and MI as a share of the economy fell to only 5 percent, as the local currency lost
value and funds were withdrawn from the banking system. With real wages not able to
keep up with inflation, poverty rose to over 40 percent of the population in 1989.
Nonetheless, these earlier efforts at reform started the process of opening and deregulating
Argentina's economy and began the debate on the role of the state.

4. Another attempt at reforn began in 1989 and the results have been dramatic.
Argentina has experienced strong average economic growth in the 1990s, as compared to
zero growth in the 1980s. The size of the economy expanded from $141 billion in 1990 to

1

$282 billion in 1999, despite being hit by external shocks that caused two serious
recessions. Instead of experiencing hyperinflation, Argentina has now one of the world's
lowest rates of inflation: consumer price inflation was less than one percent in 1998, and
wholesale prices actually fell by about 6 percent. Investment has recovered, and
productivity rapidly increased, responding to the new economic signals. With the
Convertibility Plan, the economy quickly remonitized and, spurred by the Tequila crisis in
1995, the banking system has been strengthened through a mixture of improvements in
regulation and supervision, privatization, restructuring and consolidation. The role of the
state has furthermore been evolving to take into account this new economic regime. The
Federal Government's deficit dropped to 1.4 percent of GDP in 1998, even after taking
into account the transitional costs for pension reform which amounts to about I percent of
GDP. As a result of privatization, public employment fell by at about 300,000 while
decentralization of secondary education and public hospitals transferred 284,000
employees to the provinces. Tax reforms removed distortions and reduced tax handles
and a new public sector financial management system was implemented.

5. After years of inflation, however, the domestic capital market remains thin and the
rate of monetization, low. Argentines are reported to have as much as $90 billion in
savings abroad while domestic credit - at about $77 billion or 27 percent of GDP-is
small in comparison. As a result, the Government and major industries continue to
depend on the international capital markets for term financing and smaller firms have an
even harder time accessing credit. Total foreign debt that started to accumulate during the
1 970s now accounts for about 51 percent of GDP, down from the worst level of about 100
percent in 1989, but still almost twice domestic credit. The lack of domestic credit
constitutes a serious bottleneck for small and medium firm and retards development of
mortgage, municipal and other specialized debt markets. The cost of capital associated
with high risk perceptions of Argentina, moreover, constitutes a drag on the economy and
its ability to compete. Importantly, Argentina has still not achieved fiscal balance-with
notable deterioration in 1999 by both the federal and provincial governments-leading to
high demands for deficit financing which can crowd out the private sector.

6. This situation leaves Argentina vulnerable to external shocks and changes in market
perceptions of country risk: Standard and Poor rates Argentina at BB, as compared to A-
for Chile and BBB- for Uruguay. Although earlier efforts lowered total debt and debt

service, with the Brady plan in 1993, and increased the maturities of public external debt

to about 9.7 years on average, Argentina's external debt and dependence on external
capital flows to finance investment leave the economy exposed. This vulnerability to
external shocks not only disrupts growth but can inflict considerable social costs on those
least able to protect themselves, as is evident the two recessions that Argentina has
suffered in the 1990s. In both cases, after the Tequila crisis in 1995 and the Russia/Brazil
crises of 1998-99, unemployment rose sharply and poverty increased with both indicators
slow to recover even when the economy reactivates.

7. Moreover, while many social indicators have improved in the past ten years (for
example, infant mortality has dropped from 25 deaths per 1000 births in 1991 to about 19
deaths per 1000 births in 1998), poverty levels have stubbornly stayed high. The Bank's

2

latest estimates put poverty at about 29 percent of the urban population. It is likely much
higher in the rural areas. This situation is compounded by rising income inequality and
high unemployment, especially for the unskilled, indicating that the benefits of growth
have not been widely shared. Thus, Argentina still has a large social agenda to fulfil.

External Shocks

8. During the 1990s, Argentina has suffered the consequences of two serious external
shocks. The first came in late 1994-1995 after the devaluation of the Mexican peso. The
economy shrank by 2.8 percent in 1995 but following this crisis, strong, investment-led
growth returned. Real GDP growth was 5.5 percent in 1996 and an impressive 8.1 percent
in 1997. Support from the Bank Group, IDB and IMF were critical in helping Argentina
to recover and to implement continuing reforms as well as launch important targeted
social programs. The second test occurred in 1998-99, as a result of the combined effects
of the downturn in East Asia, the devaluation of the Russian ruble and the Brazilian real,
and deterioration of commodity prices After growth of 6.6 percent in the first half of
1998, growth fell to -0.6 percent in the fourth quarter of 1998. For that year as a whole,
GDP growth was 3.9 percent. Even though the economy went into recession in late 1998,
Argentina's commitment to prudent macroeconomic management and the discipline
inherent in its currency board arrangement generated confidence and Argentina was
among the first emerging economies to regain access to international capital markets. The
Bank's special support late in 1998 played a significant role in this recovery (see Box 1).

Recent Economic Developments

9. The econfomic downturn in 1999 turned out to be deeper and longer than expected,
especially in light of the progress made in Brazil to stabilize its economy. Overall,
Argentina's GDP is estimated to have declined by 3.1 percent in 1999. Unemployment,
after falling to about 12 percent from the high of 18 percent reached in 1996, increased to
almost 15 percent. The volume of exports remained fairly stable (although prices had
fallen) as Argentina was able to find substitute markets for its exports. Because of the
sharp contraction in domestic activity, the current account balance improved slightly to
4.3 percent of GDP, due to even larger declines for imports (particularly capital goods).
Inflation remains extremely low, with deflation during 1999 and during the first months of
2000.

3

Box 1: SSAL/REPO and Policy Based Guarantee

On the heels of the Asia and Russia crises, the Bank extended in November of 1998 the Special Structural Adjustment
Loan (SSAL) and the Repurchase Facility Support (REPO) with the aim of helping Argentina reduce its vulnerability
to extemal financing shocks, while simultaneously increasing its capacity for sustainable and equitable growth.
Specifically, the SSAL/REPO was intended to: (i) facilitate the reentry of Argentina to the intemational capital
markets and avoid the great social and economic costs associated with the altemative of drasticallv contracting
expenditures and depleting reserves as a result of capital flight; (ii) protect vulnerable groups during a period of high
uncertainty; (iii) add, through the REPO, to the lines of defense of the banking system in order to deter and, if need be,
withstand liquidity shocks; and (iv) continue Argentina's successful reform program, particularly with a focus on the
long-term issues of savings and capital market development, efficiency in the financial sector, and public policies with
respect to regulation, tax and fiscal equity, social spending and human capital.

The Brazilian real devaluation in early 1999 and pre-electoral uncertainties in mid-1999 combined to aggravate
Argentina's access to financial markets. While Argentina continued to be successful in tapping the markets,
increasingly it was forced to accept smaller and more costly bond issues. Given the importance of external financing,
the growing concems about the Year 2000 problem for the markets, and the need to provide for a smooth transition to
the new administration at the end of 1999, a Policy-Based Guarantee (a first operation of this kind in the Bank) was
approved in September 1999. This enhancement facilitated Argentina's access to new markets, particularly
institutional investors that require investment grade. The transaction was successfully concluded in October 1999 and
Argentina raised $1.5 billion in zero-coupon bonds, netting approximately $1.2 billion. The policy framework for the
guarantee was the ongoing SSAL which is being implemented satisfactorily; its second tranche was released in
September of 1999. Funding of the guarantee of $250 million was reallocated from the second tranche of the SSAL
and thus did not increase the Bank's exposure to Argentina.

The closing date of the SSAL has been extended to allow the new administration to reconfirm its commitment to the
program and to meet conditions of the final third tranche of $ 500 million. Discussions regarding compliance are
underway and the Govemment expects to request release of the tranche during the first quarter of FY0 1. In addition,
discussions are underway on the future of the REPO given its contingent nature and the fact that it loses effectiveness
once the grace period of the loan is over.

10. Fiscal performance deteriorated during 1999 and the fiscal program went off track in
the latter part, ending the year with a deficit of about $7.35 billion, considerably higher
than the target of $5 billion agreed with the IMF. The higher deficit was the result of
higher interest costs, the duration of the recession, and a general weakening of fiscal
discipline during the election year. Provincial governments encountered similar
conditions and they ended the year with a deficit of about $4.5 billion, almost twice the
deficit in 1997. In total the consolidated public sector fiscal deficit amounted to about 4.2
percent of GDP, excluding privatization receipts. As a result, the new administration took
swift action in December 1999 to restore order in the fiscal accounts.

11. Since the restructuring in the post-1 995 crisis, confidence in the banking system
remained strong. The system maintained deposits in both pesos and dollars, exhibiting
growth since the beginning of 1999. (In contrast, during the Tequila crisis, 18 percent of
deposits were lost and a significant number of banks were forced to close or restructure.)
As of end 1999, international reserves increased by 4.9 percent compared to the end of
1998, ending the year at $ 26.3 billion. However, credit growth to the private sector has
been flat, badly curtailing local investment. Tightening interest policy in the United
States, uncertainty in this election year, and the Y2K scare caused another rise in spreads
on Argentine foreign debt and in domestic interest rates.

4

12. Since the end of 1999, there are signs that the economy is slowly regaining its
footing, with industrial production growing (year to year) 2.4 percent in January and 3.3
percent in February 2000. Exports also grew by 16 percent in January 2000, compared to
January 1999, with strong demand from Brazil. There are excellent prospects for a good
harvest. Financial market indicators-the stock market, spreads on public debt, and local
inter-bank rates-have improved and are near the levels of mid 1997. There is renewed
interest in domestic credit, particularly mortgages. Nevertheless, consumer demand
remains low and tax collections have not been restored to their 1999 levels.
Unemployment is slowly edging down but job creation remains weak. Growth for 2000 is
expected to be 2 percent (see Table 1).

Medium-Term Prospects

13. Argentina's average growth rate during the 1 990s was about 4.6 percent spurred by
the stabilization of the economy and productivity gains. The economy is still going
through a transformation, as the private sector specializes in areas of Argentina's
comparative advantage. On the extemal front, trends are favorable: the real bilateral
exchange rate between Argentina and Brazil is expected to readjust somewhat in
Argentina's favor, commodity prices are expected to improve slightly, and access to
foreign capital markets has so far been favorable. Trade with Brazil has rebounded in the
past several months but there are lingering uncertainties over MERCOSUR in the
aftermath of the real devaluation and the resulting impact on Argentina's competitive
position. Continuing access to intemational capital will be critical, due to Argentina's
large stock of external debt. Traditionally, there has been a high correlation between
spreads on foreign borrowing and domestic rates.

14. With relatively benign external conditions and adequate progress on reforms,
Argentina can return to average growth rates close to 4.5 percent, with low inflation, a
gradual reduction in the fiscal deficit and gradual improvement in the external current
account balance (Table 1). Total debt is still expected to rise, before falling as a share of
GDP in the coming years. These trends would allow country risk perceptions to fall, and
Argentina's access to intemational capital markets improve. There would be an attendant
reduction in the cost of capital making access by domestic, especially smaller firms, more
affordable. The expected reduction in the fiscal deficit would concomitantly ease
crowding out of the private sector in domestic market, stimulating investment.

5

Table 1: Key Macroeconomic Indicators
(Percent of GDP) a/

1998 

(actual) 

1999 

(est.) 

2 t000) 

(proj.) 

Ave.

2001-03

National Accounts
GDP Avg. Annual Growth 
Total Investment 
National Savings 
Foreign Savings 

Public Sector-p'
Primary Surplus 
Interest Payments 
Domestic 
Foreign " 
Balance (- deficit) 

Balance of Payments
Trade Balance 
Current Account Balance 
Capital Account 
Public Sector 
Private Sector 

3.9 
19.9 
15.1 
4.8 

0.8 
2.2 
0.1 
2.2 
-1.4 

-2.5 
-4.8 
5.7 
3.1 
2.6 

-3.1 
19.1 
14.7 
4.3 

0.3 
2.9 
0.1 
2.8 
-2.6 

-1.7 
-4.3 
5.1 
3.9 
1.2 

2.1 
19.3 
15.5 
3.9 

1.6 
3.5 
0.1 
3.4 
-1.9 

-1.3 
-3.9 
5.7 
1.6 
4.1 

4.3
19.9
15.2
4.7

2.5
3.1
0.1
3.0
-0.6

-1.7
-4.7
5.2
0.6
4.6

Memo: GDP (US$ billion) 

298.1 

282.8 

286.1 

317.80

a! Unless otherwise stated, all figures for public finances and balance of payments are net
b/ National Administration
c/ Includes quasi-fiscal balance of Central Bank.

Social Performance

15. Macroeconomic performance and structural reforms have had a major impact on
social development in Argentina. Overall welfare has improved: per capita GDP, which
fell over 20 percent during the 1980s, rose considerably and by 1998 had increased by 30
percent over 1988. Importantly, stability and economic growth brought about a recovery
from the worst conditions faced in 1989 and 1990 but could not bring poverty back to its
previous levels as shown in Table 2.

6

Table 2: Long Term Trends in Poverty, Employment, Growth and Inflation (1980-1998)

Poverty Rate 
Urban Areas 

Poverty Rate 
Unemployment 
Buenos Aires 
(% of labor force) 
1980 
8.0 
2.6 
1985 
16.0 
6.1 
1988 
33.1 
6.3 
1989 
38.1 
7.6 
1990 
41.2 
41.5 
7.6 
1991 
26.4 
30.5 
6.1 
1992 
18.7 
24.2 
6.9 
1993 
16.9 
21.8 
9.6 
1994 
17.0 
21.6 
11.0 
1995 
22.6 
27.2 
17.3 
1996 
25.5 
30.1 
16.5 
1997 
25.2 
29.4 
14.7 
1998 
24.9 
29.3 
13.5 
Note: Unemployment prior to 1990 refers to Greater Buenos Aires only
Source: INDEC. Poverty Rates calculated from EPH data by Bank staff

Inflation 
(% increase) 
100.8 
672.2 
343.0 
3079.5 
2314.0 
171.7 
24.9 
10.6 
4.2 
3.4 
0.2 
0.5 
0.9 

Per Capita GDP
(1980=100)
100.0
83.9
86.7
79.4
77.0
84.1
90.9
95.0
101.3
96.1
99.4
106.6
109.8

16. As shown in Table 3, the 1990s have also seen a deterioration in income equality.
The share of income received by the lowest 20 percent has declined since 1990, so that in
1998 they received less than 4 percent of GDP while the upper 20 percent increased their
share from 51 percent to 54 percent. If income distribution had remained constant in the
1990s, the poverty rate would have been 25 percent in 1998, instead of 29 percent.

Gini Coefficient 
Upper 20% 
Lower 20% 

1990 

0.46 
50.90 
4.55 

Table 3: Income Distribution, 1990-98

(percent)

1991 1992 1993 1994 1995 1996 1997 

0.46 
0.45 0.46 
0.46 0.47 
Q.48 
0.48 
51.40 50.40 50.90 51.10 52.20 53.00 53.20 
4.50 
4.85 
4.50 
4.55 4.30 
4.05 
4.00 

1998

0.49
54.25
3.80

17. The factors causing a worsening of income distribution and poverty levels are
complex but an important one is the change in labor demand which has depressed wages
for unskilled workers while increasing them for those with better skills. During the 1 980s,
there was an accumulation of excess employment in all sectors, as the economy stagnated
but total employment grew by 28 percent. With lower protection and cost of capital in the
early 1990s, the comparative advantage shifted in capital's favor. This led to demand for
skilled workers and increased the wages of those with secondary and higher education.
As a result, 40 percent of the change in the Gini is due to differences in education. The
income of professionals has grown by about 5.6 percent per year over the 1990-98 period;
skilled wages, by 3.6 percent; and wages for unskilled workers, zero. For those with two
years of schooling, the returns to education have dropped from 6.8 to 5 percent and for
those with 18 years of schooling, the returns have gone from 9.8 to 13.7 percent.

7

The Poor'

18. The poor in Argentina are those less able to compete, those with the least skills and
the least experience. The poor are also the ones with the greatest family obligations and
dependents. Looking at the urban population only, the poor:

* have significantly larger families (4.6 vs. 3.1), as a result, 43 percent of children aged
0-4 live below the poverty line;
* have younger families with a much higher dependency ratio (3.0 vs. 1.4);
* have much higher unemployment rates (twice the rate of the non-poor);
* have fewer years of schooling (about 25% less), and are less likely have formal work;
* 
typically are employed in construction if they are men; services if they are women;
* 
include the indigent (defined as those lacking sufficient money to afford a basic food
basket), who represent about 7 percent of the population;
* possess a relatively high standard of living: 78 percent own a refrigerator; 85 percent
own a television; 59 percent own a washing machine; 19 percent own a car; and only
4 percent lack electricity; but
* most live in difficult circumstances in poor neighborhoods that lack basic
infrastructure and often live in areas lacking adequate drainage, near garbage dumps
or other marginal areas prone to floods.

19. When consulted for the recent poverty assessment, most of the urban poor consider
not having work as their biggest problem, even above meeting basic needs. This shows
how important having a job is, not just for the income generated but also the social status
and implied security. Nevertheless, while employment is critical, it is not the only factor
explaining poverty as poverty trends correlate with both unemployment and wages. The
trend in wages for unskilled workers, as noted in para. 17, goes a long way in explaining
why poverty levels have increased: at present, unskilled workers earning the average
wage with the average number of dependents would be at the indigent line and a typical
worker in the industrial sector with dependents could also be below the poverty line.

20. Moreover, the poor face much more insecure employment when they have jobs and
are more likely to have periods when they are not working. The labor market in Argentina
is dualistic with about 55 percent of employment "formal" in the sense that workers are
covered by social security and labor legislation protection. The remaining 45 percent can
be divided between self-employed and informal salaried workers; the latter are more
likely to be poor. The bulk of unemployment in Argentina, in fact, has originated in the
informal sector which lacks unemployment insurance, health insurance and pensions
putting these workers at risk. The majority of the unemployed are young, with
unemployment rates for workers in their teens and 20s twice as high as for those in their
40s and 50s. In addition, since 1988, participation rates have risen by about three

'See the Bank's most recent Poverty Assessment for Argentina, entitled Poor People in a Rich Country,
report number 19992-AR, dated March 23, 2000. These data refer only to those living in urban centers of
5000 persons or more; official household surveys do not include the rural population. Work is presently
underway under the joint Bank-IBD regional project to extend the cover of regular surveys as well as
improvement poverty related statistics.

8

percentage points, and a large element of that has been the increase by women. It is
estimated that this alone accounts for 25 percent of the increase in unemployment.

21. These statistics mask sharp differences among the provinces. The City of Buenos
Aires stands out with an income per capita of about $ 25,000, as compared to the poorest
province-Formosa-with $ 2,500 per capita. Income distribution varies: the Gini
coefficient for Jujuy, Argentina's third poorest province, stands at 0.53, as compared to
0.40 for Santa Fe, the province with the most equal income distribution. Generally,
poverty rates are substantially higher in the Northwest (46%) and Northeast (49%). These
provinces also tend to have higher percentages of rural populations and indigenous
peoples: a survey of rural poverty in three provinces showed that poverty rates among the
rural populations can be exceedingly high--as much 70 percent (see Box 2).

Box 2: The Forgotten Poor of the Rural Areas and the Indigenous

Most govemment surveys ignore rural areas. Since the country is 89% urban, the absence of the rural poor in the
overall poverty rate does not make a huge difference, but the effect is often to ignore the special problems of rural
poverty. Recent surveys for three provinces (Salta, Misiones, and San Juan) give us some insight. The weighted
average poverty rate for these areas is about 49%, with a rate of indigence of 19%. The rural poor are less likely to be
farmers as compared to the non-poor rural population and are more likely to be wage workers, self-employed or
unemployed. Unemployment is high in rural areas, about 19% overall. The poor are more likely to be illiterate, drop
out of school early, and show lower gains from their schooling. In general, the poor are net consumers of food, so that
lower food prices raise welfare. Poor farmers have less land, but have higher productivity through intensive
production. They generally lack clear titles to their land, have little or no savings, and are less likely to have borrowed
money. Without credit, they tend to use fewer inputs, and have lower productivity per unit of labor. Even less is know
about the indigenous population in Argentina. A recent Bank supported study estimated that they number about one
million people, with at least half living in isolated rural areas. (Better data should be available with the year 2000
National Census.) The study was part of a larger effort under an IDF grant to integrate indigenous peoples in the
Bank's activities. This effort is bearing fruit as a LIL for Indigenous Peoples has been included in the FY00 program.

B. MAIN DEVELOPMENT CHALLENGES

Poverty and Human Resource Development

22. Argentina faces a complex set of social problems that are not easily resolved in the
short term. With modest growth of about 3.3 percent per year over the next ten years, the
poverty rates could be expected to fall to about 20-22 percent. Higher growth, close to 5
percent per year, could bring that rate down to around 17 percent. But this also depends
on what happens with income inequity as continued deterioration of Argentina's Gini
coefficient could add several percentage points to the final outcome. Also, reducing
unemployment would clearly have a positive impact even though it would not eliminate
poverty: reducing the unemployment rate by half could take several percentage points off
the poverty rate and have the greatest impact on the poorest of the poor.2

23. The main factors explaining these results relate to the change in labor demand to
those with high skills, with a commensurate depression in the wages for unskilled
workers. The supply of unskilled workers is further compounded by high drop-out rates

2 These estimates were derived as part of the recent Poverty Assessment.

9

for poor youths and increased participation. At the same time, higher dependency ratios
for low income workers add to the shear numbers of poor, mainly children. Continued
emphasis on education is thus critical to poverty reduction over the long run.

24. Another dimension of the problem is that Argentina's continued vulnerability to
external shocks exacerbates the risks that the unemployed, low income workers and their
dependents face. This also heightens the need for programs to mitigate and manage social
risks, using scarce resources which instead could be invested in long-term human capital
development. Lowering county risk would in turn lower the cost of capital and create a
virtuous circle of stimulating investment and creating employment, particularly in sectors
such as construction which employs low skilled workers. The impact on the poor would
not so much be in terms of wage rates but in the overall demand for labor.

25. Another dimension is the considerable inequity in public services. While demands
continue to be very large, especially in areas such as education, health, housing, water and
sanitation, and urban services, much can be done to provide better services through
reorienting existing public programs and creating spaced for private delivery and
financing. There are many examples of where this is possible. Finally, there will remain
vulnerable groups who face particular challenges. Ways of better serving these groups
and helping them to managing social risks are needed. Increasingly, these programs need
to take into account regional differences and disparities.

26. Social Protection. Argentina has one of the highest levels of per capita public social
spending in Latin America, providing more than countries such as Chile, Costa Rica and
Uruguay. Social spending has risen in importance over time, from about 15 percent of
GDP in the early 1 980s, to about 18 percent today, taking over the fiscal space created by
privatization. There are three main components: social insurance (57%), universal social
sector programs mainly education and health (36%), and programs specifically targeted to
the poor (7%). While the share of total spending targeted to the poor is relatively small,
the poor benefit in varying degrees from all social programs. The lowest 20 percent in the
income distribution receive 22 percent of total social spending, and pay 7 percent of all
taxes. People in the upper quintile pay 47 percent of taxes and receive only 19 percent of
social sector spending. However, social insurance, being a contributory program, is
regressive as is the tax system. That said, incidence analysis indicates that, overall,
Argentina's social programs are pro-poor and the Government estimates that they reduce
the indigent rate by 2 percentage points, the poverty rate by as much as 14 percentage
points, and the Gini coefficient by 8 percentage points.3

27. Argentina has numerous targeted social assistance programs: food, nutrition, health,
employment, training, education, shelter, clothing, income subsidies, and other emergency
programs plus those aimed at strengthening communities. This assistance appears to be
strongly pro-poor: 65 percent of benefits go to the poor and 47 percent goes to the poorest
20 percent. In contrast, the highest quintile gets only 2.4 percent of the benefits. In some

3At present, household surveys in Argentina which are used to measure poverty are based on income, not consumption.
Hence. the impact of social programs-especially 
those which provide in-kind benefits-is not taken into account in
estimating the poverty rate. As indicated above, the differences can be considerable

10

cases, results have been very impressive: an evaluation of the TRABAJAR program,
supported by the Bank, estimated that 75 percent of benefits went to people in the bottom
20 percent, and 40 percent of the benefits reached the lowest 5 percent.

28. More problems emerge in terms of coverage and the pro-cyclical bias in social
spending. First, about 75 percent of the poor do not receive any public assistance and
over half got neither public nor private help. For instance, food and nutrition programs for
young children and senior citizens are one of the most important areas. Of the most
vulnerable group to long-term negative effects of malnutrition-- the children aged 0-2 in
the lowest quintile-- only 44 percent receive benefits from public nutrition programs, even
though they receive 70 percent of benefits. Secondly, government spending is pro-
cyclical and rises and falls with GDP changes. This situation is even worse for the social
sectors and, whereas targeted programs should be part of a social safety net that expands
during a crisis, they fluctuate even more than total social spending: a five percent drop in
GDP is associated with a 9 percent drop in targeted social sector spending.

29. Education. Argentina's education system has been one of the most advanced in the
region with a literacy rate of 97 percent for the adult population, universal primary
enrollment, and about 20 percent of the population between the ages of 20 to 25 enrolled
in higher education. Yet, Argentina under-performs in certain key indicators. The
secondary graduation rate in Argentina is 52 percent, compared to an average rate for the
OECD countries of 80 percent. Of 100 students entering primary school, only 40 will
enter the last year of secondary school, 35 will enroll in university and only seven will
graduate. A survey in 1993 indicated that 40 percent of students completing secondary
education did not read and write up to acceptable standards. Another survey in 1992
showed that 80 percent of secondary students had below average skills in mathematics.
While expenditures have increased, recurrent spending often represents 95 percent of the
total, with little going to investment.

30. During the last five years, with Bank and IDB support, Argentina has started an
ambitious program aimed at transforming the education system with a new structure and
curriculum, increased access at preschool and secondary levels, increased quality
(evaluation, standards, teacher training, information systems), more autonomy to the
provinces regarding their education policies, and targeted investments to improve
infrastructure and pedagogic materials for the poor. Progress made by the reform is fragile
and Argentina needs to deepen the transformation in the education sector to:

* Address the growing and changing demand for secondary education
* Finance the next phase of education transformation
* Stimulate private initiatives (see para. 26 of the Private Sector Strategy, Annex A)
* Prepare the teachers better and increase their participation in the reform process
* Promote and sustain change at the school level
* 
Improve the relevance and efficiency of higher education

31. Education and the Poor. Overall, the poor benefit from public education spending
more than the non-poor, in part because richer families tend to send their children to

11

private schools. The poor tend to benefit more from primary education; secondary
education tends to benefit slightly more the middle class. The major distortion comes in
tertiary or university education: the lowest quintile receives only 10 percent of the
benefits, with the richest quintile receiving 34 percent. At the same time private
enrollment is lower at the university level. Private enrollments equaled 25 percent of total
primary and secondary enrollment in 1996 but only 14 percent at the university level.

32. Performance indicators, such as dropout rates and repetition, are sharply
differentiated by income groups; dropout rates increase markedly for the poor after seven
years of education (see Box 3). Only 24 percent of students in the lowest quintile
complete secondary school, as compared to 76 percent for the upper quintile; 37 percent
of poor youth aged 14 to 18 are out of school. In addition, poor children are more likely
to be older than other primary school children due to late entry and repetition.

Box 3: Dropping out of School

The estimated rate of return to completing primary education is only 2.5%, while for secondary education it is about
10% and for tertiary education about 29%. Why do many children dropout of school early if the retums are so high?
The 1997 Social Development Survey found that about half of the dropouts cited "personal motives" of which 77
percent say lack of interest was the main cause. A common interpretation is that school is boring. Yet, only a few of the
respondents blame the schools and a small percentage find education useless. About 43% gave "economic difficulties"
as a reason, of which 73% reported that they left school because they needed to work. Economic difficulty is much
more a problem for the low income families (50% for the lowest quintile vs. 29% for the upper quintile).

An examination of school enrollment of 15-19 year olds reveals that parental education and income have significant
positive effects on schooling. Distance to public secondary school remains a significant cost that discourages some
children: children in the first quintile live further from school than those in the fifth quintile. The unemployment rate
among household heads is negatively related to enrollment. This suggests that in areas where the unemployment rate is
high, children's human capital formation suffers. Further analysis reveals that the rate of return to education is
probably lower for individuals with poor parents, as measured by the education of the head of the family. Students
whose parents have only primary education have an incremental rate of return from a year of secondary education that
is 60 percent lower that those whose parents have tertiary education.

The fact that the poor have lower rates of return from the same education might explain changes in enrollment At the
secondary level, among poor students enrollment rates between 1992 and 1997 have decreased, while enrollment rates
for other deciles have increased. For higher education, the shift is even more pronounced. Hence, the richer groups are
responding to higher retums to education, while the poorer groups are not, perpetuating the gap between rich and poor.

33. The Government's two main programs to reduce inequities at primary and secondary
levels turn out to be quite effective at redressing inequities and this investment can be
easily justified (see Box 4). The Pacto Federal Educativo helps provinces meet the
demands of extending mandatory education from 7 to 10 years, introduced in 1993 .
Because most children who are not enrolled in secondary education are poor, this effort is
likely to benefit the poor in particular. The Plan Social Educativo (PSE) is targeted
directly to schools serving such children. It improves school infrastructure; targets
indigenous students, rural schools, adult and special education; and finances scholarships
for poor children in secondary school. About 60 percent of PSE beneficiaries come from
the first quintile and the two lowest income quintiles account for over 80 percent but only
about half of the children are covered.

12

Box 4: Does it Pay to Invest in Education?

While we did not evaluate the PSE program directly, it is possible to make some indirect estimates of the retums on
investment in secondary schools. It is often argued that one way of raising retums to education is for the govemment to
invest more per student so that school children can be provided with better teachers, educational materials, equipment,
and classroom environment. Based on estimates from regional data, we estimate that a 10 percent increase in public
secondary expenditure would produce a 3.5% increase in the lifetime wage of a 20-29 year old with a complete
secondary education. Thus, an expenditure of 800 pesos per student would produce an annual return of about 200
pesos per year, or an internal rate of return of about 25%, clearly a productive investment that would reduce poverty

34. Health. Health care spending in Argentina is the highest in Latin America at about
ten percent of GDP and overall health indicators have improved markedly: in 1995, life
expectancy stood at 76 years, 12 more than 1960, infant mortality was at 19 per 1,000
births in 1998 compared to over 30 in the 1980s, and matemal mortality dropped to 14 per
10,000 births in 1995. However, these rates are not as good than those of other countries
in the same income range. Chile, with lower health spending ($295 per capita in 1994),
had an infant mortality rate of 12 per 1,000 live births and a maternal mortality ratio of 6.5
per 10,000 births in 1995. In addition, national averages hide significant variations
between income groups and regions: communicable, maternal, prenatal and nutritional
conditions account for 19 percent of years of life lost in lower income provinces but only
5 percent in higher income provinces. Life expectancy between the richest provinces and
the poorest differs by about four years.

35. Argentina is in the midst of an epidemiological transformation and concurrently has
an emergence of non-communicable problems while combating communicable diseases
such as tuberculosis, diarrhea, dengue fever, and AIDS. It is also in the midst of a reform
process to improve quality, equity and cost effectiveness. Recent efforts, with Bank
support, have contributed to a decline in the infant and maternal mortality ratios, for
example, but the country has not made sufficient progress with respect to preventable
diseases that disproportionately affect the poor.

36. Under investment in the public system has led to a deterioration in infrastructure and
absence of modern practices and health protocols. This has resulted in a drift of the public
health delivery system towards a hospital-based model with public hospitals crowded with
out-patient visits that could be handled at lesser cost - for both providers and patients - in
primary care centers and by family doctors. The number of family doctors has increased
over the last decade, mostly to act gatekeepers for health insurance, but the lack of a
supporting policy is a deterrent to better first level care. Also, an efficient surveillance
system and a strategy for health education and promotion are at the developmental stage,
with recent Bank support. Ministries of health are generally ill equipped to carry out
important functions such as regulating insurance, setting standards and quality assurance.

37. The pending agenda of reforms includes:
* 
Improving equity among Obras Sociales by ensuring that those covering high-risk,
poor populations can finance the standard benefits by regular updating of enrollment
and use of additional risk-adjustment criteria (eg. family size, age, sex).

13

* Strengthening the Health Insurance Supervisory Agency so that it can effectively
enforce compliance with regulations by all health insurance funds.
* Consolidating the market. The number of national Obras decreased from 360 in 1994
to 290 in 1999, but many still have less than 10,000 beneficiaries.
* Finally, actions have so far failed to ensure the financial and technical sustainability
of INSSJP.

38. Health Care and the Poor. As elsewhere, the poor in Argentina carry a
disproportionate part of the burden of disease and are disproportionately affected by
diseases that could be controlled. Because of their access to public hospitals, the poor are
adequately protected against major health expenditures, but they rely on low quality
services and often have to pay a lot for medicines. Thirty-seven percent of the population
and 62 percent of the poor are not covered by health insurance. Of those not covered by
any health insurance plan include most of the unemployed and informal sector workers.
In public hospitals, the poor tend not to get the same quality of care as those in the upper
income groups. Moreover, if health insurance beneficiaries need interventions which are
not included in their benefits package, or when they do not want to pay the insurance co-
payment, they can seek free care at the public hospital. This constitutes a significant
subsidy from the public to the private sectors and from the poor to the non-poor.

39. The next step in health reform is to improve outcomes consistent with the level of
spending by integrating the system, achieving universal participation (most notably by the
uninsured poor), increasing equity and solidarity, at the same time as improving efficiency
and quality. One of the biggest challenges will be to overcome the gaps in equity by
extending coverage to the uninsured, especially the poor, unemployed or are those in the
informal sector (see Box 5). Another will be to shift the paradigm from hospital based
service to networks of providers, including primary care. The objective is to both improve
health care for the poor and raise service quality by creating "choice and voice".

Box 5: Health Insurance for the Uninsured

With a view to universalizing health insurance coverage, the Government is piloting, with Bank assistance, formal and
explicit health coverage to the uninsured in three provinces. Health insurance for the poor would initiate a process of
switching to a more efficient, equitable, and transparent (demand) subsidy scheme. The proposed financing mechanism
would both help improve the targeting of subsidies towards the poor, and link provider payment to service production.
The switch from supply to demand subsidization of health care for the poor also lays the foundation for providing
public hospitals with an incentive to provide appropriate care to the poor and, in the medium run, for offering a choice
of insurance carriers and providers. The development of health insurance for the poor is already attracting wide interest
and several provinces, in addition to the three pilot ones, are contemplating it.

Infrastructure

40. For decades, fiscal crises and poor management have led to under-funding of new
investments and maintenance, leading to a deterioration of Argentina's infrastructure.
According to the 1994 WDR, Argentina was one of the lowest performers among upper-
middle income countries and, based on 1990 data, Argentina had the lowest share of

14

population with access to safe water and the lowest share of paved roads in good
condition. With economic stability and changes in institutional responsibilities through
privatization and decentralization, this picture has started to change.

41. To date, Argentina has gone further than almost any developing country in privatizing
infrastructure. With Bank Group assistance, ten sub-sectors were restructured and
privatized during 1990-95, raising US$2.1 billion in cash and debt swaps worth US$9.5
billion. Privatization included future obligations to make investments, estimated at
US$12.4 billion. The results are uncontestable, bringing clean water and sanitation
services to three million previously unserved residents of Buenos Aires, providing
telephone service for 2.7 million new subscribers, improving service for 1.7 million
existing telephone users, rehabilitating four thousand km. of freight rail line, and
providing more efficient handling for 44 million tons of imports and exports (about 50
percent of Argentina's total merchandise trade) through the port of Buenos Aires.
Electricity prices, at the wholesale level and for large consumers, are now very
competitive. Privatized companies have been able to turn performance from loss making
(4 percent of GDP in the 1 980s) to profit making.

42. Even with the boost given by the privatized companies, annual infrastructure
investment in the last 10 years has fallen below 2 percent of GDP and there are a number
of institutional regulatory, equity and other concerns yet to completely addressed (see Box
6). Infrastructure is deficient in water and sanitation, roads, inland waterways, and urban
services (waste disposal, street paving and urban drainage). Although infrastructure
services-notably electricity, communications, gas and water--have improved in major
metropolitan areas, these services remain in short supply and inefficient in the rest of the
country. In highways and ports, demand has outstripped supply, and some vital inter-
modal linkages are missing; the use of railways for freight is low relative to road
transport, though rail is twice as cheap; and Argentina's potential for using waterways
remains untapped. Dry ports, brokering markets, and third party delivery are areas which
would significantly increase competitiveness. Privatization at the federal level is nearly
completed so now the focus is at the provincial level. The challenge of developing
transparent, workable regulatory practices remains, particularly at the sub-national level.

15

Box 6: POST PRIVATIZATION INFRASTRUCTURE 
INSTITUTIONS AND ISSUES

* 

Provision and management of infrastructure in Argentina can be divided into three areas, each of which faces a range of
remaining problems and need for improvement:
Private utilities and transport services (with state regulation}-power, gas, telecommunications, airlines, bus
* 
services, port tenninals. Areas to be addressed include costs in some sectors; consumer protection; regulatory
failure/capture; user safety; competition in some sectors; and lack of service to poor and remote areas .
Concessioned and cooperative services with a mix of private-public finance-water and sanitation, railways (inter-
city, freight, suburban), subway, ports, airports, toll roads, solid waste disposal. Concerns include costs -
particularly ports and urban rail; coverage in rural and poor urban communities; levels of investment; safety and
environmental protection; urban pollution; consumer protection; transparency; risk allocation; and regulations.
Publicly financed managed services--- flood control and urban drainage; public roads (without tolls); power
distribution in some areas; irrigation, water distribution and rural drainage; passenger railways, solid and hazardous
waste management. Issues are: quality and reliability of service; inadequate investments; maintenance; safety and
environmental record; consumer protection; management and over-staffing.

* 

43. Infrastructure and the Poor. Access to water (81%) and sewage systems (38%) in
urban areas remains deficient overall, and is even worse in rural areas (17% and 3%,
respectively). Among poor households, 51 percent suffer from overcrowding, 34 percent
lack running water, and 28 percent are located in areas of high risk of flooding. Although
privatization has improved the quality and access of service, there are concerns about
affordability especially relating to access. In addition, data on public investment at the
city level show that there is variation in terms of street, sidewalks, and drainage with
richer areas receiving more than poorer areas. As such, local investment decisions, which
are primarily made at the municipal level and have not received much attention in the
dialogue on poverty, is an important area to pursue.

44. Argentina has yet to find a solution to its housing needs that combines the best of the
public sector with private resources and personal initiative. The mainstay of the present
public housing program is FONAVI with funding of about $900 million per year. The
fact remains that it is not designed to assist the poor: the minimum income required to
purchase a house is typically above the income level of a poor family. Completion costs
are also well above what other programs can do with vouchers and self-help. With an
overwhelming focus on construction, the program does little to upgrade existing
neighborhoods, or to provide urban services.

Environmental Concerns

45. Argentina's ratification of the Biodiversity and Climate Change Conventions reflects
its citizens' concern for the global environmental issues of bio-diversity, conservation and
global warming. Effective policies to meet the obligations of these global agreements
require a broader dialogue within the Government and consultation with civil society. In
particular, environmental policies are shared among a wide range of institutions at the
federal, provincial and municipal levels; there are overlapping responsibilities, a lack of
coordination, and little institutional capacity. This complexity, as well as the lack of clear
priorities for action, has hampered finding solutions to environmental problems.

16

46. Although Argentina does not suffer from the acute pollution problems found in many
other developing countries, management of water resources has emerged as the top
priority, most critically in urban areas but increasingly in rural areas. Contamination by
industrial and sewage discharges is most severe in Greater Buenos Aires, several
provincial cities, and isolated industrial locations. As noted above, sanitation is an area in
which Argentina is well behind and a recent review by the Bank indicates that serious
problems of water quality are emerging because of aquifer mining and vertical
contamination of water tables that could have catastrophic consequences in 15 to 25 years.
Declining fertility, soil loss due to water and wind erosion, and salinization; along with
water logging, currently affect one third of the irrigated area and will pose greater threats
to agriculture in coming years. Paradoxically, water consumption at 500 liters per day per
person is extremely high. Sustainable fisheries management has been identified as a
particular area of concern, along with coastal and maritime management. Argentina's
fishing industry, which represented as much as $ 1 billion in exports only a few years ago,
is on the point of collapse, the consequences of several years of over-fishing.

47. Increased investment in sustainable natural resource development requires a clear
regulatory framework and public sector oversight. The Government estimates that
Argentina spends publicly some 2 percent of GDP in pollution, abatement, control and
environment which compares favorably to OECD countries. The bulk of this spending is
by municipalities for solid waste collection and disposal. Yet, solid waste disposal
problems are far from being resolved as open dumping is common and the public sector is
likely under-spending in terms of monitoring, enforcement, awareness and education.

Gender

48. Argentina shares some characteristics of OECD countries when it comes to gender --
equality in educational opportunity in particular-but it is also a country of contrasts and
there exist important gender based differences, as identified in the recent review by the
Bank. In the area of education, there are little differences, with female students suffering
less from repetition than males, but losing ground at secondary school in terms of
educational outcomes. In the labor market, there has been a significant increase in female
participation, notably during economic crises, but with a steady upward trend as female
education levels rise. Poor women, however, tend to work less than their richer
counterparts, and tend to be concentrated in the service sector. Yet, the largest difference
in wages exists among professionals with females earning 65 percent of the wages paid to
men. The drop in wages paid to lower skilled males, in fact, is seen as a growing social
problem as is the rising unemployment rate among male youths with few skills. Some of
the most striking differences are in the area of health, especially reproductive services:
despite popular acceptance, there is no national policy on reproductive health and illegal
abortions are thought to be one of the major causes of Argentina's relatively high maternal
mortality rate. Adolescents, low income groups and rural populations all have limited
access to family planning services. The result is large dependency rates in poor families,
with almost half of Argentina's children below the poverty line, and increasing adolescent
pregnancies among the poorly educated.

17

49. This situation has serious consequences as family structure, gender roles and
education levels are strongly inter-linked and combine to perpetuate poverty. While being
a single female head of household does not necessarily mean being poor as compared to a
male head of household, there is a greater chance that the children of such a family will be
poor and a higher chance of not being in school: 67 percent as compared to 51 percent.
As a consequence of their family responsibilities, mothers may seek work which is more
flexible, albeit with lower pay, and less opportunity for advancement. Poor women, too,
take on a larger role in community activities, volunteering at communal kitchens and child
development centers. Importantly, poor single female headed families are more likely to
receive public assistance than single parent families headed by males. Children in these
latter families, thus, are most likely to be left unattended by social programs.

Consolidating Macro-Economic Reforms

50. Argentina's macroeconomic stability depends on both foreign and domestic
confidence in the currency board introduced in 1991 as the key feature of the
Convertibility plan which stabilized the economy. Despite past shocks, this plan remains
sound and enjoys the full support of the new administration and society. The initial
conditions in Argentina amply justified the adoption of the currency board and, given the
high degree of dollarization, it is widely understood that the abandonment of the plan
under crisis conditions would lead to wide-spread default. Currently, 62 percent of private
credit and 59 percent of private deposits are held in foreign currency, and 95 percent of
public debt .4 Unlike the 1995 crisis which saw significant capital flight, international
reserves and bank deposits continued to grow during 1999, with dollar deposits increasing
from 55 to 59 percent. As a result, not only was the Convertibility law observed at all
times in 1999, but the monetary base was fully covered by intemational reserves.

5 1. Taking the Convertibility Plan as an anchor of the economy implies an automatic
adjustment to capital flow shocks, be they internal or external in nature, which may result
in demonetization, causing an economic contraction. In reality, the political willingness to
tolerate any economic contraction is related to the willingness to absorb the social costs
primarily in terms of unemployment. Social protection and counter-cyclic spending
especially for these programs, thus, becomes a necessary complement to the Convertibility
Plan. At the same time, given limited capacity of lender of last resort to the financial
system, the monetary authorities have to have an array of liquidity facilities. Since the
required adjustment is determined by the economy's ability to absorb shocks, flexible
factor markets, including labor, are essential.

52. With this as background, it is clear that the current focus of macro-economic policy in
Argentina is appropriately placed in reducing the fiscal deficit and liberalizing labor
markets while providing social safety nets and keeping the banking system solid.
Progress has been very good in the latter but there is still much to do on the other fronts.

4These 

figures differ considerably from those of countries such as Brazil, Mexico and Chile, which have much
higher relative shares of domestic debt. Uruguay, on the other hand, has debt characteristics and levels of
dollarization more like Argentina's.

18

Importantly, Argentina needs to reduce its vulnerability to shocks, mainly by bringing
down country risk perceptions which means reducing the accumulation of public debt at
both the federal and provincial levels and by expanding exports. To achieve the former,
Argentina needs to continue its present path of fiscal discipline and to deepen structural
measures to promote domestic savings and financial intermediation. An important feature
of the fiscal program is to have a "rainy day" fund, as now required under the law of fiscal
responsibility. The Government needs to monitor carefully key economic indicators such
as debt to GDP and debt service that have deteriorated in the 1 990s.

53. The main instrument for Argentina to remain competitive and expand its exports is
improving productivity. Over the period 1991-98, total factor productivity (TFP) grew at
2.1 percent annually, reducing production costs. These gains first came from the use of
installed capacity from 1991 to 1993, followed by the effects of gross domestic
investment which grew from 16.8 percent of GDP in 1992 to 19.9 percent in 1998 (before
slipping in 1999), use of technology and, most importantly, the fruits of privatization,
deregulation and opening up of the economy. Aggregate costs for selected manufacturing
sectors have increased only slightly, at 0.8 percent annually since 1993. Labor costs and
capital costs have decreased at 3.5 percent per year, compensating for price increases of
tradable and non-tradable inputs. The service sector (other than public utilities and
banking) lagged behind and is the only sector where unit costs are above those in 1992.

54. All of this points to the need to mount an assault on those areas constraining
productivity growth and flexibility in the economy. The main areas include:

* 

* 

* 

* 

* 

the reduction of labor costs (wages and payroll taxes) in the formal sector and
increased flexibility via reform of labor regulations (see Box 7);

increased access by the private sector to financing, particularly middle market firms
and SMEs, through capital market development and reductions in the cost of capital;

improvement in workers' skills and education, the inadequacy of which became
apparent in the course or economic restructuring under the Convertibility Plan;

reduction of transaction costs, due to the incomplete transformation of the tax system,
the judicial system, customs, etc., both at the federal and sub-national levels;

renewed vigor in trade reform with less use of antidumping measures and tariff
dispersion, as well as reduction in customs delays; and

* 

reduction of excessively high logistic and inventory costs, which are nearly three
times higher than OECD countries and over 30 percent of GDP.

19

Box 7: Labor Market Reform and Poverty

Current labor legislation tends to be biased against the absorption of labor. Centralized or sectoral collective
bargaining agreements limit finns' abilities to adapt to competitive conditions. The ergo omnes clause extends these
agreements to all workers and finns in the sector. even if not signed. Ninety percent of present contracts are "Ultra-
active", remaining in force even after expiration, and lock in work arrangements that may no longer be appropriate to
market conditions. High non-wage benefits drive labor costs up relative to the cost of capital. Restrictions on firing
discourage firms from hiring additional workers.

Recent experience with reforms in the 1990s supports the view that these contracts are binding. Past reforms lowered
payroll taxes somewhat, improved the pension system, and provided for temporary contracts that were exempt from
payroll tax and severance payments. Employment under these modalidades promovidas reached nearly 5% of total
employed workers by 1998, and accounted for 40% of the new jobs created between 1996-98. However, the
modalidades promovidas were abolished in 1998 which may have further added to unemployment in 1999. The labor
law changes in 1998 also shortened probation periods, and further centralized collective bargaining arrangements.

Reversing these regulations is critical. Overall, the existing labor legislation is ill-suited to a new competitive
environment, makes adjustments to adverse shocks difficult and discourages firms from taking on additional workers.
Programs such as PYMES (1994) which gives firms of less than fifty employees a special regime for collective
bargaining and facilitating labor contracting are important for giving firms the flexibility to adapt and grow.

Private Sector Development

55. The changes in Argentina's economy policies and the concomitant shift in the role of
the state places the private sector in center stage for increased production and employment
generation. The private sector also has a major role to play in infrastructure and public
services as a result of previous privatization. (For more details see the Private Sector
Strategy in Annex A.) Yet, several challenges remain:

* 

Improving access of the private sector (particularly middle market firms and SMEs)
to long term financing for modemization and expansion, and enabling firms to ride
through major disruptions of extemal capital markets.
* Helping increase the role that the private sector can play in sectors previously in the
public domain (eg social sectors, housing).
Improving the business environment, particularly skills development, labor markets,
and the judicial system.

* 

56. Blue-chip Argentine firms have improved their productivity over the past ten years
and have shown resilience during the two recessions. Economic liberalization and
improved efficiency stemming from privatization of infrastructure (e.g. reductions in
transportation costs) have helped these companies maintain competitiveness and maintain
access to long-term financing. They also have professional management and well-
educated workforces. The rest of the corporate sector lacks access to long-term finance,
either domestic or foreign. Having come through the effects of the Tequila crisis, many of
these middle-market and smaller firms (SMEs) have become more efficient, and their low
leverage helps them weather crises. However, they lack access to capital for further
improving their productivity as financing costs are prohibitive. Regional development
remains uneven. Finally, the private sector has potential in the provision of social
services, particularly in private health care and tertiary and vocational education.

20

57. As noted above, large firms and some smaller ones show relatively good corporate
govemance, although family holdings still dominate and many smaller firms need
improvements in governance and management. Firms in less developed provinces tend to
lag further behind in both governance and management. Broadening corporate ownership
is important, and the recent growth in the private equity industry is encouraging.
However, the Argentine public equity market still lacks depth. Much needs to be done in
disclosure and dissemination of financial information.

58. Argentina's banking sector has one of the strongest in Latin America, with a good
regulatory and supervisory framework, although there remain too many smaller, weaker
banks. Moreover, the system intermediates to the private sector only a small fraction of
savings compared with many other developing countries (see para. 13 of the PSS). Most
private banks have only intermittent access to long-term funding in the external market,
and tend not lend long-term (except essentially for IFC and IDB credit lines). The
Government's requirements can crowd out the private sector when credit is scarce.

59. The non-banking financial sector, typically serving smaller companies with leasing
and factoring, is in an early stage of development (paras. 18-21 of the PSS). There has
been growth in pension and mutual funds since the mid-l 990's. The creation of private
pension funds in 1994 was a major move to increase domestic savings and long-term
capital. These funds now stand at about $15 billion. In general, capital markets lack
depth; much needs to be done to develop the corporate bond market, leasing, equities, and
housing finance where IFC is presently supporting the secondary mortgage market.
Equity market capitalization is relatively low at around 18 percent of GDP, with a few
large companies, mainly the privatized utilities, comprising the majority.

Institutional Capacity and Governance

60. While Argentina has favorable ratings on overall institutional development, especially
in economic management, it is weaker as regards policies for social inclusion/equity and
public sector management. Institutional weaknesses are pervasive at both provincial and
local levels, and exist among core agencies such as tax administration and the judiciary.
Although liberalization and privatization have greatly reduced opportunities for public
sector corruption in absolute terms, the general perception is that it remains widespread.
Argentina has a legacy of tax evasion, lack of internal controls and cultural norms that
inhibit whistle-blowing and the serious pursuit of allegations, as highlighted in a recent
Bank review. Thus, there are major gains to be made in encouraging transparency and
disclosure of public accounts and contracting. There are also gains to be made in
modernizing public expenditure systems and internal control and auditing, especially at
the provincial level. A recent review by the Bank on 'the federal financial management
system showed it to be adequate, albeit with the potential for improvement.

61. This situation is exacerbated by a judiciary seen as politicized and demonstrably
inefficient. A diagnosis carried out by the Bank, building on a previous IDF grant, shows
that the system suffers from heavy case loads, inequitable distribution of resources, poor
infrastructure, little in the way of modern management processes, and overly centralized

21

administration. These weaknesses all contribute to long delays and seemingly lack of
responsiveness. Judicial inefficiency, as well as poor law enforcement and economic
marginalization, are seen as contributing to higher incidence of violent crime and
increased perceptions of insecurity. The lack of a reliable and efficient judicial system,
moreover, tends to increase the costs of commercial transactions and hamper the
development of market mechanism based on contractual obligations.

Provincial Reform

62. Argentina's public sector is highly decentralized. The 24 provincial governments,
including the autonomous City of Buenos Aires, are responsible for almost half of public
sector expenditures, including 90 percent of public spending in health and education.
Decentralization of health and education during the 1990s has increasingly forged a direct
link between sub-national governments and the human and infrastructure development:
much of the critical services are now more clearly with the provinces. A companion to
improved service delivery is fiscal balance. At present, the incentives for the provinces to
be fiscally responsible are not adequate. With about 56 percent of provincial revenues
provided by automatic transfers from federal-provincial revenue sharing (and up to 90
percent range for many smaller provinces), there are few external incentives to improve
fiscal performance, with a weak link between local demands for public goods and services
and local taxation. Reform of the federal-provincial revenue sharing system is thus a top
priority (see Box 8). Moreover, there remains considerable potential for duplication and
lack of clarity in responsibility between the federal and provincial levels.

Box 8: Reform of Revenue Sharing

A long-standing issue facing the Federal Govemment and the Provinces has been the system of revenue sharing
between the two levels of govemment and among the provinces (the system of co-participation). A new proposal,
prepared with Bank assistance and being promoted under the SSAL, is presently being debated with the goal of finding
a better balance between: (i) the collection of taxes and responsibility for spending; (ii) the incentives for spending and
social equity for the poorer provinces; (iii) the predictability of revenues and the need for fiscal adjustment; (iv) the
level of revenues collected and the incentives for economic efficiency; and (v) the transparency in the allocation
process and the need to provide emergency support. A new agreement which is more equitable and efficient, would
help provide greater incentives for provinces to collect their own revenues and to reduce their demands on the Federal
Govemment for bailouts. Finding such a balance, while ensuring the 100 percent acceptance by all the parties needed to
put the new system into place by law, has been hard (in contrast, the Convertibility Law, which radically changed the
economic landscape in Argentina, only required a two-thirds majority vote). The political difficulties of reaching a
new agreement cannot be overstated, particularly with current fiscal problems that give the Federal Government little
with which to bargain. On the other hand, as an increasing number of provinces see the wisdom of bringing their own
house in fiscal order, with the support of the Federal Govemment, the Bank and the IDB, the number of constituents for
a system that rewards greater efficiency has grown during the past decade.

63. Social Indicators. Like the provincial poverty statistics cited earlier, social
indicators vary by provinces. The poorer parts of the country, particularly the North, face
a very different health profile from the richer central area and Buenos Aires: for example,
Formosa's infant mortality rate of 30 per 1000 is 50 percent greater than the national
average. On the other hand, some provinces have infant mortality rates of 12 per 1000
and some have been made great strides in reducing their rate-Salta, for example.

22

Regional difference in education are less stark, with most parts of the country performing
poorly in retention rates but the quality of education is particularly deficient in the North.
The poorer provinces, such as Chaco, Argentina's second poorest province, tend to have
lower shares of their population with completed secondary education while the wealthier
central provinces show higher than average rates of completed secondary education. The
Province of Buenos Aires has relatively poor indicators on education, health and
unemployment, given its income level close to the national average.

64. Fiscal and Economic Reforms. The situation in the 24 provinces is disparate. The
1999 recession brought the provinces' aggregate deficit to some $ 3.7 billion (about 1.2
percent of GDP) as compared to $ 1.4 billion in 1997, not counting income from
privatization. Much of this deterioration is attributable to the Province of Buenos Aires
which doubled its deficit. But the difficulties in the past year obscure the substantial
reforms over the past ten years and much greater discipline in federal-provincial relations.
All provinces have started on improving financial management, some are embarked on
improvements to the judiciary, and all are involved in implementing reforms in health and
education with Bank and IDB assistance. The largest provinces, such as Santa Fe,
Mendoza, Cordoba and the Province of Buenos Aires, have had particular difficulties in
cyclical downturns, as evidenced in 1999, and need to upgrade the quality and coverage of
their public services as they are home to the largest concentration of the urban poor.
Some other provinces have sound fiscal situations, small populations, low levels of
poverty, and high revenues from natural resources. At the other end of the spectrum, there
are a number of provinces, typically among the poorest, with high social demands, poor
institutional capacities, weak fiscal performance and high debt.

65. Debt Problems. Chronic deficits and dangerous levels of indebtedness in some
provinces have generated social and political unrest and contributed to the overall fiscal
problem. In most cases, the problem is not the total amount of debt relative to GDP per se
but weak fiscal efforts by these provinces and the short term nature of their debts. Debt
service and amortization can amount to up to 25 to 30 percent of revenues in the worst
cases. Another part of the problem is the lack of incentives by the banks and capital
markets to restrain financing as provincial debt can be guaranteed by the province from its
share of federal revenues (since these revenues are collected by the federal government,
and repayment is made automatically from the respective provincial accounts there is little
risk of default). Achieving a sustainable fiscal position may require a combination of debt
restructuring and fiscal measures; in other cases, fiscal measures alone may be sufficient.
The approach should be case-by-case and well grounded on changing future incentives.

66. Municipal-Provincial Relations. The process of reform in Argentina has been
cascading and has yet to reach the municipalities. Emerging issues of municipal debt,
fiscal management and revenue sharing with the provinces constitute a major challenge in
provincial-municipal relations. Although municipal governments in the aggregate account
for less than 10 percent of public expenditures, the failure of most to engage in meaningful
reform undermines efforts by provinces and provides a weak basis for confronting growing
urban problems, especially those facing the poor.

23

C. GOVERNMENT DEVELOPMENT STRATEGY

67. The Administration of President de la Rua, which took office in December 1999, is
firmly committed to improving fiscal and social performance within the framework of the
Convertibility Plan. Its long-term vision for Argentina focuses on education, excellence
in research and investigation, equity, productivity, competition, innovation, protection of
the environment, and fiscal responsibility. It sees the state becoming more agile, capable,
and transparent. Its goal is to more than double exports and to achieve growth averaging
at least 5 percent per year, bringing Argentina to the level of Israel among more developed
countries by 2010. Moreover, it hopes to overcome regional disparities with each region
of Argentina being considered "high income". Commensurately, the goal is for
Argentina's social indicators to be in line with those of OECD countries, especially in
terms of infant mortality (7 deaths per 1000 live births), access to safe water (100
percent), and unemployment (about 8 percent).

The First Steps

68. This is an ambitious agenda and the first steps have focused on the fiscal front. Faced
with a prolonged recession, high unemployment and high levels of poverty, plus a fiscal
deficit of more than 2 percent in 1999, the new administration has moved quickly to cut
expenditures, raise taxes, and negotiate a new IMF program. It reached an agreement with
the provinces on stabilizing provincial transfers for the next two years. All of these
measures served to restore confidence and resulted in a sharp reduction in country risk as
compared to mid-1999. It has been quick to reaffirm the importance of MERCOSUR.
Importantly, the Government has proposed a major piece of legislation on labor reform.

Medium-term Agenda

69. An Intense Fiscal Effort. These early measures form part of a medium term
strategy focused on deepening the reform of the state and making Argentina more
competitive. At the federal level, there is still a major adjustment required to comply with
the law of fiscal responsibility which means further reducing expenditures, increasing
efficiency and equity in expenditures, and reducing waste and corruption. The goal is a
positive fiscal position by 2003. The Government further recognizes that its economic
program depends on aggregate fiscal performance; it established fiscal targets including
the provinces and has launched a program to assist the poorest and most heavily indebted
provinces to restructure their debt in turn for improved performance. This program will
be monitored closely, and if the provinces fail to achieve their targets, they will lose the
debt relief. All provinces will be expected to contribute to the fiscal effort and abide by
basic parameters of the law of fiscal responsibility. At the same time, the Government is
continuing the dialogue on a new system for federal-provincial revenue sharing.

70. Promoting Investment and Growth. Enhancing fiscal performance is seen as key
in reducing the country risk perceptions, thereby reducing the high interest rates
hampering economic recovery and growth. Access to credit is seen to have been an
important limitation for small and medium size firms (SMEs). The role of such firms is

24

seen as crucial in increasing employment, reducing poverty and narrowing regional
inequities. Several new programs are being developed with the expectation that these
will, among other things, help to promote exports. The Government's agenda also
includes a new focus on information, technology, research and investigation which have
been neglected and are seen as having considerable growth potential in Argentina.

71. Reducing the bottlenecks in infrastructure is another key to improving Argentina's
competitiveness. The Government has moved to refocus on the economy's neglected
needs in infrastructure, creating a new Ministry of Infrastructure and Housing. An active
dialogue has begun with the provinces to coordinate public infrastructure needs and to
provide the forum for a comprehensive strategy. It is proceeding under the SSAL to set up
the structure to coordinate and promote multi-modal transport, one of the weakest areas.
Simultaneously, the Government has engaged the privatized companies in an effort to
reduce selected tariffs and to refocus investment commitments. Improving regulatory
perfornance, as being promoted under the SSAL, is critical. Expanding private sector
investment in infrastructure is also seen as a key for enhancing competitiveness by
reducing logistic costs and improving the access of the poor to services. Overall, this
effort would focus on improving access to external markets, particularly for the regional
economies of the interior, addressing congestion, and lowering transport costs.

72. On the external side, the Government is firmly committed to making MERCOSUR
work and joining in other regional and global efforts to harmonize trade regimes and
reduce barriers. In that context, hemispheric trade issues are on the agenda, and Argentina
remains an active and committed partner of the Cairns group. Relations with Brazil are
critical. On the long run, it means integrating economic management and making
MERCOSUR an effective tool to enhance growth and to be competitive in global markets.

73. Labor Market Flexibility and Employment. As well recognized, Argentina's
ability to compete and to adjust to shocks depends on the flexibility of its factor markets.
A significant challenge remains in the market for labor: de facto this market has become
more flexible by increasing informality which has very serious consequences in terms of
social risks, especially for uninsured workers, and tax evasion. To reduce the incentives
to informality, help reduce unemployment and make labor more competitive, the
Government has proposed a new set of labor reforms which would decentralize bargaining
and increase probation periods for new workers. It has also indicated its intention to
continue to reduce the non-wage costs of labor in the context of sound fiscal management.
In addition, it intends to reorient job training and employment support programs to make
them more effective and efficient.

74. Governance. To address concerns for public corruption which plagued the previous
regime, the Government will modernize the state and bring greater transparency. It has
already begun pursuing several cases of public corruption and is strengthening the
monitoring of public ethics. A new Office of Anti-Corruption has been created and the
Government expects to make improvements in public procurement, as well as availability
of information. On the revenue side, it also intends to attack private sector corruption in
the form of tax evasion.

25

75. Social Justice and Equity. While understanding that fiscal constraints limit the
room for increased spending, the Government has a strong commitment to greater social
equity, in partnership with the provinces. Social sector sp~ending would be increasingly
focused on the poor, particularly in education, where an important part of the budget
would be reoriented toward schools serving poorer students. The Government hopes to
increase total spending in education, bringing it to the level of 6 percent of GDP. As part
of this new policies, the Government has created an institute to mobilize private sector
contributions to finance projects aimed at poor schools. It has created another institute to
evaluate educational attainment, and is committed to including Argentina in international
standardized educational test. It would continue to finance compensatory programs, such
as school scholarships, and to expand support for distance learning and computers. On
higher education, the focus is on increased quality among public universities and the
search for ways to make the system more equitable and diversified. At the other end of
the spectrum, the intention is to expand pre-school for children above three years of age.

76. In the health sector, a comprehensive national strategy is emerging from the various
reforms and pilot programs initiated over the past five years. The Government's priorities
are the design and implementation of an integrated national health care system which is
universal and equitable at the same time as improving efficiency and quality. Public
health spending would increasingly focus on primary care and prevention. Continuation
of the process of consolidation of health insurance and the restructuring of these funds,
including that for the retired, is also part of this strategy.

77. Recognizing the need to strengthen the social safety net, reduce social risks, and spur
community development, it is the Government's intention to revamp many social
programns, in collaboration with the provinces. Particular attention would be paid to: (i)
reducing duplication and administrative costs; (ii) increasing targeting where needed and
coverage, especially for the indigent and children as priority groups; and (iii) putting in
place a registry of beneficiaries which can both help to target programs and to reduce
fraud. The Government is examining alternative ways of providing support linked to
participant in particular social programs. Attention would be increasingly paid to selected
vulnerable groups, including children and poor women who lack access to reproductive
health services, indigenous peoples who lack basic services and have little income
generating opportunity, and the poor old aged who do not have public pensions. The
needs of the rural poor, ignored in most social programs, are on the agenda. It has also
launched an initiative to reform the public pension system. This would be a very
important contribution to both fiscal balance and equity.

78. Sustainable Development. On environment, the overarching strategy is one of
conservation of Argentina's rich bio-diversity and sustainable development of its natural
resources. The Government's stance on environment is multi-faceted, with a coordinating
unit in the Office of the Chief of Cabinet. It remains committed to the goals of the Kyoto
Protocol and is keen to participate in new global initiatives such as the carbon fund. In
terms of immediate problems, it has taken action to curb excessive fishing of the depleted
hake stock and is preparing measures for more sustainable development. On Yacyreta, the

26

Government has indicated its intention to see the project through to its final design level
of 83 meters, albeit at a gradual pace, and is proceeding to reach agreements with its
Paraguayan partners while maintaining an open dialogue with the Bank and IDB.

D. BANK GROUP COUNTRY ASSISTANCE STRATEGY

Progress and Portfolio Performance

79. Over the past ten years, Argentina has become a major borrower, with the Bank
Group actively supporting the economic reforms under the Convertibility Plan. Bank
lending in the early 1990s was concentrated on economic and federal public sector
reforms, with IFC complementing those efforts with investments in the liberalized sectors.
Sector based investment operations followed, but the use of adjustment operations
continued, associated with emergency situations and support for provincial reforms. In
the aggregate, financing by both the Bank and IFC has increased when Argentina's access
to private capital markets has been limited, in conjunction with the IMF and IDB.

80. Outcomes and Status of the Portfolio. The Bank's program has been successful, as
reflected in OED's Country Evaluation Update (see Box 13): of the 20 projects initiated
and completed since 199 1, only one has been rated as unsatisfactory-the Capital Market
Development project. Performance of the current portfolio also remains good: there have
been maj or improvements in implementation since the early 1990s but dips in
performance occurred during the Tequila crisis, and most recently with the Russia/Brazil
crises. At present, the Bank's portfolio is concentrated in infrastructure (44% by value not
including SSAL), along with social sectors and sub-national governments. Excluding the
SSAL, more than 50 percent of the portfolio is with sub-national governments. Thirteen
percent of the portfolio currently has problems, reflecting recent deterioration because of
delays, counterpart financing problems and debt limitations. In addition, Yacyreta
remains a problem project, with intensive supervision underway.5

0

81. Collaboration in managing the portfolio is generally very good. We have, for
example, been successful in incorporating gender as a generic feature (see Box 9). On the
other hand, efforts to reduce chronic delays in audits and in administrative processes have
been less effective; we intend to renew our efforts on these fronts with the new
government and the active participation of the local Financial Management Specialist.
The portfolio was reviewed before the change in government and another review will take
place in mid-2000. The most serious constraint facing implementation at present is the
lack of counterpart funds and the ceiling on public debt, issues which cannot be resolved
until the 2001 budget when we expect that we may have to reduce programs through
partial cancellations. Some $ 900 million of infrastructure investment loans are being
held up for lack of budget authority. The Bank continues to carry out selective
procurement audits, facilitated by the local Procurement Specialist, and we are working

s The latest progress report to the Board on Yacyreta was discussed at an informal seminar on January 28,
2000.

27

with the new administration on integrating project accounts with the federal financial
management system.

Box 9: Integrating Gender into the Portfolio

Our approach has been to integrate gender dimensions into the ongoing portfolio and new operations. To lay the basis
for this, a gender review of the portfolio was undertaken in FY 99 to assess where there were undiscovered opportunities
and synergies to include gender: this sector-by-sector perspective opened new doors with local authorities and Bank
staff who were keen to see more and better gender consideration in Bank-financed projects. So illuminating was this
analysis that we published it as a separate book, with 3000 copies already distributed and a reprint on order. A local
Gender NGO Consultative Group was fonned, consisting of 22 project managers, govemment officials, NGOs and other
donors. In addition, a Japanese PHRD grant was approved to support project-level actions, such as training for
government staff, workshops on what works in projects and what needs to be improved, and generally to lend a helping
hand to project and Bank staff who want to equip themselves to handle gender concems. Several staff have also taken
up the offer of support include gender analysis in new operations - e.g. the proposed Catamarca Provincial Reform
operation-and ongoing operations-e.g. the Municipal Development II project. Our gender work has generated
enthusiasm to do more: one of the by-products is the preparation of a LIL to support a Family Capacity Building project
for possible Bank financing in FY01.

Client Survey and Feedback

82. In order to obtain feedback on our performance and the Bank's program, a survey
was undertaken in June-July 1999 and some 70 responses were received, about the same
response as the first survey as part of the Bank's pilot program in 1997. While the
questions are not strictly comparable, the general conclusions are similar: the Bank is
seen as a reliable partner, especially in terms of delivering on commitments and
disbursements. However, there is a significant gap between our perceived effectiveness in
the importance of doing that-high. We are seen as being
reducing poverty-low-and 
somewhat more effective in delivering on economic growth. Respondents placed the
greatest importance on realism, given Argentina's situation and constraints, and also rated
the Bank as most effective in that area, even if there is room for improvement.

83. Interviews supplemented the questionnaire. Responses revealed a generally positive
image for the Bank and an appreciation of the significant contributions being made,
ranging from provincial reforms to infrastructure and improvement in animal health. Our
presence in the area of poverty was cited as being strong. Respondents also noted the
need to differentiate more on a regional basis. Differences showed up on the role of civil
society and the Bank's effort to promote participation. There were also differences on our
role with respect to support for the private sector versus the public sector, and few saw
results from our efforts to improve public sector institutional capacity. Availability of
information was a concern, as was excessive bureaucratization of project implementation
and use of consultants. As part of the feedback process, we also conducted an extensive
process of public consultations that helped us to appreciate the concerns of civil society
and their expectations of the Bank Group (see Box 10).

28

Box 10: The Consultative Process

In September 1999, we met with our Argentina NGO working group, which consists of about 30 NGOs-mainly
networks-to explain the CAS and to agree on a consultative process. It was decided that there would be meetings in
the four main geographic regions (North East, North West, Central, plus Patagonia/South) as well as in the capital,
Buenos Aires, capped by a national consultation. In anticipation of the meetings, we prepared a brief summary of all of
the4projects supported by the Bank and a series of 26 policy notes, ranging from poverty and voices to the poor, to
climate change and banking. These notes were based on the Bank's on-going and recently completed economic and
sector work, operational experience and the poverty assessment. The 26 notes were not meant to be comprehensive nor
exhaustive but, in a concise and simple way, to synthesize the Bank's work and experience in Argentina. They can be
found on the Bank's web page-www.worldbank.org-then selecting regions (LAC), choosing Argentina, and going
to CASlink. The documents were provided to all the new authorities at the federal and provincial levels and other key
parties, and shared with the organizers and participants at the meetings.

Invitations were sent to unions, joumalists, academics, local authorities, politicians, NGOs, community organizations
and churches. In each province, there was a meeting to prepare for the regional consultations. At the regional and
national meetings, the discussions were organized in separate 10 workshops with plenary session at the end. The
format was for the groups to review and discuss the documents in workshops and then to share their reactions and
recommendations with us in the plenary session. In total, about 4500 persons participated, with about 2000 attending
the regional and national meetings. For many, this was the first chance ever to have information on the Bank's
activities in Argentina. The national consultation was inaugurated by the Vice President of the Nation.

IFC participated in most of the regional meetings as well as the national meeting, and separately consulted with private
sector firms, banks, public officials, academics and associations. These meetings helped to validate our understanding
of the main priorities for private sector development-education being at the top, along with access to capital,
institutional improvements, corporate govemance-as well as the main opportunities-tourism, information
technology, exports, agro-business and adding value to other natural resource based industries.

The inputs were many and varied. Not all agreed with the Bank. We received substantive suggestions and
recommendations, combined with general observations on how to improve the Bank's effectiveness in Argentina. On
the latter, there were four common reactions: the need to make projects more participatory, the need to have closer
monitoring and more transparency; the need to integrate activities on the ground; and the need to differentiate among
regions. Our commitment to the participants is that we will return to them, once the CAS has been finalized, with a
response on how and why we were able to incorporate their suggestions and if not, why not. We have also agreed to
continue the consultative process as the CAS is implemented.

Sector Perspectives on Performance

84. Social Protection has been the area of considerable innovation and achievement in
terns of poverty alleviation during the last CAS period. There have been notable results
with the Bank-financed TRABA JAR program, not only for its effective targeting and rapid
response, but the use of evaluation techniques. Another innovative program has been the
exchange of federal-provincial data as part of the Social and Tax Registry Project
(SINTyS). This is turning out to be a very effective tool to reduce fraud and evasion. So
far, with minimum investment in the system, savings or new revenues of some $ 50
million have been identified. The Social Investment Fund (FOPAR) pioneered
participatory, community led development, and work on social and poverty analysis under
SIEMPRO (Social Protection I and IV projects) has enabled access to comprehensive
information on social programs and beneficiary incidence for the first time. Finally, the
Integrated Drug Prevention Pilot LIL aims at obtaining an accurate picture of drug use
and strategies for drug prevention, a growing problem especially among the poor.

29

85. Progress in education has been slower than hoped, due to resistance to change, long
standing complaints over teacher salaries, and weak institutional capacities. Bank
assistance has focused on secondary education with the First, Second and Third
Secondary Education Projects providing support for programs reaching about one-third of
secondary school students. The Bank's support for curriculum development, evaluation of
the students, information system, training of the education administrators, and
administrative reform is seen as having advanced most in the area of student evaluation
and new administrative rules, as well as equipping poor schools. In order to get input
from civil society on how well these programs have been doing, we propose to use
"social" auditing, as suggested during the CAS consultations, in the evaluation of the First
Secondary Education project.

86. Through AAA, the Bank initiated a policy dialogue on improving the quality of
teaching, examining teachers' salaries and options for upgrading teacher training and
careers, with appropriate incentives, but the results in terms of actions have so far been
disappointing. The Bank's Higher Education Reform Loan sought to enhance the quality
of higher education and alter the funding mechanism but has been less than successful on
inducing fundamental change due to major opposition. A strategy to increase private
sector financing for public universities was worked out with the previous administration
under the SSAL; however, there is no consensus on what concrete steps might be taken.
IFC has innovated with two investments in private universities, as enrollment in private
universities in still low in Argentina and the demand expanding rapidly. For its part, the
IDB is supporting reformns at the primary level, as well as enhancing retention efforts
through a scholarship program for poor students.

87. The Bank's program in Argentina in health is diversified and shows promise but is
complex in terms of implementation and there is still much more to do. The Bank was an
early partner in the Maternal-Child Health and Nutrition project (PROMIN) in 1993. The
reduction of infant mortality rates has been notable, in part the result of PROMIN's
success in putting this issue on the agenda, and by upgrading the capacity of primary
clinics in poor communities. The project helped to introduce monitoring child
development, targeting food supplements and converting day-care to early child
development centers. While there were successes (final evaluation is still pending), the
first operation has fallen short in changing nutrition policies, instilling a monitoring and
evaluation culture, and expanding reproductive health services. Moreover, there is still a
large population unserved, including some of the poorest. The first stage of health
insurance reform supported by the Bank was mostly successful-except for the reform of
the retirees health fund-- yet this is only the beginning. In other areas, the AIDS and STD
Control Project finances HIV/AIDS- and STD-related health promotion and disease
prevention, a new operation to support Disease Surveillance and Prevention and a LIL for
Health Insurance for the Uninsured are at an early stage of implementation.

88. Provincial Reform. The Bank has had major involvement with the provinces since
the early 1990s and there are considerable signs of progress on the structural side.
Through these efforts:

30

* 13 provincial banks and 22 other loss making major public enterprises were
privatized during the period 1995-99;
* all nrovinces have initiated programs, and some are well advanced, in improving their
ta- .ollection systems (cadasters, etc), fiscal management and budgeting systems;
* all provinces have entered into fiscal agreements (pactosfiscales) with the Federal
Government to change distortionary provincial taxes and there is an active dialogue,
facilitated by the Bank and in collaboration with the Fund, on further reform of the
federal-provincial tax sharing regime and provincial tax systems (co-participation);
* all provinces are engaged in the national program to improve the quality of secondary
education and support is being provided to improve the management of some
provincial public hospitals; and
* all provinces prepare annual investment and fiscal plans, and each year the Bank
conducts a review of provincial finances and uses financial criteria to determine
eligibility by the provinces to funds for capital investments; the only exceptions are
for social sector and for flood protection (in the Northeast, subject to recurring floods
that cost Argentina as much as lpercent of GDP in losses).

89. Under the Second Provincial Reform Loans approved in 1997, the Bank has been
working with four poorly performing provinces. These provinces had undertaken a first
round of reforms (e.g., bank privatization) and needed further reform of their finances as
well as health and education. In one case--Salta-- the program was very successful; in
another case--Tucuman-there was a successful outcome but questions remain on
sustainability; and in two other cases-Rio Negro and San Juan-- the programs are
continuing but with considerable difficulties, mainly because of the economic
deterioration and elections in 1999. Nevertheless, during the 1996-98 period, the PRL
provinces were able to show a 33 percent improvement in own-revenue collection, an
increase of 93 percent in current savings, compared to a nine percent decline in other
provinces, and an increase in debt stocks of only two percent, compared to 19 percent in
other provinces. Emerging lessons suggest that a direct relation with the provinces is
important to bring international experience and to mediate between federal and provincial
stakeholders. Putting the governors at the forefront also has helped to improve project
performance more generally.

90. Argentina's transformation of infrastructure provides an excellent example of
cooperation between IBRD and IFC, with each institution performing the role in which it
has comparative advantage (see Box 1 1). Bank financing, moreover, has been critical in
introducing a novel way of public-private maintenance contracting, under the National
Highway and Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation projects. This contracting
mechanism is now being replicated and has won a professional award for the Bank staff
and government officials who helped develop the system. There are other innovations:
for example, the use of public consultations under the Buenos Aires Urban Transport
Project and showing the viability of private investment in smaller communities as well as
how to correct mistakes regarding the impact of privatization on the poor, under the recent
Water Sector Reform Loan. In the case of the Flood Rehabilitation and Prevention
projects, they were successful in preventing the repeat of economic loses of close to $ I

31

billion in the latest flood (1997/98), piloting a successful low-cost, self-help housing
construction program and introducing land use regulations for flood zones.

Box 11: EBRD-IFC-MIGA COLLABORATION

Argentina represents one of the leading examples of collaboration among the WBG institutions and of the impact that
these institutions can have working together. In most cases, the collaboration has been sequential: IBRD providing
support for up-front reforms that set up the regulatory and policy framework for private participation, and IFC or
MIGA following with private investments which demonstrate the viability of such participation. In other cases, the
involvement was concurrent.

This represents a significant shift in strategy especially on the side of the Bank since the 1970s and 1980s when IBRD
financed public enterprises in the same sectors in which IFC has investments today and when IBRD financed lines of
credits for SMEs through publicly owned development banks. Since an attempt to. support capital market development
in the early 1990s failed, the Bank's attention has been directed to policy and institutional questions, addressing legal
and regulatory issues, banking supervision, and regulation, mainly under the recently completed Capital Market
Technical Assistance project and the SSAL, plus a dedicated training program for water sector regulators with the WBI
and a local university. IBRD's only recent direct support for the private sector has been a pilot cost-shared Export
Promotion Program with SMEs, PREX, which has been fully disbursed and is being evaluated, and the cost-sharing
scheme to reduce industrial pollution in two areas, under the on-going Pollution Management project.

IBRD and IFC are closely involved in Argentina's reform of infrastructure, the financial sector, provincial development
and the social sectors. The transformation of infrastructure provides a good exarnple of working in sequence. IBRD
provided support for reform, sector studies, and technical assistance which were critical to providing an appropriate
setting. IFC advised on financial structuring and mobilized private financing for the first private investments in a
number of sub-sectors-power, water and sanitation, and railway networks. In the financial sector, IBRD's assistance
helped to strengthen the banking sector, and was followed by a number of IFC and MIGA operations. IBRD's
assistance for capital market development, particularly pension regulations, was also followed by IFC investment in a
private pension fund. Examples of concurrent involvement are found in the social sectors and provincial development.
IBRD's support is ongoing for both health and education, where IFC has already begun making investments in private
providers of social services. In the area of provincial development, IFC and IBRD are working together on an initiative
supporting economic development in Tucuman. IFC's support consists of a project preparation facility for firms in that
provinces as well as a line of credit in the Northwest region. Looking forward, collaboration is increasing in the areas
of improving productivity and creating employment and the improved delivery of social services. IBRD and IFC will
continue to work closely on the financial sector and SMEs. For example, IBRD's support for introducing an
appropriate legal and tax framework for leasing would be followed by IFC support for leasing companies. In
infrastructure, possible collaboration includes support for urban transport, and provincial private infrastructure.

Collaboration with MIGA is also increasing: MIGA has recently participated in the CAS consultations with the private
sector, and is expected to play an increasing role in catalyzing foreign investment with risk enhancement products. In
addition, IFC and MIGA are jointly assessing a possible risk management facility to serve private sector firms in the
Region, including those in Argentina. The increasing collaboration is supported by the country office in Buenos Aires,
which is co-located by IBRD and IFC, with the IFC office also serving as a representative office for MIGA.

91. Natural resource management and environmental concerns have been addressed
mainly through small, pilot programs, often including a mix of GEF and Bank support.
While the pilots themselves may be successful or promising, overall change has been
limited and we have not attempted any broad institutional reforms, an effort instead led by
IDB. There are several good examples of pilots: the on-going Native Forests and Bio-
Diversity project; the pilot program for managing industrial pollution which focuses on
the partnering of small and large firms; and out-reach activities sensitizing local
authorities to the issues of flooding and disaster management, air quality, and hazard
waste management in partnership with WBI. The Small Farmer project is addressing the
needs of poor farmers to access technology and increase production but is hampered by

32

budget limitations, while the Provincial Agricultural project addresses the need for
improved management of water resources for irrigation, as well as rural roads and
provincial institutional capacities. We expect to have a significant impact on commercial
forestry: the Forestry project aims to develop appropriate management for sustainable
commnercial forestry activities, one of Argentina's growth areas. The Bank's support for
developing environmental capacities at the provincial level in the area of mining, under
the two Mining Technical Assistance Projects, has been particularly noteworthy in terms
of being able to establish the context for this industry to take off in Argentina.

92. Private Sector Development. IFC has similarly been active in Argentina, with
support for infrastructure, exports, corporate restructuring, financial intermediation, and
recently health and education, as well as providing crucial support during the last two
external shocks. It has a track record of financing projects in new and difficult sectors
(many being the first in emerging markets), such as water and sanitation, railways, health
care, and education. Recently, IFC approved a secondary mortgage securities market
project which is the first large-scale housing finance operation and which attracted
widespread attention in the financial community, and a liquidity backstop facility for
middle-market firms. In tum, IFC benefits from the partnership with Argentina by being
able to transfer knowledge to the rest of the world. MIGA has been active too, bringing to
the private sector its specialized services, as highlighted below (see Box 12).

93. Because of Argentina's vulnerability to extemal shocks, the IFC has played an
important role during these episodes. During 1997-1999, IFC provided US$1.4 billion
(including syndication) -- the largest amount among official sources of finance to the
private sector. IFC support has been critical because Argentina does not have a large
official source of term finance, as distinct from Brazil. Term finance for the private sector
is still minimal and the public sector's financing needs tend to dominate domestic financial
markets. Relative to external private sources, IFC's advantage has been: (i) its willingness
to invest even when international markets are reluctant; (ii) its long-term experience in
Argentina and in particular supporting new, difficult sectors; and (iii) its willingness to
finance middle market firms.

94. IFC's program in Argentina has been making a strong impact both in aggregate value
and in specific sectors. Investments have followed the priorities set prior to this CAS,
namely, export-oriented industries, financial sector development, middle market firms,
infrastructure and social services. Overall, IFC's portfolio is of high quality and has
managed to withstand the difficulties experienced over the last 18 months. As of February
2000, only 7.4 percent of the loan portfolio was in non-accrual status and the interest
collection rate was a good 91.9 percent. These indicators compare favorably with the
non-accrual rate of 11.4 percent and interest collection rate of 89 percent for the total IFC
portfolio. This is notable, as many investments in Argentina tend to be in frontier sectors,
and are often globalfirsts for IFC whose pioneering aspects can be replicated.

33

Box 12: MIGA's ACTIVITIES

Argentina is the second largest host country for MIGA insured investments and it accounts for 11.1 percent of MIGA's
total Gross Exposure. Operations are highly concentrated in the financial sector, which accounts for 76 percent of
MIGA's exposure in Argentina. The remaining is in infrastructure (2.2%), mining (3.6%), oil and gas (17%), and
services (2.7%). Between FY 92 and March 2000, MIGA has issued 28 guarantees for US$ 747 million. As of March
31, 2000, MIGA's outstanding portfolio consisted of 20 contracts with US$457 million gross exposure, of which
MIGA's net exposure is US$229 million. The total amount of foreign direct investment facilitated to date in Argentina
is close to US$3 billion. In addition, MIGA has insured another US $ 62 million through its Cooperative Underwriting
Program (CUP). The total amount of foreign direct investment facilitated to date by MIGA is close to US$ 3 billion.
Taking into consideration its Treaty Reinsurance Agreement, MIGA's guarantee limit for Argentina is US$620 million,
and its per project limit is US$200 million. However, through its Cooperative Underwriting Program and facultative
reinsurance, MIGA could raise substantial additional capacity in the private market.

SUPPORT FOR THE FINANcIAL SECTOR: MIGA has insured 13 operation in the financial sector for a total coverage of
US$561 million. Currently, there are ten active contracts. Gross exposure in the financial sector amounts to US$ 404
million including US$ 45 million under the CUP program: US$270 million is in general banking, US$90 million in
leasing and US$43 million in mortgages. By insuring leasing operations, a local subsidiaiy has been established to
provide support to food, agri-business, and healthcare industries; financial services include leasing, factoring, and field
warehousing, and commercial services are for export, infrastructure, and transaction cycles. The latest guarantee was'
to finance long-term leasing of moveable equipment, focusing on SMEs in the agri-business and financial sectors. In
the mortgage industry, MIGA has four active operations; one on middle income housing. The last mortgage operation
was a guarantee of US$100 million to a company offering 30 year mortgages at 9.5 percent financing, excluding fees.

PROMOTING 
INvEsTMENrT MIGA's investment marketing services have been active in Argentina. Local authorities are
being assisted in improving the framework for attracting Foreign Direct Investment, and more than 80 Argentine
organizations use IPAnet. IPAnet harnesses the information resources of the Internet to exchange information about
investments worldwide. In FY 99, MIGA conducted two workshops on best practices in attracting FDI, one in Mar del
Plata and the other in Mendoza. The workshops focused on strategy, building partnerships, and techniques for effective
investment promotion. This was the first time that MIGA had offered this service to provincial governments.

Renewing the Country Strategy

95. Given the continuing challenges faced by Argentina and progress by the Bank in
supporting past efforts, the proposed Bank Group Strategy for FY 01-04 builds on the
strengths of the existing program (see Box 13). It would continue to focus on insuring
that the poor share in development and promoting equitable, sustained growth. IBRD's
last CAS set three main priorities that we propose to renew: (i) enhancing social
development, including poverty alleviation and hum.an resource development; (ii)
improving the public sector's performance and institutional capacity, particularly at sub-
national levels; and (iii) consolidating structural reforms, including public finance, labor
markets and the financial sector. IFC's focus would be closely aligned with that of the
Bank and include: improving access to investment financing for companies that will
create growth and employment, supporting activity which demonstrates the tangible
benefits of growth and reform, and supporting frontier activities which could be replicated
in other countries. MIGA would support the strategy with its guarantee and investment
promotion services.

34

Box 13: OED's Country Evaluation Update

A Country Assistance Evaluation (CAE), updating the 1996 Country Assistance Review, was completed in May 2000.
It concluded that the Bank's financial assistance to Argentina during the 1990's was arnong the best Bank-wide and
represented a drarnatic improvement over the past. In addition, the Bank support was very cost-effective in terms of
both costs per project and per amount committed. Overall outcome was rated satisfactory, and institutional
development impact as substantial in some areas. While project sustainability was rated at 98 percent for that part of
the portfolio already evaluated, there was concem given the vulnerability of the economy to external shocks and the
need to improve on poverty levels and income distribution. Based on these vulnerabilities, the report indicated an
important role remaining for the Bank, particularly for financial transfers during the times of crisis. The report
indicated that consideration of graduating the country was premature despite the high level of per capita income and
recommended a gradual withdrawal as vulnerability declines. It questioned the value-added of traditional ESW, but
recognized that it is vitally important for the Bank to maintain a minimum knowledge base. The CAE suggested that
ESW should increasingly be in the form of short policy notes to assist in deliberations with the authorities and engage
the broader society in dialogue and in a process of "leaming together". It also suggested that specific technical
assistance and specialized advice can be highly valuable. Finally, it recommended that the future program concentrate
cven more on social sectors and provincial reform, and not to neglect the reforn of federal institutions.

Exposure, Net Flows

96. IFC's exposure in Argentina is currently the largest in terrns of net disbursed portfolio
and the second largest in terms of net held portfolio. As of February 2000, the net
disbursed portfolio in Argentina amounted to US$1.1 billion, accounting for 11.4 percent
of the total portfolio and 17.9 percent of IFC's net worth. IFC's policy guidelines for
single-country exposure are 12 percent of net portfolio (held or disbursed) and 25 percent
of net worth (disbursed). The present exposure is close to the lower of these two
guidelines on a disbursed basis, although considerably below that limit on a committed
basis, only 9.8 percent of the total held portfolio. Exposure is expected to be under 12
percent by end FY00.

97. MIGA also has exposure issues and it will be facing capacity constraints in Argentina
in the next few years with only about $ 170 million remaining in gross capacity. Taking
into consideration its Treaty Reinsurance Agreement, MIGA's guarantee limit for
Argentina in US$260 million, and its per project limit is US$ 200 million. However,
through its Cooperative Underwriting program (CUP) and facultative reinsurance, MIGA
could raise substantial additional capacity in the private market.

98. On the other hand, the Bank's exposure with Argentina at 7 percent is within the
notional limit of 10 percent for a single country. The Bank is also well within exposure
limits in terms of the Bank's share of Argentina's debt and debt service. In the short-term,
repayment of the SSAL, concentrated in CY 2003 and 2004, would reduce exposure by
less than two percentage points. Reduction in the Bank's lending needs to take into
account the potentially negative consequences of an abrupt decline in net flows over the
short term, increasing Argentina's needs to access external private markets during a
potentially difficult period.

Selectivity in Setting Priorities

99. Preparation of this CAS has been subject to two main considerations. First,
Argentina is a good client and has progressed rapidly but there is still much to do.

35

Argentina's vulnerability is a continuing concern and it has a ways to go in terns of
improving ratios on debt, debt-to-exports, and current account deficits; its capital markets
remain underdeveloped as does credit. Moreover, social indicators lag seriously in some
areas. The second consideration is that its income levels place it in a category where
eventual graduation from IBRD has to be anticipated. This is compounded by fiscal
restraints at both the federal and provincial levels that limit the amount of counterpart
funds and public debt.

100. These considerations point to a smaller program focused on reducing vulnerability
and addressing unresolved social and economic problems including regional economic
disparities. This calls for selectivity. For IBRD, the proposed program, in contrast to the
past, reduces our involvement in some infrastructure sub-sectors, such as transport, where
public budget, the private sector and IDB can take a leading role albeit expanding in other
sectors such as urban services for the poor (see paras. 122-123 for discussion of
comparative role of IDB in Argentina). It reduces our effort in areas such as higher
education where the policy divergence is still large and judicial reform where progress has
been slow. IBRD would by and large leave direct support to the private sector, including
SMEs, to IFC and MIGA, while continuing to address policy and institutional questions.
In light of both IFC's and MIGA's country exposure, selectivity will be crucial in order to
maximize support to meeting Argentina's development challenges. The main priorities
for the proposed FY 0 1-04 program are set out below.

101. Consolidating Macroeconomic Reforms. The Bank Group has been an active
supporter of Argentina's reform effort. This will continue to be the case, albeit at a less
intense level in terms of lending but with the continued monitoring of compliance under
the SSAL (third and final tranche yet to be disbursed) and monitoring of the financial
sector. Because of Argentina's vulnerability to external shocks, the Bank Group would
remain ready to assist during such shocks, provided there is agreement on continued
policy reforms. Being abreast of economic conditions and assessing progress in policy
reform, therefore, remain a key part of the proposed program. Provincial reform,
described below, is proposed as the main operational focus.

102. Managing Social Risks. Argentina's vulnerability and the need to improve
selected social indicators point to a strong presence in the area of managing social risks.
The Bank's past efforts have focused on introducing new social programs during time of
economic stress, such as TRABAJAR, or addressing particular needs, such as the LIL for
Drug Prevention. The next phase of support will take this approach further by developing
an explicit social risk management framework and working toward program consolidation
and simplification, an area highlighted during our CAS consultations. Work has already
started on identifying vulnerable groups (Table 4). A registry of beneficiaries, developed
with IDB support, has been piloted and supported under the SSAL.: Government
commitment to consolidation and simplification of its social programs should enable them
to enhance the efficiency and effectiveness of social expenditures. As such, agreement in
this area could lead to including policy/program changes in a reform operation under a
high case scenario. This will also respond to the concerns for better monitoring and
transparency.

36

103. The intention is also to continue to help improve the cost-effectiveness and
targeting of Argentina's social programs, notably through AAA to evaluate nutrition and
job training, identify high priority social programs for times of economic crisis with
particular attention to gender dimensions, and assess institutional capacities in the social
sectors. We are also exploring ways, through AAA, in which the concept of social capital
can be used to enhance program effectiveness, particularly for community development.

104. Concomitantly, the goal is to continue to support the design and implementation
of innovative programs, through TA and investment lending, that address the specific
needs of particular vulnerable groups and/or demonstrate effective ways of delivery. As
identified in the poverty assessment and gender analyses,family capacity development is
one of these areas and we are proposing a LIL for a pilot program. In addition, the rural
poor have largely been ignored. The ongoing nationwide Small Farmer Project

(PROINDER) and a LIL with Indigenous Peoples (expected to be approved in June 2000)

could be followed up with more regionally focused efforts and complemented by support
for infrastructure. The need to include indigenous peoples in our program was clearly
expressed during the CAS consultations. In the Voices of the Poor, infrastructure was
cited as one of the major needs of the rural poor.

Table 4: Managing Social Risk in Argentina: Main Risks and Policy Responses

Age group/ 
Main Risk 

Role for Other 
Programs 

Role for Social Protection 

0-5 
Stunted development 

PHC Services 
Pre-school education 

6-14 
Low education quality 
15-24 
Low secondary school 
completion 

Improve primary
school quality
Improve secondary 
school access/quality 

25-64 
Labor-intensive 
Low income 
growth and labor 
(unemployment/under market reforms 
employment)
65 and Over 
Low income 

General Population 
Low access to/quality of 
health care

Low housing quality 

Provision of health 
services. 

Mortgage facilities, 
infrastructure 
investment

Note: "hh" means households.

Social Insurance 

Social Assistance
Early Child 
Development 
Programs (ECD)

Number of
Indigent & Poor
Not Covered

400,000 ind.
1,000,000 poor

Scholarship/Retum to
school incentive 
programs 

100,000 ind.
400,000 poor

Workfare/income 
transfers 

800,000 ind.
3,750,000 poor

Non-contributory 
pensions (income 
transfer)

24,000 ind.
200,000 poor

1,700,000 ind.
6,000,000 poor

Housing subsidies 

200,000 hh.ind.
800,000 hh. Poor

Unemployment
insurance 

Social security 
(contributory 
pensions) 
Health insurance 

37

105. Education. Education stands at the center of Argentina's effort to reduce poverty
and the Bank's ongoing support has focused on equity and reform of secondary education.
These programs need to continue and further support is proposed for the Province of
Buenos Aires with another investment loan. The focus on Buenos Aires is justified
because of the number of students and its good implementation record. Since most
provinces badly need to enhance the efficiency of their education spending, this area will
be pursued through provincial reform operations; these will also pilot efforts to grant more
autonomy to the school level and alter the ways education budgets are constructed. The
demand for investments in secondary education, nevertheless, remains very large: the
new administration is launching an initiative to strengthen some 6,000 poor schools at a
total cost of $600-900 million. The IDB is discussing a possible project and there may be
an opportunity for parallel investment lending by the Bank.

106. Supporting the objective of stimulating private initiatives in education and
improving the relevance and efficiency of higher education, IFC has financed two private
universities and expects more opportunities in this area. We also expect to follow up our
work on higher education with AAA for the time being, notably on the continuing effort
to make higher education more diverse, more relevant and more equitable. As a first step,
AAA will examine how best to address the needs of youths and adults, who may have
dropped out of school, to help us to understand the role and needs of informal education, a
high priority expressed during the CAS consultations.

107. Health. The Bank has played a major role in supporting efforts to reform health
care. These efforts show promise but are still partial. At this juncture, we are renewing
our consensus with the Federal Government and the provinces and developing a more
integrated approach. A key priority is working on ways to integrate the system, especially
primary care and maternal-child health services. Attention also needs to be paid to
renewing the reform effort started in 1995 on health insurance, including further
consolidation and reform of provincial insurance funds, opening competition with other
Obras and private insurance funds. Agreement with the Government on these issues could
form the basis for policy change to be included in a reform operation under a high case
lending scenario. These efforts would also be supported in the provincial reform
operations. Similarly, the Bank's support for the development of insurance for the
uninsured is being jointly pursued through the provincial reform operations and the recent
LIL for Health Insurance for the Uninsured Poor. In support of the objective to improve
quality and cost effectiveness, IFC has financed a private hospital in Cordoba, which was
the first health sector investment in the region. As noted above, IDB is supporting
primary care and there is opportunity for us to work together on an integrated health
investment program.

108. 
Infrastructure. Despite important advances in this area, infrastructure remains
underdeveloped and a sustainable approach to financing future investments is urgently
required. However, the fiscal situation constrains public investment while private sector
participation, which worked well in regards to concessioning, may need a different
approach as the amounts and risks associated with greenfield operations are higher. It
may be that there is now an opportunity to pursue Bank lending and/or guarantees, along

38

with MIGA for example, or some other mix of public-private financing. AAA will help
us to assess the situation and devise an appropriate strategy which we could then support.
IFC's initiatives will focus on frontier areas-projects in more difficult sub-sectors (e.g.,
urban transport), innovative credit enhancement transactions, and sub-sovereign
infrastructure. Future concessions will have to address explicitly the issues of
transparency, equity especially service to the poor, compliance and investment by the
concessionaires, and tariffs levels.

109. Water resource management, based on recent Bank analytical work, has emerged
as an area requiring significant attention, both to reduce costs and to curb degradation.
Needs cover water supply and sanitation, ground water management, flood control,
drainage, and irrigation and we envisage future support to focus initially on institutional
capacity building, including development of tradable water rights with incentives towards
efficient and sustainable water use, and a watershed approach integrating management of
water, soils and cultivation. Other areas include privatization and modernization of
irrigation and urban drainage which could be supported with investment lending.

110. Potential exists to do more for the urban and rural poor. However, the Bank has
not been involved in low cost housing since the early 1990s, when an operation with
FONAVI was cancelled for poor performance after 10 percent of the loan was disbursed.
In the meantime, IFC and MIGA have helped to develop the market for housing
mortgages; IDB has provided support for slum upgrading (its barrios program); and our
Flood Rehabilitation and Protection projects have used a highly successful voucher, self-
help system. Both these latter programs could be expanded if FONAVI were restructured
as the needs are considerable.

111. On municipal services, the Bank and IDB have been mainly helping with
institutional improvements and investments in urban streets-in the IDB's case, in the
larger metropolitan areas, and in the Bank's, in selected smaller municipalities with
reasonable success but on a limited scale. In order to gauge if and how to gear up these
activities, we propose to undertake a comprehensive review of the delivery of municipal
services and municipal finances. Building on that work, an urban infrastructure
investment project could focus on slum-upgrading, improvement of urban services for the
poor, and urban transport and traffic management programs. Similarly, following AAA,
an investment project targeting the needs of rural infrastructure (wells, road access,
drainage, community services, etc) could be part of the programn. As expressed during the
CAS consultations, these programs should be regionally shaped and locally implemented.

112. Environment and Sustainable Development. The Bank has been working on a
variety of environmental concerns, ranging from ozone depletion, fisheries management,
coastal contamination, marine management, commercial forestry, mining, native forests
and national parks, providing both Bank loans and GEF grants and support via an IDF
grant. We will continue to seek out opportunities to address particular "hot-spots" such as
mining contamination and other hazardous wastes with a possible investment loan, to
exploit synergies between sustainable development and infrastructure, particularly in the
area of water resource management, and to expand the use of GEF grants as a

39

complement to national programs and to innovate on global issues. Our continued support
will be important in the area of sustainable management fisheries and maritime resources,
as strongly advocated during the CAS consultations. We also plan to pursue the issue of
crop/disaster insurance with AAA as a complement to our work on flood prevention.

113. Governance. The new administration is expected to bring about several changes
and enhanced public ethics, transparency and accountability are now in the forefront.
Admittedly, more needs to be done in the judiciary, especially on appropriate
infrastructure, judicial independence, legal registries and legal training but this area has
been slow to change and our efforts under the ongoing Model Court Development project
have not yet produced concrete results. On the other hand, a recent review of federal
procurement, access to information, and the govermment's investigative capacity has
identified actions that could be included in an anti-corruption program. We are embarking
on a Procurement Assessment with the Government's full support, and anticipate that
there will be interest in putting this into action. In the past we have supported public
sector modernization and the new administration has asked that we support the design and
implementation of a performance based management system for the federal government,
with complete transparency. Instead of a new loan, we propose to restructure the ongoing
Y2K Technical Assistance loan which ultimately proved not to be needed. For its part, the
IDB is preparing an operation for enhancing personal security with activities in crime
prevention and domestic violence.

114. Private Sector Development. The Bank Group's strategy in this area has
focused on enhancing the framework for private sector development, helping to enhance
access to credit, capital market development, and removing impediments in infrastructure,
labor markets, and the judicial system. In line with this overall approach, IFC is giving
priority to frontier sectors which could be replicated in other countries (see more details in
the PSS), including the following: (i) help develop domestic financial markets to broaden
and deepen intermediation; (ii) help develop private provision of social services; (iii)
support private infrastructure in frontier areas, and/or less developed provinces; (iv)
support companies that lack access to term financing, mainly middle market firms and
SMEs; (v) help develop innovative risk enhancement, structured finance to improve
access by firms to external capital and reduce financing costs; and (vi) support potential
growth areas, such as information technology. IFC's strategy is conditioned by several
factors. First, external shocks have amplified differences in access to financing between
blue chip and middle-market firms/SMEs. Second, demonstration that the benefits of
reform (such as growth in employment and wages, and increased access to social services)
can be broadly shared is needed in order to sustain support. Third, as a consequence of
rapid implementation of the country strategy, IFC's portfolio is approaching the lower of
its two single country exposure guidelines.

115. 
In the coming years, MIGA plans to diversify activities in Argentina in order to
reduce exposure in the financial sector. Nonetheless, it plans to continue activities in that
sector given the country's needs, especially focusing on SMEs and housing finance, and
potentially for the health sector. MIGA is planning to be active in areas such as water and
sanitation, power, transport, manufacturing and others, consistent with the CAS
objectives. Investors have expressed interest in coverage for banking, oil and gas, real

40

estate, and infrastructure. In addition, MIGA will seek to support Argentinean
investments in other developing countries, both through its guarantee program and
IPAnet. Investment marketing services will continue to be provided to the provinces.

116. During the consultative process, support was expressed for more Bank Group
focus on regional economies and SMEs. Invariably, directed and subsidized credit was
suggested as the response. However, the Bank abandoned this approach in the late 1 980s,
in view of the failure of these operations and their negative impact on financial market
development in Argentina. At this point, we propose to look for more innovative ways to
support SMEs, beginning with analytical work on informality both from an economic and
social perspective. As noted above, IFC continues to support firms that are too small to
attract foreign capital; support for SMEs will more likely take the form of additional lines
with domestic financial intermediaries, such as leasing companies. The less developed
provinces have been one of IFC's priorities, and it has made available a project
development facility and credit line for SMEs in Tucuman. IFC is currently reviewing a
provincial water project in Santa Fe.

117. Provincial Reforms. An overarching issue for the provinces is the question of
federal-provincial revenue sharing. This is exceedingly complex and difficult to resolve
as no province wants to lose resources due to any change in the present arrangement
despite its flaws. We are renewing the efforts started under the SSAL on an acceptable
change in the system, and continue to offer technical support. We would consider
expanding our adjustment assistance to facilitate implementation once an agreement is
reached. In the meantime, the approach to provincial reform piloted under the Second
Provincial Reform loans (PRL II) is emerging as a powerful vehicle for promoting sector
reforms in health and education as well as fiscal sustainability. As such, they are
important complements to efforts in these areas at both the national and provincial levels.

118. 
It is proposed that this area constitute the mainstay of the Bank's program,
amounting to about 45 percent of the total. This constitutes the reactivation of the series
of provincial adjustment loans which were interrupted by the external shock in 1998-99.
The PRL II program has attracted the interest of provinces keen to embark on reforms at
the start of their new mandate The proposed Catamarca operation would be the first of
the next round. Additional candidates are Cordoba, the Province of Buenos Aires, and
Santa Fe, with other provinces to be considered later. These efforts would be directly
supporting reforms in provinces representing 60% of Argentina's poor (NBI measure).

119. At the same time, the multi-purpose Provincial Development Projects-the
second of which is almost fully committed-have constituted a useful vehicle for reaching
all of the provinces, and prompting institutional capacity and investments across a broad
range of areas. A third such investment project is proposed, with increased attention on
attaining core fiscal, administration capacities and accountability. Only those provinces
that are able to meet basic fiscal criteria are eligible for financing for new investments,
other than in the social sectors and flooding where social considerations are paramount.

120. As the reform agenda advances to the next level of government-the
municipalities-we propose to address this question, building on our on-going operation

41

and future analytical work. This could lead to an adjustment operation which could
provide support to selected provinces which have already undertaken substantial reform at
the provincial level or otherwise are in fiscal balance, to institute reforms of revenue-
sharing and fiscal/institutional relations between the respective province and its
municipalities. Given the large needs for supporting provincial and possible municipal
efforts, the Bank is seeking to increase its collaboration with the IDB.

Comparative Roles of Other Multilateral Institutions

121. International Monetary Fund. As highlighted earlier, an agreement on a three-
year, $7.4 billion Stand-By arrangement was approved in March 2000. The target 2000
deficit for the Federal Government is $ 4.7 billion (1.6 % of GDP) and there is an
indicative target deficit of $2.2 billion for the consolidated provincial governments, and a
binding incremental public sector debt target for both the provinces and the federal
governnent of $5.4 billion. Under the arrangement, the Government will have immediate
access to $ 1.4 billion but it is treating the new arrangement as precautionary. As in the
past, in the case of an emergency both institutions would be called to assist. Bank-Fund
collaboration has recently intensified on provincial finances. Staff have frequent
discussions on the provinces and decentralization in Argentina since the provinces have
been the major focus of our assistance program in recent years and are now an increasing
part of the Fund's. Fiscal conditions attached to our future provincial reforn loans will be
consistent with the Fund's program target. In the past, we have collaborated on other key
issues-notably labor reform and the financial sector.

122. Inter-American Development Bank. The IDB is a major partner with the Bank
in Argentina. There are numerous examples of sharing sectors and/or locations. The
main differences tend to be the Bank's access to global knowledge, analysis of policy
issues and active presence on global issues. At present, the Bank also has an advantage
providing quick-disbursing funds, especially with the provinces. On the other hand, IDB
practices regarding a broader definition of counterpart funding give the IDB a clear
advantage in investment lending in some cases. It also can finance small projects, using
local currency, and a broad mandate in areas such crime and violence; it has been
particularly innovative in the social sectors.

123. 
In lending to the private sector, IDB is a close second to IFC. IDB's lending has
been concentrated in infrastructure, whereas IFC financing is diversified across sectors
with a track record of financing projects in new and difficult sectors, such as water and
sanitation, railways, health care, education, and housing finance, where few other agencies
have developed experience. IFC is also able to finance middle market firms and credit
lines for these firms through the banking sector. IFC's main disadvantage is that, due to
country exposure constraints, its capacity in supporting large transactions is limited.

An Evolving Relationship

124. As Argentina's social and economic transformation has evolved, so has the role of
the Bank Group from the time when we were a vital part of the effort to stabilize and
restructure the economy to when our support can be increasingly targeted and focused on

42

vulnerable groups and those not yet benefiting from Argentina's new found stability and
economic growth. For this reason, the IBRD program is planned to be reduced from the
levels achieved during the 1 990s: for FY 00-04, the program would stand at $3 billion
(base case). This would be roughly half the average lent throughout the 1 990s.

125. This strategy recognizes that Argentina's transformation is not yet complete and
that it will take more time and effort to address a complex set of economic, institutional
and social issues. Some of these are part of the unfinished agenda from the 1990s and
others are part of the process of adapting to the global economy. But continued lending to
Argentina is only justified to the extent that the country is fully committed to addressing
these issues. Thus, concrete policy actions will play a role in the triggers, set out in Table
5, defining the high/base/low cases. Given the constraints of the Convertibility Plan,
strong economic management is essential. Should that waiver, the Bank response would
reduce its assistance to a low case lending scenario, consisting of social sector protection
activities while working to assist Argentina in rebuilding confidence and improving
performance. The amount of the low case would vary depending on when and if the
triggers come into play. On the other hand, a high case scenario of up to $500 million in
additional adjustment lending could be triggered by progress in sector reform efforts in
areas such as health insurance (para. 107), social protection (para. 102), pension reform or
reform in federal-provincial revenue-sharing (para. 117). The move to the high case
scenario would take into account progress made in addressing the issues of the unfinished
reform agenda, including progress towards a revenue-sharing arrangement, as well as the
scope and budgetary impact of the reforms that could be supported by the Bank. Given
Argentina's continued vulnerability to external shocks, we also plan to be ready to provide
special support, as in the past, in conjunction with other financial institutions.6

6 Possible scenarios (not developed in this CAS), include (i) an external shock that constrains Argentina's
ability to access the intemational fmancial markets, such as in 1995, and in 1998/99. If this should reoccur,

the Bank would take this as an opportunity to advance reforms and mitigate social costs. The IMF's

contingent credit facility would be expected to play a greater financial role in responding to such shocks; or
(ii) a very severe external shock, resulting in the abandonment of the Convertibility Plan under crisis
conditions, could create a wave of defaults and capital flight. In this instance, the Bank would refocus
mainly on social protection, restructuring of the economy, and the financial system. Such developments
would be reported to the Board in a CAS Progress Report.

43

Table 5: Program Triggers

Triggers Leading to High Case 

Base Case 

Triggers Leading to Low Case

Base Case triggers Plus: 

Macroeconomic framework 
acceptable to the Bank 

No major problems in counterpart financing at 
the provincial level and agreement on new 
revenue sharing arrangement in line with 
principles agreed under the SSAL or agreement 
on consolidation and simplification of social 
assistance programs, or agreement on deepening 
reform in health insurance, or agreement on 
further reform to the pension system. The move 
to the high case scenario would take into account
progress towards a revenue-sharing arrangement,
as well as the scope and budgetary impact of the
reforms.

Satisfactory portfolio 
performance. No major 
problems in counterpart 
financing plus specific triggers
for programs, e.g. reforms in
housing, public universities,
provincial-municipal revenue
sharing.

Significant deviation from the law of fiscal
responsibility and in managing extemal debt
(>55 percent of GDP) under conditions of
normal access to capital markets

Unsatisfactory portfolio performance as
indicated by more than 30 percent of the
portfolio with problems.

Satisfactory performance of 
Monitoring Indicators for 
Program 

Failure to progress in labor reform, co-
participation (ie continued discussions),
strengthening of social safety net (ie food
programs) and governance (ie transparency
and procurement)

126. 
The indicators selected to assess Argentina's progress in addressing its continuing
development challenges, as set out in Table 6, point to the direction that Argentina intends
to take and the goals that it hopes to realize over the medium term, namely, sustained
economic growth, reduced vulnerability, reversal in income and poverty indictors, and
becoming at par in critical social areas.

127. 
The period covered under this CAS-FY 01 -04--coincides with Argentina's
electoral cycle and will provide the next adrninistration the opportunity, jointly with the
Bank, to assess progress and redefine priorities and the role of the Bank accordingly.
Broadly speaking, these are also the indicators for gauging the continued relevance and
contribution made by the Bank and our performance. More specific performance
indicators are provided in Annex 9. The Bank's performance would also be evaluated by
way of additional client surveys and consultation with our client and civil society more
generally. Regular progress reports would be submitted to the Board.

44

Table 6: Monitoring the Progress

(I) Economic and Financial Variables 

(a) GDP growth 
(b) Credit Ratings 

(II) Social Indicators

(a) Unemployment Ratc 
(b) Poverty Rate 
(c) Gini Coefficient 
(d) Secondary Education Graduation Rate 
(e) Infant Mortality Rate 
(f) Access to safe water 

Initial Values 

-3.1 percent (1999) 
BB for S&P 

13.9 percent 
29 percent (urban) 
0.49 
52% 
18 per 1,000 
65 percent 

Predicted/Target Values

Average 4.5 percent
Investment grade for Government
paper

< 10 percent
<22 percent
0.46
70%
12 per 1,000
87 percent

Risks

128. As detailed above in the section on Consolidating Macroeconomic Reforms
(paras. 50-54), Argentina remains vulnerable, with deteriorated debt indicators and weak
fiscal performance, as it comes out of the last recession. This vulnerability generates a
number of possible--but not probable-risk 
scenarios, including:

* an external shock could constrain Argentina's ability to access the international
financial markets, a scenario faced in 1995, and in 1998/99. As in the past, under such
a situation, Argentina would need to seek financial support from international
financial institutions to help restore confidence. In the future, the IMF's contingent
credit facility is expected to play a greater role in responding to such shocks.
Assistance would also be required to help mitigate the social costs of adjustment and
to address key issue to reduce vulnerability and enhance confidence, taking advantage,
as in the past, of enhanced political support for reform;

* a very severe external shock, resulting in the abandonment of the Convertibility Plan
under crisis conditions, could create a wave of defaults and capital flight. Under such
circumstances, there would be a need to focus on social protection, restructuring the
economy, and the financial sector. Given the likely magnitude of needed support,
burden-sharing among international financial institutions would be important; or

* a long term risk that Argentina's competitive situation erodes, leading to stagnation
and high social costs. This is largely a internal political risk in that it would represent
a failure to continue to implement the unfinished agenda of reforms. This scenario
would call for actions similar to those described under the severe external shock
scenario.

45

Despite these risks, Argentina has shown itself to be a strong performeT that has
undertaken profound reforms and survived two serious external shocks. Each time, the
economy has recovered. Thus, the record is solid. The Bank would continue to support
efforts to help Argentina strengthen its policy framework to reduce these risks.

James D. Wolfensohn
President

By:
Sven Sandstrom 

Washington, DC, September 8, 2000
Attachments

Peter Woicke

46

ARGENTINA: PRIVATE SECTOR STRATEGY

I. 

Context for Private Sector Strategy

Annex A

1. 
Increased private sector role. A decade of economic reform has introduced a
fundamental shift in the role that the private sector plays in economic development in Argentina.
Privatization and more liberal policies have brought about increased private sector activities and
efficiency gains, solidifying the foundation for higher growth. Despite a series of downtums that
followed external shocks such as the Tequila and Asian crises, the Argentine economy has
achieved high growth. This growth has been accompanied by significant increases in the share of
private investment in GDP (Table 1), with the share of public sector investment declining during
the period. The private sector presently accounts for 73 percent of GDP, and is the main source
of growth.

Table 1
Argentina: Investments as a Share of GDP (%)

Year 
GDI/GDP 
Private I/GDP 
Public l/GDP 

1990 
14.0 
9.4 
4.6 

1991 
14.6 
12.7 
1.9 

1992 
16.7 
14.9 
1.8 

1993 
18.2 
16.6 
1.7 

1994 
19.9 
18.1 
1.8 

1995 
17.9. 
16.4 
1.5 

1996 
18.1 
16.8 
1.3 

1997 
19.4 
17.9 
1.5 

1998
19.9
18.2
1.7

GDP Growth p.a. 
-2.4 
12.7 
11.9 
5.9 
5.8 
-2.8 
5.5 
8.1 
3.9
GDI: Gross Domestic Investmnent; Private 1: Private sector investnent; Public i: Public sector investment

2. 
Expanded role and contribution of private infrastructure. Argentina has virtually
completed privatization and private concession of infrastructure services in most key sectors at
the Federal level, and achieved significant efficiency gains. The sectors that have been privatized
or have 
introduced private participation at 
the Federal level 
include power, gas,
telecommunications, transport (ports, airports, railways, toll roads, airlines), postal services, and
water and sanitation. Privatization generated cumulative investment commitments by the private
sector, which were estimated at US$12.4 billion. Though some contract issues associated with
earlier concessions have surfaced, a recent study for Argentina found that the privatization and
regulatory improvements have brought significant economic gains ($2.3 billion, or 0.9 percent of
GDP) to Argentina (see para. 24 for more details). Many Provinces are also moving towards
privatization, increasing the share of private sector activity in infrastructure.

3. 
Key development issues remain. Argentina is, along with Chile, one of the most
developed countries in the region, and has been a leader in undertaking the first generation of
economic reform. Through the economic reform process, Argentina has made great strides in
enabling the private sector. As noted in the CAS, reform has helped bring about a dramatic
increase in the size of the economy (about 6 percent p.a. during the 1990s) and modest inflation
(less than I percent in 1998). However, many (29 percent of the population) live in poverty,
unemployment is high (at about 14 percent) and access to basic infrastructure and social services
remains uneven. Much remains to be done to facilitate development, sustain high growth and
distribute the benefits of growth more broadly.

4. 
Accelerated, equitable and broad-based growth is critical to reduce poverty, enable more
of the population to participate in the gains from reform, and reduce the risk of major policy
reversals. The private sector plays a core role in pursuing this objective. Further improvements
in the environment for growth in the private sector, as well as a broader sharing of the benefits of

I In water and sanitation, for example, the private concessionaires presently serve about half the Argentine
population. The coverage by the private sector will increase to nearly three-quarters of the population
when Provincial concessions that are currently in process are implemented.

-I-

growth, are priorities in the WIMYs LAN lor Argentina. In tnis context, key private sector
development issues in Argentina include:

(i) 

(ii) 

Improving access of the private sector (particularly middle-market firms and
SMEs) to long-term financing for modernization and expansion, and enabling
firms to ride through major closures in external financial markets;
Continuing second generation reforms, and extending them to the Provinces,
including in infrastructure;
(iii) Helping increase the role that the private sector plays in sectors previously in the
public sector domain (e.g. social sectors, housing); and
Improving the business environment, in particular skills development, labor
markets and the judicial system.

(iv) 

5. 
The Private Sector Strategy (PSS), which forms an integral part of the WBG's overall
CAS for Argentina, provides further details of the WBG's strategy in addressing the priorities.
Section 11 of the PSS provides an overview of the Argentine private sector and a diagnosis of the
principal issues for private sector development for Argentina. Section III details the WBG's
strategy for addressing these principal issues.

H. 

Private Sector Development Priorities

6. 
There are four key characteristics of the Argentine private sector, which influence
the WBG's strategy:
(i) 
(Corporates) a coexistence of increasingly efficient blue chip firms, which generally
have access to long-term financing, and mid-sized and smaller firms which are less
efficient and modernized, and have little access to capital;
(Financial sector) a strong banking sector (in terms of capital structure, and
regulatory and supervisory framework), that is however not extending credit to the
private sector, given the current fiscal/interest rate situation, and still underdeveloped
capital markets;

(ii) 

(iii) 

(iv) 

(Widening scope) a widening scope for private sector participation -- new areas

which have been shifted from the public sector (infrastructure), or opened to the
private sector (social sectors, housing finance) -- and emergent areas for potential
growth (e.g., e-business); and
(Remaining structural impediments) a relatively sound enabling environment
though with a few major weaknesses in infrastructure (particularly in the Provinces),
a shortage of key skills for a service-based economy, inflexibility in labor markets,
and an inefficient and unreliable judicial

system. 

Box 1 - Private Sector Consultations
Following the precedent of the CAS for
7. 
Growth has been led by large firms. 
Brazil. the WBG undertook consultations
Large firms have led much of the growth in the withabroadrangeofprivatesectoractorsin
private sector. Blue chip Argentine firms have Argentina, extending the consultation
substantivall 
imptrove 
thuei productiviy 
oerm thae process now common in CASs to the private
substantially 
improved their productivity over the 
sector. Concurrently with the Group-wide
past 5-10 years and shown their resilience under 
consultation process with large fora, IFC
difficult economic conditions brought about by 
and MIGA held meetings with private firms,
external shocks (in the case of the '95-96 peso 
commercial and investment banks,
crisis, with 
substantial 
assistance 
from 
IFC). 
consultants, academics, and business
Economic 
liberalization and improved efficiency 
associations. Their views on the state of the
stemming from privatization of infrastructure have 
private sector, and priorities for private
helped them maintain competitiveness under the 
sector development, formed an important
fixed exchange regime, in spite of the devaluation in 
element in shaping this PSS.

- 2 -

Brazil and the current strength of the US dollar. As shown in Figure I below, the efficiency in
manufacturing and infrastructure has improved, reflecting increases in productivity in large
manufacturing and privatized infrastructure firms.
Figure 1
Unit Labor Cost 1991-1998
In constant pesos 1992=100 (1)

Annex A

1992 

115 

1993 

1994 

1995 

1996 

115- 1991 

110

105

1997 

1998

~~~~~~~~~~~~Services 

80 

/\ 

_

: 65 

60

Manufacturng

(1) Deflated by Manufacturing Wholesale Prices
Prices

8. 
Such productivity increases have been achieved through a combination of new
investments for modernization and expansion, and rationalization of workforce. These firms have
maintained access to long-term financing, which is critical for new investments. A conservative
balance sheet structure for most firms (see Table 2), and the existence of professional
management and a well-educated workforce, has helped maintain financial markets' confidence in
large Argentine firms' ability to weather a potential liquidity crisis. Rationalization has been
more visible in a number of newly privatized firms, particularly in infrastructure. This
rationalization, while necessary to improve efficiency and service, has an adverse impact on
employment, if not accompanied by growth of new firms and new labor opportunities, as has
been the case in Argentina to date.2 Then the net effect of reform can appear to be negative from
the standpoint of employment.

Table 2
Mean Corporate Leverage (Debt/Equity)
in Selected Countries

Rep. of Korea 
Thailand 
Indonesia 
Malaysia 
USA 
Taiwan 
Argentina 

Mean
Leverage

3.5
2.4
1.8
1.2
1.2
0.8
0.7

9. 
Middle-market firms and SMEs lag behind. The rest of the corporate sector lacks
access to long-term finance, either domestic or foreign, falling behind in investments for

2 An estimate shows that employment in large state companies fell from 300,000 in the 1980s to less than
50,000 post-privatization in mid- 1 990s.

- 3 -

productivity increases. As shown in Figure 1, a lag is apparent in the service sectors (other than
banking and public utilities) in which many firms are smaller. Having come through the effects
of the Tequila crisis, some of these middle-market and smaller firms too have become more
efficient, and their low leverage has helped them weather crises. However, they lack access to
capital for further improving their productivity. The cost of financing (high interest rates) is
prohibitive for these firms to make new investments, and the domestic banking sector is not
lending to these firms (see below for the financial sector). Firms in less developed provinces lag
further behind in both governance and management, and access to financial services.

10. 
Private investment -
increasing but still not enough. As shown in Table 1, private
investment (as percent of GDP) has been increasing in Argentina, but is still low level relative to
many other countries, as well as for sustaining high growth. Table 3 shows private investriient to
GDP ratios of a number of countries. Comparing Argentina's private investment with that of high
growth countries (such as Malaysia and pre-crisis Thailand and Indonesia), private investment in
Argentina probably needs to rise for achieving the higher growth enjoyed by those countries.

Table 3
Private investment to GDP (percent)

Brazil 
Argentina 
Chile 
Peru 
Panama 
Indonesia 
Thailand 
Malaysia 

(1997)

Private investment to GDP
15.3
18.4
20.4
21.0
22.0
22.1
24.1
30.9

Il. 
Unemployment remains a major issue. Slow growth in the non-blue chip corporate
segment has a major implication for unemployment. These firms will remain key players in job
creation3. As blue chip firms rationalize their workforce in their efforts to improve
competitiveness, and large privatized infrastructure companies continue to seek more efficient
delivery of services, middle-market firms and SMEs need to play a larger role in absorbing
employment through growth. In this context, improving access of these firms to investment
financing is critical for employment generation and broad-based growth. Improving flexibility in
labor markets is also critical in this respect (see para. 33).

Figure 2
Unemployment rate

.m_

20.0 

15.0

10.0 

5.0

I

91 

92 

93 

94 

95 

96 

97 

98 

99e

-4 -

12. 

Financial sector: Banks are strong. Argentine private sector banks have one of the

strongest capital structures among those in LAC, with a good regulatory and supervisory
framework, although there remain too many smaller and weaker banks. The top ten banks hold
about 70 percent of deposits in the system, and almost all the large banks are under foreign
ownership.

Annex A

Table 4
Net worth to total assets ratios
Banking syst m in selected countries
Country 
Net worth/total assets

11.5%

9.6%
6.9%
4.9%
3.7%

Argentina 

Brazil 
USA 
Spain 
Mexico 

13. 
Credit to the private sector is low. The Argentine banking sector, although much
stronger than before, is intermediating to the private sector only a small fraction of savings,
compared with many developing countries. Though increased over time during the 1 990s, credit
to the private sector is presently at about 25 percent of GDP as shown below. This level is
strikingly lower than that of other regions, and even lower than that of other countries in the LAC
region which have a weaker banking system -- for example, Mexico. As noted in the CAS, the
lack of domestic credit constitutes a serious bottleneck for small and medium sized firms.

Figure 3

Credit to private sector as % of GDP

IMTotal CrediVGDP |

1.4.

0.64r
0.2- 

*: 

m 

o 

i;

0* 

R 

1(41~0

0 N 

~ 

m 

14. 

Private banks are not extending credit. Under current economic conditions, banks are

taking a conservative lending stance, which has led to a contraction of credit to the private
sector.4 On the one hand, this conservatism has helped maintain the stability of the banking

system. On the other, this is severely limiting smaller domestic firms' access to operational and

investment financing (Table 5).

3 Data (1996) available from National Census indicate that small firms (with fewer than 25 employees)
alone account for 98% of business, and generate 60% of Argentina's jobs.
4 With the economy beginning to recover, there have recently been some signs of improvement, particularly
in mortgage lending.

-5-

Table 5
Argentine Banking Sector Credit
1997 I 1998 

(Millions of pesos, percent)

1996 

Year 

Credit to Private Sector 

54,939 64,234 

72,206 

Change last year (%) 
Bad loans/bank credit (%) 

6.7 
12.2 

16.9 
10.1 

12.4 
9.2 

Annex A

1999

70,582

- 2.2
10.6

15. 

High interest rates, and the Government's fiscal requirements, are affecting private banks'

intermediation in two ways. First, with government paper bearing high yields, private banks
rationally do not lend to riskier private firms (which anyway could not afford such high interest
rates for their investment financing), and invest instead in 'risk-free' government paper. Second,
private banks do not have access to long-term funding sources, due to this "crowding out", as well
as to underdeveloped domestic capital markets.

16. 
Dependence on external financing. Dependence on external financing, along with
weak domestic intermediation, is another major difficulty that the Argentine private sector faces.
This stems from a combination of low domestic savings (19 percent of GDP) and displacement of
the private sector by government borrowing (public sector deficits at 1.5 percent of GDP). This
could be a principal source of vulnerability for the Argentine private sector, as seen in the 1995
Tequila Crisis. Total private capital flows to Argentina remain stable, helped by the financial
markets' confidence in the Convertibility Plan and in 1999 strong FDI flows, as shown in Table 6.

Table 6

Private Capital Flows to Argentina 

(S million)

Foreign Direct Investment 2/ 

Portfolio Equity 

1993 
2,059 

1994 
1995 
2,480 3,756 

1996 
4,937 

1997 
4,924 

1,523 3,417 1,960 

1,716 1,754 

1998 1999 /I
4,289 
18,417

74 - -10,560

Private Creditors 3/ 
Total 
% of GDP 
I/ The 1999 figures are estimates.

5,262 10,101 7,893 
10,224 14,760 13,115 10,582
8,844| 15,998| 13,609| 16,877 21,438 17,478 18,439
3.4 
5.71 
4.81 
5.6 
6.6 
5.1 
n.a.

2/ Includes the acquisition of YPF (the country's largest company) by Repsol of Spain at US$13 billion.

3/ Includes private credit to the public sector with government guarantee.

17. 
Today's external market conditions favor top-quality credits (first, the government, and
then top-tier companies). The declining private credit flows during the past few years suggest
that: (i) the Government is the dominant borrower; (ii) external debt flows even to top-quality
private firms have declined; and (iii) smaller firms are virtually closed out from the external

financial market. This implies that, without support, most Argentine firms will continue to have

difficulty raising investment capital in the short-to-medium term. It also implies that current
external market conditions are amplifying the differential access to financing that exists in the
Argentine corporate sector, making a broader sharing of benefits of growth even more difficult.
Structured finance, including various types of guarantees or other forms of credit enhancement,
will be increasingly important in the external markets, while further development of domestic
financial markets will be critical for smaller firms.

18. 
Other sources of financing are under-developed. Non-bank financial sources
presently lack depth for playing a significant role in intermediating capital. Equity markets and
institutional funds, which are rnajor sources of capital in the developed markets, are still in the

process of development, although there has been some progress in recent years. As shown in

- 6 -

Figure 4, Argentina's equity market capitalization is low at around 18 percent of GDP, compared
with other countries in LAC and other regions.

Annex A

Figure 4
Equity Market Capitalization to GDP, 1999

i

180%
160%
140% 
120% 
100% 
80% 
60% 
40%.
20% 
0%

In Argentina, large firms, and some smaller ones, have relatively good and professional corporate
governance, although family holdings still dominate. 
Improvements in disclosure and
dissemination of financial and accounting information of firms are needed to facilitate growth of
equity markets. Many smaller firms also need improvements in governance and management.

19. 
Institutionalfunds, such as pension funds, life insurance and mutual funds, are still in the
process of development, but with the recent reform which introduced private pension funds, they
are playing an increasing role in improving domestic savings and providing long-term funds.
Taken together, total assets of these institutional funds account for 7 percent of GDP. Total assets
under management for 16 private pension funds in the system stood at around $11.5 billion, or 3
percent of GDP (at December 1998), and continue to grow.

Figure 5
Growth in private pension fund assets
(Assets Under Management in US$ billions, growth in percent)

-;,,n 
rv. 

14 MCD

ne.t 

.

s<ltso~~. 

Ir 

f. 

i. 

_ 

.....

j... 

f 

s1

Source: Superintendency of private pension fund administrators

- 7 -

Annex A

20. 
Non-bank financing sources. Non-bank financial sources, such as leasing and factoring,
are scarce in Argentina, and account for a very small part of financial activity in Argentina (Table
7), even though bank lending itself is at low levels. In economies with developed non-bank
financial intermediaries, smaller firms tend to gain access to credit through non-bank financial
institutions, as these institutions more readily lend to smaller clients than their bank counterparts.
To cut operating costs per loan, commercial banks tend to prefer making large loans to lower risk
clients. They tend to lend on a basis of either an established banking relationship (with large
corporates) or well-secured collateral (such as fixed assets with good value). Non-bank financial
institutions tend to use a particular methodology (e.g. leasing) which can contain operating costs
while catering to a larger number of clients with smaller loans. They also tend to accommodate
risks of smaller firms that can offer as collateral only moveable assets, account receivables, or
other non-fixed assets. The fact that these types of financial services are fairly insignificant in
Argentina, combined with the low level of credit to the private sector from banks, is a major
impediment to growth and employment creation. Developing non-bank financial services is
critical for improving access to domestic financing in Argentina.

Table 7
Bank Intermediation, % of all Financial Assets
Argentina 
98%
Brazil 
97%
87%
Mexico 
India 
80%
Malaysia 
64%
Chile 
60%
47%
Japan 
Korea 
38%
U.S.A. 
23%

21. Microfinance. Another "missing" area in the Argentine financial sector is microfinance,
which is playing a major role in some other countries in LAC, such as Bolivia and Paraguay.
Observers in the microfinance industry view the Argentina microfinance sector as one of the least
developed in LAC, with few, if any, self-sustainable microfinance programs. The lack of
microfinance activity is a notable contrast to neighboring Bolivia, where there are several main
institutions operated and managed along purely commercial lines, and earning sizable profits.

22. 
Potential areas for private sector-led higher growth. During the CAS private sector
consultations, many commented on the importance of focusing not only on addressing present
weaknesses but also on building on areas of potential strengths in Argentina. Argentina generally
enjoys a better-educated workforce and higher income than its neighbors, and this could provide a
potential source of higher growth through developments in information technology and higher
value added activities. There have been some signs for supporting this view, for example in the
growth of retail e-business. Many participants in the consultation maintained that higher growth
could be generated by focusing more on service-oriented, high value-added activities and less on
traditional "heavy" industries (e.g. automotive). In this context, they also noted that education
plays a particularly important role by providing technical and managerial information,
information technology, and a skilled workforce (see para. 26 below for more on education).

23. Widening scope of the private sector. Reform has widened the scope for private sector
participation in infrastructure, social sectors and housing finance. This has not only increased the
role that the private sector plays in economic growth, but also has brought economic gains
through increased efficiency, particularly in infrastructure. This scope is expected to keep
expanding in the social sectors, housing, and provincial infrastructure, as the Government
continues to advance reform in these areas.

- 8 -

24. 

Infrastructure. As noted earlier, Argentina has virtually completed privatization in most

Annex A

key sectors at the Federal level, and achieved significant efficiency gains. Since the early 1 990s,
Argentina has been a leader in the region in introducing the private sector in infrastructure. The
private infrastructure program included a number of "leaders" in the region -- for example,
private water concession and postal services -- for which the WBG has provided policy advice,
technical assistance and transaction support. The program has significantly increased the role that
the private sector plays in infrastructure services in Argentina. Furthermore, private
infrastructure has brought significant economic gains. In this regard, a recent stud? showed the

following 

three points. First, the spillover effects from private operations of utilities has

amounted to $2.3 billion (or 0.9 percent of GDP), and their distribution benefits all income

groups. On average these gains represent the equivalent of 41 percent of what households spend

on utilities. Second, the gains from effective regulation add up to almost $1 billion (or 0.35

percent of GDP). This represents 16 percent of the average utility bill. Third, the direct gains are

higher for the higher income groups, but indirect gains achieved through better regulation tend to
favor the poorest income groups. Private sector participation, and its contributions to efficiency,
is expected to continue to increase in Argentina, as the Government national infrastructure

program for the next three years proposes that 44 percent of infrastructure expenditures come
from the private sector.
Box 2 - WBG experiences in infrastructure privatization in Argentina

The WBG has long been involved in assisting Argentina's privatization program in

infrastructure. With WBG assistance, more than ten infrastructure sub-sectors have been

privatized, in most cases in pioneering transactions. Argentina's transfornation of
infrastructure services provides a good example of collaboration between IBRD and IFC,
with each institution performing the role in which it has a comparative advantage. IBRD
lending, sector studies, and technical assistance were critical to providing the appropriate

setting. IFC advised on financial structuring and mobilized private sector financing for the

first private project in a number of sub-sectors. Notable examples for such IBRD-IFC
sequential involvement included: privatization in the power sector, the private concession
for water and sanitation in Buenos Aires, and privatization of railway networks. In each

case, IBRD's activity in policy and technical advice for privatization was followed by IFC's

financing for new investments of one or more of the privatized companies in that sector.

25. 
Private participation in social sectors. The Fiscal Responsibilities Law requires a zero
Federal deficit by year 2003. Under this condition, the Government's social spending will be
highly constrained. To address this issue, the Government has been making progress in
reforming social sectors, reducing public spending, and allowing private firms to play a larger
role in this area. In general, the private sector plays a larger role for the upper income segments,
helping the Government reduce the fiscal costs for this segment and re-allocate resources to focus
more on basic services for the lower income segments.

26. 
Education sector. As noted in the CAS, the most important type of human development
investment in Argentina remains education, as the country's labor demands shift to higher skill
levels. The private sector will play a larger role for improving the delivery and quality of
education services. This is a critical area for Argentina, as shifts towards a more service-based
economy will put considerable pressure on skilled and managerial labor markets (see para. 22
above). The current system is not producing sufficient graduates to fill the private sector's needs
in those areas. In public higher education, efficiency is low, capital investments are insufficient,

5 "Winners and Losers from the Privatization and Regulation of Utilities: Lessons from a General
Equilibrium Model of Argentina," Chisari, Estache, and Romero (The World Bank Economic Review Vol.
13, No. 2)

-9-

Annex A

the composition and qualification of faculty are often inadequate, and most public universities
have little interaction with the labor market. Argentina is the only major country in the region
that still offers completely free university education with open enrollment. As a result, public
universities still dominate higher education. Although the private sector has nearly a third of the
total market at the secondary level, it has less than a fifth at the university level. The process for
obtaining a Government license has historically been difficult for private universities. The
process of approval started to become more open in the 1990's, and the number of universities
and students at private universities has been growing.6 Further development of tertiary education
and management and technical training will be critical for Argentina. Much will come from the
private sector, which will face a formidable challenge attracting financing in an area perceived as
too risky for most banks.

Box 3 - IFC activity in the social sector
Increased private sector opportunities have prompted IFC's involvement in the Argentine social
sectors. At this early stage of development of private provision of social services in Argentina,
IFC has focused on demonstrating the role that the private sector can play in improving the quality
and delivery of social services, and opportunities that exist for private investors.

IFC approved in 1998 its first health sector project in Latin America -- in a private hospital in
Cordoba. IFC provided $9.6 million to help Hospital Privado de Cordoba finance its $20.4 million
project to expand, renovate and rationalize its operations. The project includes construction of a
new building, upgrading of existing facilities, acquisition of new medical equipment, creation of
satellite health centers and improvement of management information systems. IFC's financing
offered access to long-term financing that is otherwise unavailable to Argentine private health
providers. Success of the project will serve to show other potential investors in Argentina that
private health care projects can be attractive and have developmental value.

In education, IFC approved in 1998 its first investment in higher education -- a $22 million loan for
Universidad de Belgrano, one of Argentina's oldest and largest private universities. In 1999, IFC
also approved an investment in Universidad Torcuato Di Tella, another private university. The
Corporation continues to seek opportunities to help the Argentine private sector contribute to
improving social services in Argentina. With the recent establishment of the Social Sectors
Department, IFC is enhancing its capability to support the sectors worldwide. Coupled with
continuing reform in the social sectors, IFC expects opportunities for helping private providers to
continue to expand in Argentina.

27. 
Health sector. The Argentine health care system is faced with low efficiency and equity,
lack of control over fast rising health expenditures, and consumer dissatisfaction. Argentina
spends about 10 percent of GDP on health care annually, which is very high by Latin American
standards. As noted in the CAS, health insurance had a number of inefficient and unsustainable
features. The sector is funded through three main mechanisms:

- The public system, which accounts for 22 percent of all health care expenditures, is
funded from tax revenues and is available to all Argentineans but is used regularly by
only about 17% of the population;

6It is estimated that less than 20 percent of entrants to public universities actually graduate, and it takes
those graduating students an average of 8 years to complete their studies (instead of the scheduled five),
inflating the cost of a graduate to an estimated level of over $50,000. As a result, students began to look to
private universities for a better education.

- 10-

Annex A

-

The social security system, which accounts for about 36 percent of national health
expenditures, is made up of some 300 national and provincial Obras Sociales (OSs);
and

- The private plans, which, together with direct private payments, accounts for 42
percent of total expenditures, provide higher quality medical care and/or coverage for
more complex medical procedures not available from OSs.

The low efficiency of the system is mainly related to the fact that there are too many small OSs.
In general, OSs suffer from weak management and excess staff -- problems that are associated
with their traditional political functions and a lack of consumer choice in the sector. The
Government has been taking steps to improve the system. In addition to having allowed people
to switch between OSs, the Government is introducing the principles of consumer choice,
competition, and accountability. Private providers and financiers of health care will face
increased opportunities for their roles in the sector, although they need modernization of delivery
and management systems to keep up with increasing competition.

28. 
Private participation in housing finance. Although Argentina has a long history of
residential mortgage lending, the current housing finance market in Argentina is very small. It
has been historically dominated by a public sector institution, Banco Hipotecario. The stock of
residential mortgages to GDP reached a peak of 11.4 percent in 1956, then fell to as low as 0.7
percent in 1983 and rose back to a little over 4 percent in 1999. This compares to 11 percent in
Mexico, 12 percent in Colombia, 15 percent in Chile, 66 percent in the U.S. and 77 percent in the
U.K. Many Argentineans have had a mortgage in the past but now own their houses without a
mortgage. Since 1991, there have been a number of changes in the mortgage business. The
Convertibility Plan has produced a period of relative economic stability, helping people regain
long-term perspectives for housing and its financing. A new Law and regulations were
introduced for setting up the regulatory framework and establishing certain standardized terms for
mortgages to help securitization and develop a secondary market, and in 1999, Banco Hipotecario
was privatized.

29. 
The effects of a developed housing finance market on growth, job creation, and a broader
sharing of benefits of growth, are significant. IFC has recently approved a project to assist the
creation of a secondary mortgage securities market, which is IFC's first large housing finance
operation. The project is expected to bring major impact: extending the benefits of home
ownership; developing local capital markets; broadening the mortgage market; and providing
stimulus to the economy as a whole. There have been early signs of market development, with
several banks starting to offer 30-year fixed rate mortgages for the first time. The primary
beneficiaries are expected to be Argentine consumers, as many more families, some for the first
time, gain access to long-term funds for the purchase of a home on terms they can afford.

30. 
Remaining Structural Impediments. There remain several major structural
impediments to private sector development. While Argentina has made major progress in
addressing many problems through the first generation of reform during the 1990s, there are still
impediments in infrastructure, labor markets and the judicial system. Improvements in these
areas will have positive impacts on growth (through lower costs and more efficient delivery) and
sharing of benefits of growth (through increased employment and better access to infrastructure
and social services).

31. 
Impediments in infrastructure. As noted earlier, Argentina has made great strides in
the infrastructure sector; however, benefits of the successful privatization program have not yet
been felt by the population as a whole. More specifically,

-11-

Annex A

- Reforn is still in the process of taking hold in the Provinces, leaving many in the Provinces
behind in access to basic infrastructure and efficiency gains (particularly less developed
Northern provinces)
- Transport and logistics costs still remain high in some areas, affecting competitiveness of the
Argentine private sector, although there has been a major reduction in others.

32. 
Provinces lag in infrastructure. The successful privatization (i.e. transfer of ownership
of assets) has not yet fully translated into an overall increase in new investments in infrastructure.
Investment in infrastructure (excluding the Yacyreta project) in the last 10 years has fallen below
2 percent of GDP -- a level many agree is insufficient to support export-led growth. In many
Provinces (in particular in the northern region), the lack of investment is more acute, because they
not only face fiscal constraints but also lag in introducing reform and private infrastructure
investments. Infrastructure deficits in water and sanitation, roads, inland waterways, and urban
services require attention. Private infrastructure in many areas has brought a significant reduction
in infrastructure costs to business. In transport, however, this is limited to a few areas. For
example, the port costs of soybean transportation declined from $45 per ton to $17 per ton
through private participation. However, there remain a number of areas that require further
improvement, particularly in the Provinces. Hligh transport and logistic costs continue to
constitute a major bottleneck on Argentina's competitiveness, especially for export-oriented firms
in inland provinces.

33. 
Labor markets. The lack of employment opportunities remains a major issue in
Argentina. There are two major factors for this: (i) slow growth in the middle-market and SME
sectors; and (ii) inflexibility in labor markets. First, as shown in Figure 1, labor productivity in
infrastructure and manufacturing has significantly increased during the 1990s; however, this has
been achieved in large part by rationalization of workforce. The absorption of a "rationalized"
workforce has not kept up with layoffs, due in part to the lack of growth in the middle-market and
SME segment of the private sector (Figure 6). Second, under Argentina's present labor laws,
labor markets remain rigid, impeding a smooth transition of the workforce to other firms or
sectors. An estimate indicates that the labor rigidity represents about 25% more cost to business,
and promotes informal labor contracts (estimated to cover some 40-50% of the workforce).
Deregulation in the labor markets is critical in improving competitiveness of the private sector
and creating more employment opportunities in Argentina, as noted in the CAS.

Figure 6
Employment in Argentina

W

13.5
13.0 -~M 
E 12.5

0 12.0-
- .11'05;

11.0 
10.5

043MN1

91 92 93 94 95 96 97 98 99e

34. 
Business costs of an ineffective judicial system. An inefficient and unreliable judicial
process presents a heavy cost to doing business in Argentina. It affects businesses through

- 12 -

Annex A

unpredictability of judicial outcomes, enforceability (the lack thereof) of commercial contracts,
and speed (the lack thereof) in obtaining decisive resolutions. A survey indicates only 13 percent
of the population in Argentina has confidence in the judicial system, and that the population in
general recognizes the excessive time it takes to obtain a decisive resolution. Such inefficiency in
the judicial process poses significant hidden costs to business -- for example, in intermediation
costs (as banks need to cover risks of judicial uncertainty in enforcing contracts within loan
spreads), and in contracted prices (as business has to add a risk premium for the eventual
unenforceability of commercial contracts). Therefore, improving the judicial system is critical in
advancing private sector development in Argentina.

35. 
Private sector characteristics mirror development priorities. The four major
dimensions of the Argentine private sector -- the differential access in the corporate sector to
financing, the low level of intermediation (either through banks or capital markets), the widening
scope for private participation, and structural impediments -- are closely related to opportunities
and obstacles that exist in Argentina in achieving sustained high growth and a more equitable
sharing of benefits of growth and reform. The low domestic credit, nascent capital markets and
low domestic savings hamper growth, particularly by limiting access of middle-market firms and
SMEs to investment capital. The differential access to financing amplifies income disparity and
differential access to jobs, as smaller firms employ a majority of the labor force, particularly in
the middle to lower income segments. The new areas for private sector participation require
advancements in reform to realize its potential. The structural impediments hamper increases in
productivity in the form of high costs of infrastructure, labor, and commercial and legal
transactions. Therefore, the WBG's private sector strategy aims to address these private sector
issues, focusing on: continuing second generation reform and extending it to the Provinces,
helping improve access of the private sector to financing, helping increase the role of the private
sector in new areas; and improving the business environment by removing remaining
impediments.

m. The World Bank Group's Assistance Strategy

36. 
Focus on cutting-edge activities. Argentina is one of the more developed countries
among WBG clients, in terms of per capita income, advancement of reform, a fairly developed
private sector that accounts for a large part of the economy, and growth potential. Therefore, the
WBG's role naturally comes under disproportionate scrutiny. However, as noted earlier, there
remain major issues of poverty, unemployment and lack of access to basic infrastructure and
social services. The WBG has been instrumental in helping Argentina introduce reform, and will
continue to help advance the reform program. Macroeconomic stabilization, the first generation
of reform, and the increased private sector role in the economy have made possible a doubling of
the economy during the past 10 years, despite a series of external shocks. A notable aspect of the
WBG's approach in Argentina is its focus on cutting-edge activities, which could be, and in many
cases have been, replicated in other WBG member countries. For example, Argentina is a leader
in infrastructure privatization for which IBRD provided policy and technical advice, and IFC
transaction support. Part of this success stems from the fact that Argentina has a relatively
advanced economy, which can support the implementation of experimental activities. The WBG
highly values this partnership with Argentina, which could benefit many more of the WBG
members, and will continue to assist Argentina's cutting-edge programs for reducing poverty and
achieving equitable, high growth.

37. 
Principal objective and priorities. In the area of private sector development, the
WBG's CAS objective of poverty reduction in Argentina is addressed through support for
equitable, sustained high growth and a broad sharing of the benefits of growth. Priority areas for
this objective include:

- 13 -

Annex A

(i) 

(ii) 

Improving access of the private sector (particularly middle-market firms and
SMEs) to long-term financing for modernization and expansion (as discussed in
paras. 9-21), and enabling firms to ride through major closures in external
financial markets;
Continuing second generation reforms, and extending them to the Provinces,
including in infrastructure (as discussed in paras. 31-32);
(iii) Helping increase the role that the private sector plays in sectors previously in the
public sector domain (e.g. social sectors, housing, as discussed in paras. 25-29);
and
Improving the business environment, in particular skills development, labor
markets and the judicial system (as discussed in paras. 22, 33-34).

(iv) 

38. 
Comparative advantages of WBG institutions. The WBG strategy focuses on these
specific priority areas, where comparative advantages of each institution, or combined strengths
of the Group institutions, could maximize the impact of its activities. In general, IBRD's
comparative advantages lie in its assistance on macro-stability (along with IMF's), sectoral policy
advice, and capacity building, with appropriate funding instruments. IFC's advantages lie in
specific transactions, in particular catalyzing financing for new and innovative projects in
"frontier" sectors. MIGA plays a catalytic role in reducing investors' country risk perceptions on
the country for areas in which they are less forthcoming without MIGA's assistance. Experience
shows that the impact is the largest when policy and technical advice and transaction support
from the Group institutions are provided together, concurrently or sequentially.

39. 
The following section outlines the WBG's private sector strategy for supporting
Argentina in achieving equitable, broadly shared, sustainable high growth.

Box 4 - IBRD-IFC-MIGA Collaboration in Argentina

Joint work of IBRD and IFC has been making a significant impact in the reform process in

Argentina. 

IBRD and IFC were involved -- sequentially or concurrently -- in Argentina's

reforrn in infrastructure, the financial sector, provincial development, and the social sectors.
A number of notable examples for sequential involvement are found in infrastructure (see Box
2), and the financial sector. In the financial sector, IBRD's assistance for strengthening the
banking sector was followed by a number of IFC investments in that sector, and IBRD's
assistance in capital market development, particularly pension reform, was also followed by
IFC's investment in a private pension fund. Examples for concurrent involvement are found
in the social sectors and provincial development. IBRD's assistance is on-going in both health
and education sector reform where IFC has already made a few investments in private
providers of social services (see Box 3). In provincial development, IFC and IBRD worked
together on a special initiative supporting economic reform in the Tucuman Province. There,
IBRD's overall assistance program was complemented by IFC's support for a project
preparation facility for Tucuman enterprises and a credit line set up with Banco Roberts for
the northern provinces, including Tucuman. MIGA is in regular consultation with both IBRD
and IFC. Collaboration has intensified over the past two years. IFC and MIGA have been
working closely on an innovative financial sector project, and have had joint consultations
with representatives of the Argentinean private sector for the preparation of the CAS. IFC has
also directed clients to MIGA on several occasions, notably through their representative office
in Buenos Aires.

-14-

EBRD

Annex A

40. 
Summary. Private sector development for broad-based and equitable private sector-led
growth forms a core part of the CAS framework for poverty reduction, and of IBRD's strategy.
Foremost, IBRD primarily focuses on economic growth and stability, particularly through
supporting the Government in consolidating macroeconomic reforms, and maintaining the
international financial markets' confidence in Argentine economy. At the same time, IBRD's
strategy focuses on longer-term issues for improving the productivity and competitiveness of the
Argentine economy through supporting the Government's efforts to advance second generation
reform both at the Federal level and in the Provinces. Priorities include macroeconomic stability,
and reforming the framework for private sector development, focusing on public sector
governance (including Provincial governance), infrastructure, labor markets, the judicial system,
and the social sector.

41. Macro-stability. Growth and macroeconomic stability are clearly the sine qua non of
any effort to improve living conditions, although they are by themselves not sufficient for
reducing poverty in Argentina. Maintaining the financial markets' confidence, improving access
of the Argentine private sector to financing, and reducing the volatility of the economy's
performance (resulting from its vulnerability to external shocks) are critical to sustainable, high
growth. In this context, IBRD, along with IDB and IMF, has provided the Special Structural
Adjustment Loan (SSAL). The SSAL provides financial assistance required with the tightening
of access to international markets, and supports actions to improve the quality of investment in
human capital, enhance the efficiency of financial markets, and improve the regulatory
environment and the quality of public administration. Furthermore, the Government's efforts in
this area with the introduction of the Fiscal Responsibilities Law will play a core role in
maintaining the financial markets' confidence (thus helping lower external financing costs) and
reducing financing requirements of the public sector (thus improving access of the private sector
to domestic financing at a lower cost). With an increased share of provincial expenditures in the
total public spending in Argentina,' resulting from the fiscal improvements at the Federal level,
the focus will shift from the Federal level to assisting the Provinces in achieving fiscal stability
and improving public sector governance and management.

42. 
Provincial development. The continuing improvements at the Federal level have
allowed IBRD to enhance its focus on extending the benefits of reform to the Provincial level.
Since the end of the 1980s, IBRD has assisted in the development in the Provinces, with financial
and technical assistance, such as the Provincial Development Loans I & II and the Provincial
Reform Loan. IBRD has also assisted in the privatization of 18 provincial banks, reform of
provincial pension systems, and improvements in public administration, health, and education in
Rio Negro, Tucuman, San Juan and Salta through a series of Provincial Reform Loans tailored for
these individual Provinces. Still, institutional weaknesses are pervasive throughout the Provincial
governments, and among federal ministries that have been slow in adapting to the increased
decentralization. Improvements in this area are critical for private sector development in the
Provinces, as these Provinces on average receive about three-fourths of their revenues from
essentially untied Federal transfers. This amplifies the lack of accountability for investment
programs in basic infrastructure and social services among government leaders and local voters.
IBRD is continuing with a series of reform operations to improve fiscal management, the delivery
of social services, and public administration, in Catamarca, C6rdoba, Buenos Aires Province,
Misiones, Chubut and others. This program is complemented with a series of ESW on provincial
finance, and social services. Improvements in infrastructure are also a key element in provincial
development, and IBRD focuses on helping deepen the reform in transport and logistics, and

The Provinces' share of the total spending now accounts for about a half of public spending in Argentina.

- 15 -

Annex A

water and sanitation, particularly in the Provinces. IBRD's strategy aims at supporting the
Government's efforts to: (i) improve economic productivity by improving the quality and costs of
infrastructure services; and (ii) improve access to basic services, particularly for lower income
segments. In transport and logistics, IBRD is focusing on: rehabilitation and maintenance of
Federal and Provincial road networks; integrated urban transport systems; and the regulatory
framework. In water and sanitation, IBRD focuses on: regulatory framework in the Provinces;
private participation in particular in the urban areas; and the designing of a long-term master plan
for resource management. The recently approved Provincial Reform of the Water System project
supports an initial five-year plan for stimulating investments, through private concessions, in
certain Provinces (Catamarca, Posadas) and urban areas.

43. 
Labor markets. With the poor twice as likely to be unemployed as the non-poor,
employment is a key issue for reducing poverty. Equally important, under the Convertibility
Plan, factor markets, in particular labor, need to be flexible enough to respond to external shocks
and to enhance productivity and improve competitiveness. Thus, IBRD's assistance in this area
focuses on: (i) helping improve labor market flexibility; and (ii) helping achieve sustainable,
higher growth particularly in the SME sector, which has a significant employment impact. With
institutional rigidities and high non-wage costs of labor, the Argentine labor markets lack
flexibility and adjustment has come at the expense of jobs. Under the SSAL, IBRD, along with
IDB, is assisting the Government's efforts in increasing labor flexibility to reduce labor costs and
enhance the safety net aspects of current severance and unemployment insurance schemes. For
supporting higher growth and employment in the SME sector, IBRD is focusing on the following
two areas. First, IBRD provided an export promotion loan, for which it will review the
effectiveness of its assistance activities. Second, IBRD is assisting in the development of markets
for financial instruments available for SMEs, such as leasing, through the Capital Market
Development Technical Assistance, and the SSAL.

44. 
Judicial system. As noted earlier, a reliable and efficient judicial system is critical for
the development of the Argentine private sector, and is one of the WBG's priorities in the CAS.
Improvements in this area require a long process, as has been the case in other WBG member
countries. IBRD's current focus includes: (i) piloting with the development of model judiciaries;
(ii) providing support for institution building for the Consejo de la Magistratura, improving
national legal registries, and creating a consensus among principal actors about the contents of
reform program; and (iii) support for judicial reform in the Provinces.

45. 
Social sector. IBRD's programs in education and health, in relation to private sector
development, are as follows. In education, IBRD has provided a Higher Education Reform
project and secondary education projects, which are intended to improve the quality of public
education, especially at the secondary level. The higher education project is designed to support
the Government to establish a competitive environment for the improvement of higher education
to provide, through a transparent funding mechanism, the appropriate incentives for continuous
educational efficiency gains and quality enhancement. 
In health, IBRD's primary sector
objectives include improving outcomes for the poor, enhancing performance of services and
improving health care financing, in which the private sector plays an increasing role. IBRD has
assisted the Government in creating a more efficient and equitable health financing system,
including both compulsory social insurance (OSs) and voluntary private health insurance which
together cover about 70 percent of the population. IBRD is also assisting in health reform at the
Provincial level, through provincial reform loans as well as sector loans. Particularly, it aims at
advancing health reform at the Provincial level, and addressing the internal efficiency of public
hospitals by introducing managerial and financial autonomy. As noted earlier, increased
opportunities in these sectors, stemming from increased competition, has broadened the scope for
private participation (see paras. 25-27).

- 16-

IFC

Annex A

46. 
Focus on "frontier." Given Argentine corporates' access to financing (under "normal"
market conditions) and IFC's exposure constraints (see Box 5), high selectivity and a sharper
focus on high impact activities are important aspects of IFC's country assistance strategy for
Argentina (Table 8). IFC is giving priority to activities in "frontier" sectors, which could have a
high impact with demonstration effects and could also be replicated in other countries. IFC's
priority areas -- financial sector (e.g. housing), middle-market and SMEs, health and education,
and Provincial private infrastructure -- correspond to this 'frontier'-orientation. This strategy is
also based on IFC's positive experiences in supporting the first projects in frontier sectors in
Argentina (see Box 6).

Table 8
IFC Project Approvals
FY95-96 vs. FY99-00 (to date)

FY95-96 
Financial Services 
Transport & Utilities 
General Manufacturing 
and Services 
Agribusiness 
Telecommunications 
Power 

# of projects FY99-00(to date) 
7 
Financial Services 
4 
Transport & Utilities 
7 
General Manufacturing 
and Services
Agribusiness 
Social Services 

7 
2 
2

Oil & Gas 

Petrochemicals 
Mining 

Total 

4

I
I

35 

#of projects
5
2
5

3
I

16

Box 5 - IFC Country Exposure

IFC's single country exposure constraints also dictate a sharp focus on activities with high impact
and in 'frontier' areas. IFC's exposure in Argentina is currently the largest in terms of net
disbursed portfolio and the second largest in terms of net held portfolio. As at the end of
February 2000, net disbursed portfolio in Argentina amounted to US$1,099 million, accounting
for 11.4 percent of the total IFC portfolio and 17.9 percent of IFC's Net Worth. IFC's current
internal policy guidelines for single-country exposure are 12 percent of net portfolio (held or
disbursed) and 25 percent of Net Worth (disbursed). IFC's country exposure in Argentina is close
to the lower of these two guidelines (the 12 percent guideline) on a disbursed basis, although it is
considerably below the limit on a committed basis, at 9.8 percent of total held portfolio. IFC has
informed the Board that it may temporarily exceed this guideline, although this is unlikely, and it
is expected that exposure will be under 12 percent by end-FY2000. IFC is also assessing
potential options to create more headroom for Argentina (such as securitization and synthetic
country risk swap). However, IFC's investments in Argentina will continue to be constrained by
both role and exposure considerations, and added headroom would be principally reserved for
dealing with potential future disruptions in Argentina's access to intemational financial markets.
47. 
Areas of focus. IFC's strategy is closely aligned with that of the Bank, and is centered on
three themes -- improving access to investment financing for companies that will create growth
and employment, supporting activity which demonstrates tangible benefits of growth and reform,
and supporting "frontier" projects which could be replicated in other WBG member countries.
Operationally, this translates into six areas of activities:

- 17-

Annex A

(i) 

(ii) 
(iii) 
(iv) 

(v) 

(vi) 

Help develop domestic financial markets which broaden and deepen intermediation of
investment capital;
Help develop private provision of social services in health and education;
Support private infrastructure in 'frontier" areas and in the poorer Provinces;
Support companies that currently lack access to long-term financing, in particular middle-
market firms and SMEs; and
Help develop innovative "risk enhancement" structured finance that could improve
Argentine firms' access to extemal capital and reduce financing costs; and
Support for the development of potential "growth leader" areas, such as information
technology.

48. 
This focus implies that IFC will do much less of certain types of investments. Going
forward, it is expected that oil, gas, petrochemicals, mining, and large infrastructure projects in
power and telecommunications, will play a very limited role. IFC's resources in these sectors
have been re-deployed to other countries.

Box 6 - IFC experiences in frontier investments

In Argentina, IFC has made a number of "frontier" investments, which helped expand the
private sector's role in services that were previously in the public sector domain, and
demonstrated that private sector financing was forthcoming for investments in such frontier
sectors. Many of these investments were subsequently replicated to benefit many other WBG
member countries. Since the early 1990s, IFC has assisted in the privatization of the Buenos
Aires water system, national postal service, ports and railways and invested in two private
universities, all firsts for the Corporation, as well as making investments in the emerging area
of private health care. Some of these projects represented the first of their kind in the world:
Aguas Argentina, Correo Argentino, and most recently SMMC -- the first major secondary
mortgage market company in Argentina.

Aguas Argentina (Aguas), a large scale private concession for the water and sanitation system
in the Buenos Aires Metropolitan area, was the first of such an attempt in the developing
world, and has become a well-known, leading example of privatization in water and
sanitation. In the mid-1990s, IFC made two investments in Aguas to help finance the
company's five-year capital expenditure program for upgrading and expansion of the system.
IFC provided a total of US$392 million, comprised of an equity investment of US$7 million,
loans amounting to US$78 million from IFC's account and US$307 million syndicated loans.
The successful financing of Aguas demonstrated opportunities present in privatization of
water systems, and was indeed followed by a number of projects in other countries --
privatization in La Paz in Bolivia, Manila in the Philippines, and others.

Correo Argentino (Correo), the Argentine postal services privatized in 1997, was the world's
first privatization of an entire national postal services system. In early 1999, IFC collaborated
with IDB to raise a US$258 million financing package for Correo that should help keep the
Argentine system's expansion on schedule well into the following decade. This financing
came at a difficult time in the financial markets when commercial banks were reluctant to take
new exposures in the emerging markets after the devaluation of the BrazilianReal. IFC and
IDB jointly provided a US$138 million loan from their own account and arranged a total of
US$108 million from commercial banks. IFC also invested US$12 million in equity and
quasi-equity of the company.

A description of SMMC is presented in Box 7.

-18-

49. 
Strategy implementation. IFC activity has. been making a strong impact both in
aggregate value and in supporting priority sectors. During 1997-1999, IFC provided US$1,443
million (including syndications) to the Argentine private sector -- the largest amount among
official sources of finance to the private sector. The distribution of these investments followed
IFC's strategic priorities prior to this CAS: export-oriented industries, financial sector
development, middle-market firms, infrastructure, and social services. During the period, IFC
has also had good experiences in supporting a number of "frontier" projects (see also Box 6).

Annex A

Table 9
IFC Investment Approvals in Argentina by sector
FY 1997-1999, gross
# Projects 
12 
1655
9 

| 

Food and Agribusiness 
Financial Services 
Manufacturing and Services 

Infrastructure 

Social Services 

Oil and Gas 
Total 

4202

1 

1 
38 

million
234

337

11

s

1,443

50. 
Areas of focus: domestic financial markets. Lack of intermediation to the private
sector is a core issue in Argentina. As noted earlier, the issue is closely associated with the
Government's fiscal requirements and the related levels of interest rates. However, with the
Fiscal Responsibilities Law in place, this issue could be alleviated in the future, with a reduction
in the absolute level of interest rates. In this context, IFC will continue to help Argentina broaden
and deepen domestic intermediation particularly through capital markets. Again, an emphasis
will be given to activities which support the currently disadvantaged segment of the private
sector, or which have a broad impact.

51. While IFC has historically engaged in several operations with the Argentine banking
sector, it is expected that these will become more limited. As most large banks are now under
foreign ownership, IFC assistance to Argentine banks would be limited to inducing these banks to
engage in high-impact, under-served areas (e.g. rural finance). 
IFC's focus will shift to
supporting building non-bank institutions. 
IFC recently approved a secondary mortgage
securities market project, which is the first large-scale housing finance operation and which will

Box 7 - IFC Housing Finance projects

In October 1999, IFC approved a project to create Argentina's first major secondary
mortgage market company (SMMC), which specializes in asset backed securitization, and
to mobilize complementary funding for Banco Hipotecario (BH) -- the Argentine mortgage
bank which was privatized in January 1999 -- to originate and warehouse mortgages for
eventual sale to SMMC. With this project, IFC aims at an impact on the Argentine market
similar to Fannie Mae's and Freddie Mac's on the US market since 1970. IFC would
eventually provide for the purpose of this project up to a total of US$200 million for its
own account and support the raising of an additional US$1.15 billion.

The project will bring best international practices and technology to the mortgage market
in Argentina, and is expected to: (i) improve the affordability of housing and lower the cost
of mortgage loans by making longer term funding available; (ii) develop the Argentine
capital markets by making mortgage backed securities available for domestic institutional
investors, (iii) develop the primary mortgage market by improving the efficiency of loan
origination and standardization; and (iv) strengthen the banking sector by enhancing the
liquidity of mortgage loans.

- 19-

Annex A

have a large impact on the general population (see Box 7). IFC is also helping extend available
maturities from banks for middle-market companies through a liquidity backstop facility, which
enables these companies to finance long-term investment (ALEF). IFC continues to look for
opportunities in leasing, private equity funds and other capital market institutions, which would
support growth in the middle-market and SME sectors.

52. 
Infrastructure. Major infrastructure privatization at the Federal level has been virtually
completed, and IFC expects that there will be little demand for multilateral support at this level.
IFC expects its role in private infrastructure in Argentina to shift to supporting projects at
Provincial or municipal levels. It is much more difficult to obtain private financing for
infrastructure projects at these levels, as they involve sub-sovereign risks with which intemational
financial markets are often not comfortable. Here again, IFC is focusing on "frontier" projects or
projects with innovative features that could be replicated and IFC's experiences with which could
be transferred to other countries. Priority also goes to areas where the private sector is attempting
to deliver services previously delivered exclusively through the public sector. Success in these
areas will help address the perception that only a small minority benefits from liberalization and
reform. The priorities under this category include water and sanitation, transport (including urban
transport), and financing structures that can address sub-sovereign risks.

53. 
Education and Health. IFC expects to continue to expand its activities in this area in
Argentina. As noted earlier, the development of the social sectors is critical for a broad sharing
of benefits of reforms. As noted earlier, education, in particular, has a major role to play in
providing a firm foundation for potential areas of higher growth, such as information technology
and high value-added activities. IFC has already provided financing for two private universities
and a hospital. In order to enhance its activities in the social sector globally, IFC has recently
created a Social Sector Department. The knowledge and experience that IFC has gained in
Argentina will be transferred to other regions; at the same time, IFC expects to remain active in
Argentina to support transactions in this "frontier" area. Further investments are likely in: private
universities and hospitals, secondary education, vocational schools, and a number of ancillary
services as well. The latter may include, for example: distance learning, medical equipment
leasing, and medical supplies.

54. Middle-market firms and SMEs. IFC continues to support firms that are too small to
attract foreign capital, are likely to create substantial employment, and are investing to improve or
maintain international competitiveness. Private sector consultations during the CAS preparation
process have also highlighted the role IFC can play in strengthening the corporate governance of
middle-market companies. IFC will consider direct financing support for these middle-market
firms, while financing support for the SME sector will more likely take the form of supporting
further development of domestic financial intermediaries, especially the type of institutions (such
as leasing companies) which focus on SMEs.

55. 
Information technology. IFC will explore opportunities in supporting another "frontier"
area of growth, information technology. IFC expects to provide support in this area primarily
through support for education. Direct investment support may be provided primarily through
SBEM, an investment vehicle jointly established by Softbank of Japan and IFC, and co-
investment with SBEM.

56. 
Credit Enhancement. As noted earlier, today's market conditions have amplified
differential access to extemal financing among borrowers in different risk classes. Even with
borrowers with potential access, financing spreads require much wider differentiation for lower
quality borrowers. This would likely increase demand for guarantees and other risk enhancement
products that could help borrowers gain access, or significantly lower spreads, by helping step up

- 20 -

risk ratings (particularly to an investment grade), and would call for a new role for multilateral
institutions, such as IFC and MIGA, in providing such risk enhancement services.

Annex A

MIGA

57. MIGA's Activities and Country Exposure. Argentina is the second largest host
country for MIGA insured investments and it accounts for 11.1 percent of MIGA's total Gross
Exposure, and 8.3 percent of its net exposure. MIGA's operations are highly concentrated in the
financial sector, which account for 75 percent of MlGA's exposure in Argentina. The remaining
25 percent are in infrastructure (2.2 percent), mining (3.6 percent), oil and gas (17 percent), and
services (2.7 percent). Between FY92 and March 31, 2000, MIGA has issued 28 guarantees for a
total amount of US$747 million. As of March 31, 2000 MIGA's outstanding portfolio in
Argentina consists of 20 contracts of guarantee with a US$456.8 million Gross Exposure, of
which MIGA's Net Exposure is US$229 million. In addition, MIGA has insured another US$62
million through its Cooperative Underwriting Program. The total amount of Foreign Direct
Investment facilitated to date by MIGA in Argentina is close to US$3 billion.

58. MIGA will be facing capacity constraints in Argentina in the next few years, with only
about US$170 remaining in gross capacity. Taking into consideration its Treaty Reinsurance
Agreement, MIGA's guarantee limit for Argentina is US$620 million, and its per project limit is
US$200 million. However, through its Cooperative Underwriting Program (CUP) and facultative
reinsurance, MIGA could raise substantial additional capacity in the private market.

Box 8 - MIGA's Activities in the Financial Sector

MIGA has insured 13 operations in the financial sector for a total coverage of US$561 million.
Currently, there are ten active contracts. Gross exposure in the financial sector amounts to
US$404 million, including US$45 million under the CUP program: US$270 million is in
general banking, US$90 million in leasing, and US$43 million in mortgage. By insuring
leasing operations MIGA has been able to support both the agribusiness sector and small- and
medium-sized enterprises. MIGA's guarantee for a US$50 million investment by Rabobank
Curacao, N.V. of the Netherlands allowed the establishment of a subsidiary to provide
commercial and financial support to the food, agribusiness and healthcare industries. Support is
provided through financial services such as leasing, factoring, and field warehousing, and
commercial services such as purchase and export, to support infrastructure development and
transaction cycles in the agribusiness sector, notably in the oilseeds, dairy, fruit, cotton, leather
and wine industries. The latest guarantee issued in Argentina was for a US$100 million
investment by Citibank to finance long-term leasing of moveable equipment, focusing onSMEs
in the agricultural and financial sectors.

59. MIGA's Investment Marketing Services. MlGA's investment marketing services have
been quite active in Argentina. Local authorities are being assisted in improving the framework
for attracting FDI; and more than 80 Argentine organizations use IPAnet, the Investment
Promotion Network. IPAnet harnesses the functionalities and information resources of the
Internet to exchange information about investment worldwide. In FY99, MIGA conducted two
workshops on best practice in attracting foreign direct investment, in Mar DelPlata, San Rafael
de Mendoza. The workshop focused on investment strategy, building successful partnerships,
and the tools and techniques required for effective investment promotion. This was the first time
that MIGA provided its investment marketing services to sub-national entities.

60. 
Areas of Priorities. In the next few years MIGA plans to diversify its activities in
Argentina, in order to reduce its exposure in the financial sector. Nonetheless, it plans to

- 21 -

Annex A

continue activities in the financial sector, given the country's need for financial intermediation,
especially focusing on financial sector operations supporting SMEs and housing finance, and
potentially the health sector by supporting projects such as medical equipment leasing operations.
MIGA is planning to be active in sectors such as water and sanitation, power, transport,
manufacturing and others in need of foreign direct investment, all this within the context of the
CAS objectives. Investors are expressing interest in MIGA's coverage for investments in the
following sectors: banking, oil and gas, real estate, and infrastructure. In addition, MIGA will
also seek to support Argentinean investments in other developing countries both through its
guarantee program and IPAnet. Investment marketing services will continue their assistance to
the provinces. Given MIGA's own country limitations, high selectivity will be crucial in order to
maximize its support to meet Argentina's development challenges.

-22 

-

Annex A2 - Page 1 of 2

Argentina at a glance 

9/12/00

Latin 
Upper-
America middle-
Argentina & Carib. 
Income 

POVERTY and SOCIAL 

Developmentdimond

1999

Population, mid-year (millions) 

36.6 

509 

573 

Life expectancy

GNP per capita (Atlas method, US$) 

7,600 

3,840 

4,900

GNP (Atlas method, USS billions) 

277.9 

1,955 

2,811

Average annual growth, 1993-99

Population (%) 

1.3 
2.1 

1.6 

14

Labor force (%) 

2.5 

2.1 

GNP 
per 
capita 

Gross
Primary
nrollment

Moat recent estimate (lateat year available, 1993-99) 
Poverty (% of population below nabional poverty line) 

168

Urban populabon (% of total population) 

90 

75 

76

Life expectancy at birth (years) 
Infant mortality (per 1,000 live births) 

73 
19 

70 
31 

70
27

Child malnutrition (% of children under 5) 

2 

8 

7 

Access to safe water

Access to improved water source (¶6 of population) 
Illiteracy (% of populaton age 15+) 
Gross primary enrollment (% of school-age population) 
Male 
Female

65s 
3 
1i1 
1 1 1 

75 
12 
113 

78
10
109 
-

-

Argentina
Upper-middle-income gmup

r 

-- 

KEY ECONOMIC RATIOS and LONG-TERM TRENDS

1979 
69.3 
25.9 
6.5 
26.0 
25.2 

1989 
76.6 
15.5 
13.1 
22.0 
13.6 

1998 
298.1 
19.9 
10.4 
17.4 
15.1 
-4.8 
2.4 
47.1 
52.8 
SO. 5 0.
410.1 

1999
282.8
19.1 
9.8
17.4
14.8

Economic ratios,

GDP (USS billons) 
Gross domestic investmenVGDP 
Exports of goods and services/GDP 
Gross domestic savingstGDP 
Gross natonal savings/GDP 

Trade

Currant account balance/GDP 
Interest payments/GDP 

-0.8 

-1.7 

4.3 

Domestc

1.4 
30.2 
22.7 

2.0 
85.6 
36.4 

2.8 
51.2
69.6

Savings c 

Investment

Total debt/GDP 
Total debt service/exports 

Present value of debt/GDP 
Present value of debtexports 

-

Indebtedness

197949 1989-99 

1998 

199 199943

(average annual growth)

GDP 
GNP per capita 
Exports of goods and services 

-0.4 
-2.4 

5.0 
4.1 

3.9 
2.4 

-3.1 
4.1 

3.8 
29 

i 

Argentina
Upper-mniddle-income 
group

, 

2.5 

8.9 

10.1 

-1.1 

41

STRUCTURE of the ECONOMY

1979 

1989 

1998 

1999 

Growth of investment and GDP(%)

(% of GDP)

Agniculture 
Industry 
Manufacturing 
Services 
Pnvate consumption 
Generalgovemmentconsumplion 
Importsofgoodsandservices 

7.8 
44.0 
32.7 

9.6 
42.3 
30.9 

5.7 
28.7 
19.1 

4.6 
28.3 
18.2 

30
20 N

, io
67.1 ' D 

48.2 

48.0 

65.6 

-i 

-6

Pnvate consumption 

~~~~~~ ~~~~~~~~~~~~.1O.4 

93 

94 N 

6 

9 

63.0 
11.0 
6.3 

73.5 
4.5 
6.6 

70.7 
11.9 
12.9 

69.7 
12.9 
11.5 

20 -

_GD 

-GDP

D

197949 19899-9 

1998 

1999 GrowthofexportsandImports(%)

(average annual grow)th)

Agriculture 
Industry 
Manufacturing 

0.5 

4.0 

10.3 

-0.5 

TO
so

-1. 

4.6 

3.2 

-s 1 
-6.9 1 40
-1.4 
-4.2 

-0.9 

3.6 

1.6 

Services 

0.5 

5.0 

4.7 
1Z1 

30

Private consumption 

3.8 

la

General govemment consumption 

1.3 
9.3 
19.6 

-1.1 
6.6 
8.4 

1.2
-7.6 
-11.2 

Gross domestc investment 
Imports of goods and services 
Gross national product 

-4.6 

10 

93 

94 

99 

97 

9

-5.4 
-1.0 

Exports 

*-Imports

5.4 

3.5 

-3.3

Note: 1999 data are preliminary estmates.
The diamonds show four key indicators in the country (in bold) compared with its income-group average. If data are missing, the diamond will
be incomplete

Annex A2 - Page 2 of 2

Argentina

1979 

1989 

1998 

1999 

In1aton (%)

159.5 3,066.3 
147.4 3,057.6 

0.9 
-2.0 

-2.2 
-2.2 

I
1 207
20
15

PRICES and GOVERNMENT FINANCE

Domestic prices 

(% change) 

Consumer prices 
Implicit GDP deflator 

Annex B2
Page 1 of 1

CAS Annex B2 - Argentina
Selected Indicators of Bank Portfolio Performance and Management

Indicator 

Portfolio Assessment
Number of Projects Under Implementation a 
Average Implementation Period (years) b 
Percent of Problem Projects by Number a. C 
Percent of Problem Projects by Amount a, c 
Percent of Projects at Risk by Number a, d 
Percent of Projects at Risk by Amount d 
Disbursement Ratio (%) O 
Portfolio Management
CPPR durng the year (yes/no) 
Supervision Resources (total US$ 000) 
Average Supervision (US$/project) 

1997 

34 
2.51 
5.88 
4.75 
14.71 
14.63 
14.45 

Yes 
4,255 
81 

1998 

1999 

42 
2.58 
11.9 
14.32 
19.05 
18.65 
20.87 

Yes 
4,753 
74 

44 
2.81 
4.55 
7.45 
6.82 
8.76 
22.51 

Yes 
4,865 
77 

2000

39
3.33
12.82
9.29
17.95
12.33
18.06

Yes
4,745
77

Memorandum Item 
Proj Eval by OED by Number 
Proj Eval by OED by Amt (US$ millions) 
% of OED Projects Rated U or HU by Number 
% of OED Projects Rated U or HU by Amt 

Since FY 80 Last Five FYs
49 
14
7743.12 
2780.47
31.3 
7.14
28.66 
3.82

a. As shown in the Annual Report on Portfolio Performance (except for current FY).
b. Average age of projects in the Bank's country portfolio.
c. Percent of projects rated U or HU on development objectives (DO) and/or implementation progress (IP).
d. As defined under the Portfolio Improvement Program.
e. Ratio of disbursements during the year to the undisbursed balance of the Bank's portfolio at the
beginning of the year: Investment projects only.

Annex B3 - Page 1 of 2

CAS Annex B3 - Bank Group Program 
Summary

Argentina

Proposed IBRD/IDA Base-Case Lending
Program a

Fiscal year Project 

USS(M) 

Strategic Rewards b 
(H/M/L) 

Implementation b
Risks (H/A/L)

2001 

2002 

2003 

2004 

Buenos Aires Social Reform BASAL(PRL4) 
Cordoba Provincial Reform (PRL5) 
BA SECONDARY EDUC II 
Santa Fe Provincial Reform (PRL6) 
Gender LIL 
Education 
Result 

Social Protect 5 (SYNTyS II) 
Urban Infrastructure 
Integrated Health 
Private Infrastructure Financing 
APL2 WTR SCTR II 
Provincial Development III 
Prov Reform 7 
Result 

Rural Poverty 
Urban Poverty 
Municipal Reform 
Judicial Reform 
Sust. Fisheries 2 
Result 

Watershed Pilot 
Teacher Training 
APL2 WTR SCTR III 
Rural Infrastructure 
Result 

Total 

H 
M 
M 
M 
M 
H 

M 
M 
H 
H 
M 
M 
M 

H 
H 
H 
M 
H 

H 
M 
M 
M 

400.0 
300.0 
50.0 
150.0 
5.0 
200.0 
1,105.0

30.0 
175.0 
150.0 
150.0 
40.0 
150.0 
250.0 
945.0

75.0 
200.0 
300.0 
50.0 
50.0 
675.0

35.0 
100.0 
40.0 
100.0 
275.0

3,000.0

H
M
L
M
L
H

L
H
H
M
M
M
M

M
H
H
M
M

M

H

M
M

Annex B3
Page 2 of 2

CAS Annex B3 (IFC & MIGA) for Argentina

Argentina - IFC and MIGA Program, FY 1997-2000
1997 1998 1999 2000

IFC approvals (US$m) 

228.10 169.55 347.65 284.0

Sector (%)
CEMENT & CONSTRUCTION 
FINANCIAL SERVICES 
FOOD & AGRO-BUSINESS 
INFRASTRUCTURE 
MANUFACTURING 
MINING & METALS 
MINING & MINERALS 
SOCIAL SERVICES 
TIMBER, PULP & PAPER 
Total 

Investment instrument(%)
Loans 
Equity 
Quasi-Equity 
Other 
Total 

35 
43 
4 

18 

61 
11 

9 

19 

13 
25 
8
33 
3
14
1
3

100 

100 

100 

66.20 
2.02 
16.44 
15.34 
100 

66 
21 
12 
1 
100 

66 
9 
22 
3 
100 

7
79

9

5
100

76
19
4
1
100

MIGA guarantees (US$m) 

49.0 83.1 340.1 45.0

CAS Annex B4 - Summary of Nonlending 
Services -

Product 

Completion FY 

Recent completions
Poverty Assessment 
FY00 
Fisheries Study 
FY00 
Labor Markets & Unemployment FY00 
Anti-Corruption 
FY00 
Policy Options 
FY00 
Water Resources 
FY00 
Prov Finance 
FY00 
Social Protection Framework 
FY00 
Judicial Sector Assessment 
FY00 
Traffic Safety 
FY00 
Competitiveness 
FY00 

Underway
Municipal Finance & Services 
Social Sector Institutions 
Social Capital 
Rural Reproductive Health 
Coping with Econ Crises 

FY01 
FY01 
FY01 
FY01 
FY01 

Planned
Transport/Infrastructure Assessment FY01 
Evaluation of Food Programs and
Job Retraining 
Non-Formal Education 
Provincial Finance 
Disaster Insurance 
Rural Infrastructure 
Financial Sector Update 
Small and Medium Size Firms 
Regional Inequalities 
Provincial Finances 
Financial Sector update 
Poverty Assessment 
Mercosur Trade 
Provincial Finance 
Policy Notes 
Competitiveness 

FY01 
FY01 
FY01 
FY01 
FY02 
FY02 
FY02 
FY02 
FY02 
FY03 
FY03 
FY03 
FY03 
FY04 
FY04 

a. Govemment, donor, Bank, public dissemination.
b. Knowledge generation, public debate, problem-solving.

Annex B4
Page 1 of I

Argentina

Cost 
(US$000)

Audience' 

Objective0

$332 
$133 
$70 
$125 
$73 
$207 
$18 
$120 
$35 
$95 
$100 

$285 
$200 
$200 
$95 
$170 

G,B,P 
G,B,P 
G,B,P 
G,B 
G,P 
G,B 
G,B 
G,B 
G,B 
G,B 
G,B 

G,B 
G,B 
G,B 
G,B,P 
G,B 

$200 

G,B 

$200 
$100 
$50 
$100 
$200 
$50 
$200 
$100 
$50 
$50 
$285 
$50 
$50 
$100 
$100 

G,B,P 
G,B 
G,B 
G,B,P 
G,B 
G,B 
G,B,P 
G,B,P 
G,B 

G,B 

G,B,P 
G,B 
G,B 
G,B,P 
G,B 

Kg,Pd,Ps
Ps
Pd
Kg,Ps
Ps
Kg,Ps
Kg,Ps
Kg
Kg
Kg
Kg

Kg
Kg
Kg
Pd,Ps
Kg

Kg, Ps

Ps
Kg,Ps
Kg
Pd,Ps
Kg
Kg
Kg,Ps
Kg
Kg
Kg,Ps
Kg,Pd
Kg
Kg
Pd
Kg,Ps

Annex B5 - Page 

1 of 1

Argentina Social Indicators

POPULATION
Total population, mid-year (millions) 
Growth rate (% annual average) 
Urban population (% of populatibn) 
Total fertility rate (births per woman) 

POVERTY
(% of population)
National headrount index 
Urban headcount index
Rural headcount index
INCOME
GNP per capita (US$) 
Consumer prce index (1995=100) 
Fod price index (1995=100) 
INCOMEICONSUMPTION DISTRIBUTION
Gini index
Lowest quintile (% of income or consumption) 
Highest quintile (% of income or consumption) 
SOCIAL INDICATORS
Public expenditure

Health (% of GDP) 

Educabon (% of GNP) 
Social security and welfare (0A of GDP) 
Net primary school enrollment rate
(% of age group)
Total 
Male 
Female 
Access to safe water
(% of population)
Total 
Urban 

Rural 

Immunization rate
(% under 12 months)

Measles 

DPT 

Child malnutrition (% under 5 years) 

Life expectancy at birth
(years)
Total 
Male 
Female 

Mortality

Infant (per thousand live births) 
Under S (per thousand live births) 
Adult (15-49)
Male (per 1,000 population) 
Female (per 1,000 population) 

Matemal (per 100,000 live births) 

Latest single year 

Same regionlincome group

1970-75 

195045 

1993-98 

Latin America & 
Caribbean 

26.0 
1.7 
80.7 
3.2 

30.3 
1.5 
84.8 
3.2 

501.7 
14 
74.5 
2.7 

36.1 
1.1 
89.3 
2.6 

17.6

Upper.

middle-
income

5861
1.2
76.6
2 4

2,680 
0 

4.4
50.3

1.8 

96 
96 
97 

67 
64 
71 

48 
71 

212 
116 

2,650 
0 
0 

8,030 
102 
99

3,860 
130 

4,870
122

1.5 
5.8 

96 
95 
97 

55 
63 

17 

67 

63 

70 
67 
74 

32 
38 

205 
102 

4.0 
3.5 
8.0 

100 
100 
100 

65
71

24

98 

85 

2

73 
70 
77 

19 
22 

163 
79 

38

33 

3.6 
7.4 

94 
95 
93 

93 

82 

70 
67 
73 

31 
38 

216 
116 

33

50
7.9

96
97
95

92

82

71
67
74

26
31

210
110

2000 World Development Indicators CD-ROM, World Bank

Annex B6 - Page 

1 of 2

Annex B6

Argentina - Key Economic Indicators

Estimate 
1999 

Projected
2001 
2002 

Indicator 
National accounts (as % of GDP)
Gross domestic product 
Agriculture 
Industry 
Services 

1995 

1996 

1997 

1998 

2000 

2003

100.0 
5.7 
28.0 
66.3 

100.0 
6.0 
28.4 
65.6 

100.0 
5.6 
29.1 
65 3 

100.0 
5.7 
28.7 
65.6 

100.0 
4.6 
28.3 
67.1 

100.0 
5.0 
28.3 
66.7 

100.0 
5.2 
29.0 
65 9 

100.0 
5.2 
29.0 
65.9 

100,0
5.2
29.0
65.9

Total Consumption 
Grossdomesticfixedinvestment 
Govemment investment 
Privateinvestment 
(includes increase in stocks)
Exports(GNFS)b 
Imports(GNFS) 

82.4 
17.9 
1.2 
16.7 

82.5 
18.1 
1.3 
16.8 

82.8 
194 
1.3 
181 

82.6 
19.9 
1 3 
186 

82.6 
19.1 
1 1 
17.9 

82.2 
19.5 
1.1 
18.4 

81 S 
20.0 
I I 
189 

80.9 
204 
1.1 
193 

80.0
20.8
1.1
19.8

9.7 
10.1 

10.5 
11.1 

10.6 
127 

104 
12.9 

9.8 
11.5 

114 
13.1 

12.2 
13.7 

13.1 
144 

13.7
14.6

Grossdomesticsavings 
Gross national savings' 

17.6 
16.0 

17.5 
15.7 

17.2 
15.3 

17.4 
15.1 

17.4 
14.8 

17.8 
15.2 

18.5 
15.7 

19.1 
16.3 

20.0
17.1

Memorandum 
items
Grossdomestic product 
(US$ million at current prices)
GNP per capita (USS. Atlas method) 

258032 

272150 

292859 

298131 

282769 

292708 

310468 

328676 

347951

7380 

7750 

8140 

8020 

7600 

7735 

7987 

8232 

8484

Real annual growth rates (%, calculated at 1993 prices)
Gross domestic productatmarketprices 
-2.8 
Gross Domestic Income 
-2.8 

5.5 
5.5 

8 1 
8.1 

3,9 
3.9 

-3.0 
-3.0 

3.0 
3.0 

4 5 
45 

4.3 
4.3 

4.3
43

Real annual per capita growth rates (%, calculated from 1993 prices)
Gross domestic product at market prices 
-4 1 
4 2 
Total consumption 
-4.8 
4,6 
Private consumption 
-5.6 
5.3 

6.7 
6.5 
7.4 

2 6 
2.0 
2.7 

-4.0 
-3.4 
-4.2 

1.7 
0.1 
1.8 

3.5 
29 
4,1 

3.5 
2.8 
3.0 

3.5
2.7
3.3

Balance of Payments (USS millions)

Exports (GNFS)b 
Merchandise FOB 
Imports (GNFS)b 
Merchandise FOB 
Resource balance 
Net current transfers 
Current account balance 

25016 
21161 
25985 
18804 
-969 
513 
-4938 

28471 
24043 
30077 
22283 
-1606 
416 
-6468 

30940 
26431 
37241 
28554 
-6301 
436 
-12036 

31123 
26441 
38568 
29558 
-7445 
388 
-14392 

27758 
23315 
32557 
24144 
4799 
394 
-12252 

32809 
27923 
38683 
30019 
-5874 
406 
-13520 

37004 
31775 
42336 
33411 
-5332 
424 
-13929 

41582 
36128 
46389 
37081 
-4808 
442 
-14081 

45745
40057
49609
39900
-3864
461
-13724

Net private foreign direct investment 
Long-term loans (net) 
Official 
Private 
Othercapital(ne,incl. crrors& onissions) 
Change in reservesd 

2994 
-226 
1404 
-1630 
2068 
102 

4866 
5736 
-42 
5778 
-252 
-3882 

4228 
11747 
-143 
11890 
-666 
-3273 

3940 
13274 
545 
12729 
616 
-3438 

7294 
6347 
-113 
6460 
-187 
-1201 

7000 
8500 
138 
8362 
-791 
-1189 

6900 
7510 
90 
7420 
843 
-1324 

7700 
7564 
-1516 
9080 
288 
-1471 

7921
6592
-669
7261
846
-1636

Memorandum 
items
Resource balance (O of GDP) 
Real annual growth rates (1993 prices)
Merchandiseexports 
(FOB) 
Primary 
Manufactures 
Merchandise 
imports (CIF) 

-0.4 

-0.6 

-2.2 

-2.5 

-1.7 

-2.0 

-1 7 

-1.5 

-1 I

25.3 
23.4 
26.8 
-11.4 

6.4 
15 6 
-0.1 
19.9 

13.9 
-6.2 
21.2 
31.3 

11.4 
10 7 
11.2 
8.7 

-2.6 
-23.7 
4.3 
-17.0 

12.0 
14.6 
11.9 
9.0 

90 
89 
9 0 
60 

8.7 
8.8 
8.7 
5.7 

87
6 1
8.7
57

(Continued)

Annex B6 - Page 

2 of 2

Argentina - Key Economic Indicators
(Continued)

Indicator 

1995 

1996 

1997 

1998 

Estimate 
1999 

Projected

2000 

2001 2002 2003

Public finance (as % of GDP at market prices)'
Current revenues 
19.0 
Currentexpenditures 
18.8 
Current account surplus (+) or deficit(-) 
0.2 
Capital expenditure 
1 2 
Foreign financing 
1.7 

16.9 
17.8 
-0.9 
1.3 
2.3 

18.4 
18.8 
-0 4 
13 
3.0 

18.8 
19.1 
-0.3 
1.3 
2.3 

19.3 
209 
-1.5 
1 1 
3 4 

19 3 
199 
-0 6 
1.1 
3.5 

19.1 
19.0 
0.1 
1.1 
1 1 

18.8 
18.1 
0 7 
1.1 
0.7 

18 8
17.8
1.0
1.1
0.1

Monetary indicators
M2/GDP 
Growth ofM2(%) 
Private sector creditgrowth/ 
total credit growth (%)

Price indices( 1993 =100)
Merchandiseexportprice index 
Merchandise import price index 
Merchandise terms of trade index 
Real exchange rate (USS/LCU)f 

Real interest rates
Consumer price index (% change) 
GDP deflator (% change) 

20.8 
-4.3 
-21 7 

23.7 
200 
98.2 

27 9 
269 
106.7 

30.4 
106 
129.6 

32.6 
18 
142.0 

32.9 
46 
91.0 

33.2 
7.1 
115 9 

33 6 
69 
117.5 

33.6
59
1190

1088 
106.9 
101.8 
48 17 

115.9 
105.6 
109.8 
48.23 

111.9 
103.2 
108.4 
48.23 

100.5 
97.9 
102 7 
48 19 

870 
91.3 
95.3 
46.18 

93 1 
98.5 
94.5 
45.67 

972 
103 4 
94.0 
45.20 

1016 
108.6 
93.6 
4477 

103.7
110.5
93.8
44 33

3.4 
3.2 

0.2 
-0.1 

0.5 
-0.5 

0.9 
-2.0 

-2.2 
-2.2 

1 4 
0.5 

1 4 
1.5 

1.5 
1.5 

1 5
1 5

a. GDP at factor cost
b "GNFS" denotes "goods and nonfactor services"
c. Includes net unrequited transfers excluding official capital grants.
d. Includes use of IMF resources.
e. Consolidated central govemment.
f "LCU" denotes "local currency units." An increase in USS/LCU denotes appreciation.

Annex B7 - Page 

1 of 1

Annex B7

Argentina - Key Exposure Indicators

Actual 
1996 

Estimate Projected
1999 
2000 

Indicator 

1994 

1995 

1997 

1998 

2001 

2002 

2003

Total debtoutstanding and 
disbursed (TDO) (USSm)'

85656 

98547 

109756 124696 

140489 144657 

148825 

157613 

166667 

175819

Net disbursements (USSm)' 

13447 

12891 

11209 14940 

15793 

4168 

4168 

8788 

9054 

9152

Total debt service (TDS) 

5865 

12360 

15883 19867 

19582 23549 

27327 

33566 

33952 

33430

(USSm)W

Debt and debt service indicators

(%)

TDO/XGSb 
TDO/GDP 
TDS/XGS 
Concessional/TDO

342 4 
33.2 
30.2 

346.1 
36.2 
49.4 

354.7 
37.5 
55.8 

400 7 
41.8 
64.2 

506.1 
49.7 
62.9 

4409 
494 
84,8 

402.2 
47.9 
83.3 

379.0 
48.0 
90.7 

364.3 
479 
81.7 

349.2
47.7
731

IBRD exposure indicators (%)
IBRD DS/public DS 
Preferred creditor DS/public 
DS (%)'
IBRD DS/XGS 
IBRDTDO(USSm)d 
Of which present value of
guarantees (US$m)
ShareoflBRDportfolio(%) 
IDA TDO (USSm)d 

16.4 
45.5 

9.3 
32.4 

7.8 
25.6 

5.2 
17.1 

5.7 
18.7 

7.8 
22.7 

9.7 
27.8 

9.2 
25.4 

17.0 
33.4 

15.3
27.6

3.6 
4109 

2.3 
4913 

2.1 
5372 

2.1 
5494 

2.3 
7188 

4.2 
8552 

4.4 
9380 

4.4 
10082 

7.3 
9147 

6.8
8255

3.6 
0 

40 
0 

44 
0 

5.0 
0 

5.1 
0 

62 
0 

7.2 
0 

7.1 
0 

70 
0 

70
0

IFC(US$m) 
Loans 
Equity and quasi-equity 

487.0 
391 
96 

788.0 
655 
133 

799.0 
658 
141 

914.0 
628 
286 

880.0 
592 
288 

1019.0
716
303

/c 

MIGA
MIGA guarantees (USSrn) 

129 

150 

122 

169 

218

a. Includes public and publicly guaranteed debt, private nonguaranteed, use of IMF credits and net short-
temn capital.
b. "XGS" denotes exports of goods and services, including workers' remittances.
c. Preferred creditors are defined as IBRD, IDA, the regional multilateral development banks, the IMF, and the
Bank for Intemational Settlements.
d. Includes present value of guarantees.
e. Includes equity and quasi-equity types of both loan and equity instruments.

CAS Annex B8 - Argentina

Status of Bank Group Operations (Operations Portfolio)

Closed 54
Projects

Board
Date 
FiscalDeeomn 
Year Active Projects 

1987 
1991 
1993 
1993 
1995 
1995 
1995 
1996 
1996 
1996 
1996 
1996 
1996 
1996 
1996 
1997 
1997 
1997 
1997 
1997 
1997 
1997 
1997 
1998 
1998 
1998 
1998 
1998 
1998 
1998 

P005968 SEGBA V 
P005977 WTR SUPPLY II 
P006003 RD MAINT & REHAB SCT 
P006036 YACYRETA II 
P005992 AR-SECONDARY ED I 
P006060 MUNIC DEVT II 
P006018 PROV DEVT II 
P045687 AR-HEALTH INSURANCE TA 
P034091 AR-HIGHER ED. REFORM 
P006030 AR-PROV. HEALTH SECTOR 
P006057 AR-SECONDARY ED. 2 
P038883 ENT.EXPORT DV. 
P006040 
FORESTRY/DV 
P006055 MINING SCTR DEVT 
P037049 PUB.INV.STRENGTHG 
P043418 AR-AIDS AND STD CONTROL 
P006059 AR-MATERNAL & CHILD HLTH 
P039584 B.A.URB.TSP 
P006052 
FLOOD PROTECTION 
P040808 N.FOREST/PROTC 
P046821 
PENSION TA 
P006010 
PROVAGDEVTI 
P005980 PROV ROADS 
P050714 AR-SECONDARY EDUCATION 
P049269 AR-SOCIAL PROTECTION 3 
P055935 EL NINO EMERGENCY 
P055477 MINING TA 
P050713 MODEL COURT DEV. 
P052590 NAT HWY REHAB&MAINT 
P006050 POLLUTION MGT. 

Obves 
Ob ectives 
U 
S 
HS 
U 
S 
HS 
S 
S 
S 
S 
S 
S 
S 
HS 
S 
S 
S 
S 
S 
S 
U 
S 
S 
S 
S 
S 
S 
U 
S 
S 

a. Intended disbursements to date minus actual disbursements to date as projected at appraisal.

Last PSR 

Supervision Rating 
t~

Difference Between
Expected and Actual

OriginalAmountin USMillions 

Disbursements al

IBRD 

IDA 

Cancel. Undisb. 

Orig. Frm Rev'd

276 
100 
340 
0 
190 
210 
225 
25 
165 
101.4 
115.5 
0 
16 
30 
16 
15 
100 
200 
200 
19.5 
20 
125 
300 
119 
284 
42 
39.5 
5 
450 
18 

0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 

0 
36 
0 
0 
20 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
5.5 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 

35.89 
9.65 
13.76 
0 
43.67 
103.74 
103.46 
1.36 
76.54 
55.57 
72.93 
0 
8.57 
2.55 
7.57 
3.5 
64.67 
145.24 
171.82 
14.57 
8.81 
117.29 
275.83 
40.12 
111 
35.59 
17.56 
4.56 
311.49 
17.7 

35.89 
45.65 
13.27 
0 
63.67 
-34.25 
-4.03 
1.36 
74.54 
50.37 
57.83 
0 
1.67 
0.16 
12.06 
1.25 
-3.33 
55.24 
71.83 
-1.43 
6.37 
22.81 
143.83 
36.57 
111 
35.59 
17.56 
3.16 
176.24 
8.79 

0
9.65
0
0
36.51
0
0
0
65.54
0
0
0
0
0
0
0
0
0
4.82
0
0 
0
0
0 
0
6.09
0
0
0
0 

>

0

0

Proaress 
Progre-ss
U 
S 
HS 
U 
s 
HS 
HS 
S 
S 
S 
S 
S 
S 
HS 
S 
S 
HS 
S 
S 
S 
U 
S 
U 
S 
S 
S 
S 
S 
S 
S 

CAS Annex B8 - Argentina

Status of Bank Group Operations (Operations Portfolio)

Closed
Projects

Board
Date 
FiscalDeeomn 
Year Active Projects 

Last PSR 

Supervision Rating 
mt~
Development Implementation 

Difference Between
Expected and Actual

Original Amount in USS Millions 

Disbursements

IBRD 

IDA 

Cancel. Undisb. 

Orig. Frm Rev'd

1998 
1998 
1998 
1999 
1999 
1999 
1999 
1999 
1999 
1999 
1999 
2000 
2000 

P051695 
PROV REF II - RIO NEGRO 
P051694 
PROV REF II - SAN JUAN 
P006041 
SMALL FARMER DV. 
P058526 
AR-DRUG PREVENTION (LIL) 
P006058 
AR-SOCIAL PROTECTION 4 
P057449 
ARG YEAR 2000 
P006043 RENEW.ENERGY R.MKTS 
P055461 
SOC&FISC NTL ID SYS 
P062992 
SPEC REPURCHASE 
P062991 
SPECIAL SAL (SSAL) 
P006046 WATER SCTR RFRM 
P063388 
AR-HEALTH INSURANCE FOR 
P055482 
AR-PUB. HLTH. SURV. & DISE 

U 
S 
S 
S 
S 
U 
S 
HS 
S 
S 
S 
S 
S 

TOTAL 

U 
U 
S 
S 
S 
U 
S 
S 
S 
S 
S 
S 
S 

75 
50 
75 
4.75 
90.75 
30.3 
30 
10 
505.05 
2525.25 
30 
4.9 
52.5 

7230.4 

0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 

0 

0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
250 
0 
0 
0 

25.0 
15 
45.21 
4.7 
76.32 
27.45 
29.2 
7.25 
500 
500 
30 
4.9 
52.5 

75.0 
50 
17.77 
0.83 
2.66 
5.45 
1.5 
1.75 
0 
750 
4.5 
0.5 
1 

0
0
9.21
0
0
0
0
0
0
0
0
0
0

311.5 3192.54 

1914.63 

131.82

a. Intended disbursements to date minus actual disbursements to date as projected at appraisal. 

X

00

0

u

Argentina 
STATEMENT OF IFCIs
Held and Disbunred PortfoUo
As of March, 2000

Annex B8 - Page 

3 of 5

IFC Data Warehouse 

(Amounts In US Dollar Millions)

IFC Held 

-

IFC Disbursed-

FY Approval 

Company 

Loan 

Equity 

Quasi 

Partic 

Loan 

Equity 

Quasi 

Partic

1998 

Aceitera Chabas 

0.00 

0.00 

3.10 

0.00 

0.00 

0.00 
0.00 
16.43 
7.00 
6.05 

3.10 
6.90 
10.00 
0.00 
6.37 

0.00
0.00
40.44
137.12
48.79

1994 
Aceitera General 
1960/80t95/97199 Acindar 
1994/95/96 
Aguas 
1977/84/86/88/94/ Alpargatas 
96
1999 
1993 
1998 
1989/96 
1996/99 

8.75 
81.25 
56.73 
19.23 

0.00 
16.43 
7.00 
6.05 

. 6.90 
10.00 
0.00 
6.37 

0.00 
40.44 
137.12 
48.79 

8.75 
81.25 
56.73 
19.23 

American Plast 
ARG EQUITY INV. 
AUTCL 
Banco Frances 
Banco Galicia 

10.00 
0.00 
12.00 
4.10 
74.00 

0.00 
2.84 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 

0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 245.00 

10.00 
0.00 
6.00 
4.10 
74.00 

0.00 
2.84 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 

0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 

0.00
0.00
0.00
0.00
245.00

1997 
1995 
1996 

Banco Roberts 
Banco Roberts-CL 
Bansud 

10.00 
0.00 

0.00 
0.00 
0.00 

0.00 
20.00 
0.00 

0.00 
0.00 
0.00 

10.00 
0.00 
3.77 

0.00 
0.00 
0.00 

0.00 
20.00 
0.00 

0.00
0.00
0.00

3.77 

1994/99 
1996 
1988/93/94 
1989/96 
1999 
i 995 
1999 

BGN 
Brahma - ARG 
Bunge y Bom 
CAPSA 
CCI 
CEPA 
Correo Argentino 

12.00 
15.64 
1.06 
9.82 
0.00 
6.67 
63.00 

0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
20.00 
0.00 
0.00 

36.00 
0.00 
0.00 
5.00 
20.00 
3.00 
12.00 

0.00 
19.80 
8.02 
27.00 
0.00 
1.20 
0.00 

12.00 
15.64 
1.06 
9.82 
0.00 
6.67 
63.00 

0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
20.00 
0.00 
0.00 

36.00 
0.00 
0.00 
5.00 
6.00 
3.00 
12.00 

0.00
19.80
8.02
27.00
0.00
1.20
0.00

1994 

EDENOR 

9.75 

0.00 

15.00 

10.00 

9.75 

0.00 

15.00 

10.00

1998 
1998 
2000 
1992/93 
1997 
1996 
1997 
1998 
1992 
1995/97 

F.V. S.A. 
FAID 
FAPLAC 

12.00 
0.00 
10.00 

0.00 
2.75 
0.00 

4.00 
0.00 
5.00 

0.00 
0.00 
0.00 

12.00 
0.00 
10.00 

0.00 
2.75 
0.00 

4.00 
0.00 
5.00 

0.00
0.00
0.00

FEPSA 
FRIAR 
Grunbaum 
Guipeba 
Hospital Privado 
Huantraico 
Kleppe/Caldero 

3.30 
10.00 
6.00 
15.00 
9.60 
0.00 
10.21 

0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
27.00 
0.00 

2.00 
2.50 
2.00 
5.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 

1.47 
7.00 
3.33 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 

3.30 
10.00 
6.00 
15.00 
6.50 
0.00 
10.21 

0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 

2.00 
2.50 
2.00 
5.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 

1.47
7.00
3.33
0.00
0.00
0.00
0.00

1992193/96 
Malteria Pampa 
1996 
MBA 
1997/00 
Milkaut 
1978/81/86/87/91/ Minetti 
93/96/99/00
1993/94 

8.79 
0.00 
7.50 
47.50 

0.00 
0.16 
5.03 
0.00 

1.00 
0.00 
10.00 
14.00 

5.13 
0.00 
3.00 
119.09 

8.79 
0.00 
7.50 
47.50 

0.00 
0.16 
2.79 
0.00 

1.00 
0.00 
10.00 
14.00 

5.13
0.00
3.00
119.09

Molinos 

0.00 

5.55 

0.00 

0.00 

0.00 

5.55 

0.00 

0.00

1995 

Nahuelsat 

17.50 

5.00 

0.00 

0.00 

17.50 

5.00 

0.00 

0.00

Note: Vahes do not refled off-baace heet itenw 
hm JSch as guma and risk nungmnu pro&Ida.
LastDatUpdate: March31,2000 
Run Date: May01, 2000 

Page:I of 3

Argentina 
STATEMENT OF IFC's
Held and Disbured Portfolio

Annex B8 - Page 

4 of 5

IFC Data Warehoue 

As of March,2000 

(Amounts In US Dollar Millions)

IFC Held 

IFC Disbured

FY Approval 

Company 

Loan 

Equity 

Quasi 

Partic 

Loan 

Equity 

Quasi 

Partic

1996/99 
1993 
1992 

Neuquen Basin 
Nuevo Central 
Oleaginosa Oeste 

0.00 
3.75 
2.29 

31.40 
3.00 
0.00 

0.00 
0.00 
3.75 

0.00 
5.00 
0.92 

0.00 
3.75 
2.29 
20.16 
5.00 
0.00 

18.36 
3.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
7.08 

0.00 
0.00 
3.75 
0.00 
1.00 
0.00 

0.00

5.00
0.92
24.61
0.00
0.00

1992/95 
1998 
1998 
1990/94 
1994 
1996 
1992 

PAE - Argentine 
Patagonia 
Patagonia Fund 

20.16 
5.00 
0.00 

0.00 
0.00 
24.97 

0.00 
1.00 
0.00 

24.61 
0.00 
0.00 

Petroken 
Quilmes 
Refisan 
Rioplatense 

19.39 
7.93 
14.55 
5.33 

0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
1.00 

5.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 

3.65 
3.75 
18.00 
1.67 

19.39 
7.93 
14.55 
5.33 

0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
1.00 

5.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 

3.65
3.75
18.00
1.67

1999 
1995 
1996 

S.A. San Miguel 
SanCor 
SIDECO 

11.07 
13.75 
0.00 

0.00 
0.00 
15.00 

0.00 
20.00 
0.00 

0.00 
12.00 
0.00 

11.07 
13.75 
0.00 

0.00 
0.00 
15.00 

0.00 
20.00 
0.00 

0.00
12.00
0.00

1995 

Socma 
Suquia 
T61 
Terminal 6 
Terminales Port. 
Tower Fund 
Tower Fund Mgr 

12.51 
35.00 
10.00 
16.56 
8.50 
0.00 
0.00 

0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
2.00 
15.73 
0.14 

0.00 
10.00 
5.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 

30.00 
25.00 
26.25 
14.62 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 

12.51 
35.00 
10.00 
16.56 
8.50 
0.00 
0.00 

0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
2.00 
14.07 
0.13 

0.00 
10.00 
5.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 

30.00
25.00
26.25
14.62
0.00
0.00
0.00

1997/98/99 
1997 
1987/89/90/96/97 
1995 
1995 
1995 

1994/96/97 
1998 
1997 
1993 
1996 

Transconor 
U.Belgrano 
Vicentin 
Yacylec 
Zanon 

24.46 
7.00 
22.19 
5.50 
11.67 

0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
5.04 

19.08 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 

187.18 
0.00 
7.00 
6.09 

24.46 
0.00 
22.19 
5.50 

0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
5.04 

19.08 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 

187.18
0.7, 
7.00
6.09

0.00 

6.00 

0.00 

11.67 

0.00 

6.00 

0.00

Total Portfolio: 

811.77 196.09 252.70 1,042.14 

795.67 134.26 238.70 1,042.14

| Approvals Pendin Commitment

FY Approval 

Project Name 
ALEF 
American Plast 
Argentina SMMC 
Biopork 
Cefas 

Loan 

Equity 

Quasi 

Partic

2000 
1999 
2000 
1999 
2000 

25.00 
0.00 
100.00 
5.20 
10.00 

0.00 
0.35 
50.00 
0.00 
0.00 

0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
2.00 
5.00 

150.00
0.00
450.00
5.00
0.00

1999 
1999 
2000 

Dl TELLA 
Galicia BLINC 
Hipotecario USCP 
U.Belgrano 

9.00 
0.00 
50.00 

0.00 
0.00 
0.00 

0.00 
0.00 
0.00 
0.00 

0.00
75.00
250.00

1998 

15.00 

0.00 

0.00

Note: Values do not reflea off-blance shed item sch as guarantee and risk mgement 

producta

LAst Data Update: March 31, 2000 

Run Date: May01.2000 

Pagc:2 of3

IFC Data Warehouse 

Argentina 
STATEMENT OF IFC's
Held and Disbursed Portfolio
As of March, 2000

Approvals Pendina Commitment

Annex B8 - Page 

5 of 5

(Amounts In US Dollar Millions)

FY Approval 

Project Name 

Loan Equity 

Quasi 

Partic

1999 

Unisoy 

5.00 

0.00 

2.00 

4.00

Total Pending: 

219.20 

50.35 

9.00 934.00

Note: Values do not refled off4blance shed items such as guaate 
Last Data Update: March 31, 2000 

and risk mnmagent produos.
Run Date: May 01,2000 

Page:3 of 3

Argentina CAS Program Matrix (FY2001-FY2004)

The program has three pillars: (i) enhancing social development, including poverty alleviation and human resource development; (ii) improving the
performance and institutional capacity of government, particularly sub-national governments, to deliver key, social, infrastructure, and environmental
services; and (iii) consolidating structural reforrns, including public financc, labor markets and the financial sector to ensure successful implementation of
the assistance program and enhance governance thirough inistitution building.

Annex B9

1. 
SOCIAL DEVELOPMENT
Strengthen social policy coordination and the delivery of social assistance during the adjustment period. Support transition to more flexible labor markets to reduce poverty. Rebuild the institutional basis for
improvements in human resource development to improve social welfare and the productivity of the work force.
Strategy/Actions 
Country Performance 
Diagnosis 
Indicators

Self-Evaluation Indicators 

Instruments

World Bank Group 

Major Related Activities of
Other Donors

overty

Improve poverty analysis, monitoring 
and targeting of social assistance. 

Although the level of social 
spending is high relative to 
comparator countries, social 
indicators lag and economic 
Ensure adequate funding of safety net 
recessions have exposed weak 
programs and improve efficiency in 
social assistance delivery to address social spending. 
structural and transitional poverty. 
In particular, rural poverty has 
received little attention. 

Social assistance spending 
levels protected in cyclical 
downturns, and reoriented 
toward effective/targeted 
safety net programs. 

Target delivery of basic maternal and Matemal mortality rate 
child health scrvices to the poorest 
reduced to 12 per 1,000 
families. 
births nationally, with larger 
percentage decreases in poor 
provinces. Matemal and 
child care integrated into 
basic health service package 

ISLC Prograrn/SYNTyS 
Il/SIEMPRO have equipped 
Gov't for more effective 
poverty monitoring and 
targeting. 
National Unified Registry of 
beneficiaries adopted 
Coverage of identified 
vulnerable groups increased 

Focused maternal child 
programs operating in the 
poorest provinces 

AAA
Rural Poverty (97) 
Regional ISLC /Social 
Program IDF Grants (98) 
Gender Review (99/00)
Poverty Assessment (00)
Soc. Prot. Framework (00)
Social Capital (01)
Rural Prod Health (01)
Cooping with Crisis (01)
Eval. Food/Training Programs
(01)
Partnership Program for
Poverty Reduction (00+)
Small Grants Program for
Social Innovation (00+)
SMEs (01)
Update of Poverty Assessment

(03)

IDB engaged in sites and
services activities in poor
urban areas.

CD

0

(5

Diagnosis 

Strategy/Actions 

Counlry Performance 
Indicators

Self-Evaluation Indicators 

Instruments

World Bank Group 

Major Related Activities of
Other Donors

Annex B9

Ensure that the poorest households are National strategy for attaining Programs supporting
covered by the health insurance 
universal participation in 
developmcnt of Insurance Proiect Financilg
system and other parts of the social 
health insurance agreed. 
for the Uninsured in 25% of Series of Provncial Reform
security system. 
the provinces. 
Family Cap. Building Lola (01

Increase focus on rural poverty and 
indigenous groups. Increase focus on 
basic services for the poor, including 
actions to strengthen their social 
capital and access to basic services. 

Increased number of poor 
Community-based projects 
Integrated Ilealth (01 )
families in rural areas served operating in rural and poor 
Soc. Protection V/SyNTIS 11
by infrastructure and social 
urban areas. Rural poverty Rural Poverty (02)
services. 
strategy designed and 
uran Poverty (02)
implemented started in pilot Supervision
areas. 
S _erisoPrvisincilRfr
SeLes of Provincial Reform
Development mechanisms Loans
for more integrated social 
SSAL (98)
service delivery to the poor Small Farmer Devt. (98)

National housing strategy 
devised, with commensurate 
changes in FONAVI 

support for innovative social SRNeal Energy (99)
programs and partnerships Soc.eProtectinergy 
(98)
Soc. Protection IV (99)
Drug Prevention LIL (99)
Insurance for the Poor (00)
Indigenous Peoples LIL (00)

s

(D

up(D

to

a

2

Diagnosis 

Strategy/Actions 

Country Performance 
Indicators

Education

Self-Evaluation Indicators 

Instruments

World Bank Group 

Major Related Activities of
Other Donors

Annex B9

Education system has deteriorated, Assist the provinces to improve the 
threatening the future basis for 
leaming outcomes of secondary 
improved competitiveness and 
school students through enhanced 
income distribution. 
resource allocation, panlicularly for 
students from poor families. Redirect Decrease in repetition rates 
public spending in higher education to and desertion rates for poor 
reach the poor. Support private 
secondary students 
participation. 

Increase secondary 
graduation rate from 53% to 
70%. 

Compensatory education 
programs reaching more than 
25% of poor schools 

Education attainment 
increased proponionately 
more in poor provinces 

AAA
Successful implementation Prov. Social Services (97) 
of Bank program supporting Education Review (99) 
the Federal Education 
Poverty Assessment 
Reform and targeted efforts 
(Background Paper) (00)
to poor students in 
Capacity Assessment of Social
secondary schools. 
Institutions (01)
Non-Formal Education (01)
New approach to school 
Supervision
level budgeting piloted in at Secondary Ed. 1, 11, Ill
least one province 
Higher Education (96)
PRL2 (97)
School Autonomy piloted in SSAL (98)
at least one province 
Project Financing
Education (01)
BASAL(01)
Cordoba PRL(01)
Catamarca PRL(00)
Santa Fe PRL(01)
PRL 6 (02)
IFC support for private higher
education

Pilot program of full-day 
schooling in poor areas of 
Buenos Aires Province 
replicated in some other 
provinces. 

Continuing dialogue on 
higher education reform and
education altematives

IDB dealing with primary and
vocational education,
scholarships for poor families.

W

l
00

w

0

3 

Annex B9

Diagnosis 

Strategy/Actions 

Country Performance 
Indicators

Self-Evaluation Indicators 

Instruments

Hlealth Services

World Bank Group 

Major Related Activities of
Other Donors

IBD active at primary care
level.

Argentina spends at OECD levels 
but receives poor health services 
due to monopolies in health 
insurance financing. Too little 
spending for health promotion, 
particularly for diseases affecting 
the poor., responsible parenthood 
and traffic safety Public hospitals 
lack accountability, subsidize non- 
poor and are overburdened by 
clients seeking primary level 
attention. 

Increase competition in the health 
insurance market, and reform of obras 
provinciales and PAMI. Allocate 
greater spending for public health 
services and health promotion 
programs. 

Market fully opened to 
Provincial lIMOs reformed AAA 
include national and 
and increased spending for 
Provincial Social Services (97) 
provincial HMOs and private public health services in at 
Traffic Safety (00)
health insurance. PAMI with 
least 25% of the provinces. Health Strategy (informal) (00)
sustainable financing. 
Poverty Assessment
Increased spending in 
(Background paper) (00)
promotional programs. 
Capacity Assessment of Social
Institutions (01)
Project Financing
Improve efficiency and targeting of 
Decentralized public hospitals Programs effectively 
BASAL(01)
public hospital services in the 
linked to primary care 
supporting hospital 
Cordoba PRL(01)
provinces by decentralizing decision- networks 
decentralization in one-third Catamarca PRL(00)
making. 
of the provinces. 
Santa Fe PRL(01)
PRL 6 (02)
Integrated Health (02)
IFC financing of private health
services.
Supervsion
PRL2 (97)
SSAL (98)
Prov. Hlealth (95)
Health Insurance TA (96
AIDS Prevention (97)
Health Surveillance (00)
Health Insurance for Uninsured
LIL (00)

Dx

to

04

Annex B9

Water and Sanitation

Limited access to safe water (65% 
Increase investment to improve 
coverage compared to 87% in 
service and increase coverage of the 
comparator countries) and sewage poor through private sector 
services, particularly among the 
participation. 
poor, increases the incidence of 
water borne diseases. 

Increase access to safe water Support for concessioning in AAA 
IDB support for small
to at least 87%. 
the provinces that inclide 
Reforming Provincial Utilities municipal systems.
programs to facilitate access (96)
by the poor. 
New Regulatory Challenges
(97)
Water Resource Mgt (00)
Project Financing
Water Sector APL (00-02)
IFC support for private
concessions
Supervision
Water Supply 11(9 1)

Diagnosis 

Strategy/Actions 

Indicators 

2. PROVINCIAL REFORM AND DEVELOPMENT
Provinces, which are responsiblefor over 80% of spending in education and health haveyet to undergo requiredfiscal adjustments. Following process ofprivatization and decentralization, provincial
government increasingly responsiblefor providing infrastructure. Small and medium sizedfirms in the provinces needto take advantage ofopen economy.

Country Performance 

Self-Evaluation Indicators 

Instruments

l

World Bank Group 

Major Related Activities of
__ l 
Other Donors

(D

x

rD

on

0

-

5 

Fiscal Reform/Social Sector
Spending

Public expenditures in most 
provinces should be sufficient to 
provide for health and education, 
but spending is inefficient and 
service of poor quality. Pro- 
cyclical transfers and poor fiscal 
management foment financial 
crises and social and political 
turmoil. 

Infrastructure 

AAA 
Deepen first generation fiscal reforms Zero aggregate provincial 
Under PRL operations 
Provincial Fiscal Update (00- 
with focus on social spending. 
deficit by 2003. New co- 
improved tax collection and 04)
Increase local resource mobilization 
participation regime in place. structure of spending, with 
Fed. Provincial Taxes (00)
and improve incentives under revenue 
greater targeting of the poor. Municipal Finances and
sharing. 
Facilitate reform of revenue Services (01)
sharing and transition to 
Project Financing
new system. 
Catamarca PRL(00)
Provincial Development Til
(01)
BASAL (01)
Cordoba PRL(0lI)
Selected provincial network: Support to Gov't in 
Santa Fe PRL(0O)
rehabilitate 5,500 km; 
attracting private financing PRL 6(02)
upgrade and new construction for infrastructure, and 
IFC financing of private
of 3,200 km. Expand 
promote private sector 
infrastructure
electricity coverage to about 
participation in maintenance Supervision
30,000 new rural customers activities. 
PRL2 (97)
by 2002. 
SSAI. (98)
Provincial Development 11(95)
AAA
Transport Assessment (01)
Disaster Insurance (01)
Rural Infrastructure (02)

Argentina lags behind most high- 
Rebuild and upgrade infrastructure 
income developing counties in the 
base. Enhance local level public 
quantity and quality of 
infrastructure and promote private 
infrastructure services, particularly sector investment in power and 
in the provinces, increasing 
transport. 
business and logistic costs. 

Annex B9

IDB co-financing of Cordoba
PRL.

W

0

-

6 

Annex B9

Diagnosis 

Strategy/Actions 

Country Performance 
Indicators

Self-Evaluation Indicators 

Instruments

World Bank Group 

Major Related Activities of

28% of the poor live in flood-prone Create provincial capacity to deal with System to deal with recurrent Provide analytical support 
Project Financing 
areas and periodic flooding causes 
recurrent flooding, protect most 
floods in place for Parana 
for development of disaster Private Financing of 
major economic losses, 
important assets, and develop disaster Basin, major urban centers 
insurance. 
Infrastructure (01 ) 
insurance mechanism. 
protected, poor relocated and 
Urban Infrastructure (02) 
insurance system in place. 
Rural Infrastructure(02)
Suerisionl
Transfer lessons of housing Road Maintenance (93)
program under Flooding 
Municipal Dev. 11(95)
project to more general 
Provincial Roads (97)
housing policies 
Flood Protection (97)
BA Urban Transport (97)
National Highway Rehab (98)
El Nino Emergency (98)
SSAL (98)

Other Donors

IDB financing for urban dev. in
large cities; export corridors
and ports; and, provincial
regulatory reform.

aqt_4

00

7

3. StUST'AINABLE GROWTH
Economy remains vulnerable to external shocks. Retirn to a sustainable and strong pattern of growth requires continuity of reforms infactor markets andfiscalpruidence. Lags in effectively managing serious
pollution problems need to be addressed given civil society 's growing demandfor measures to promote environmentally sustainable environment andpotential losses in export competitiveness as global markets
increasingly require environmental performance benchmarks.
Diagnosis 
Strategy/Actions 
Country Performance 

Self-Evaluation Indicators 

Instruments

Indicators

Economic Policy/Governance

World Bank Group 

Major Related Activities of
Other Donors

AAA

Continuing fiscal deficits increase Reduce the structural deficit by reform Attain investment grade status Provide AAA support for 
Introducing Civic Education 
country risks and vulnerability of 
of the state at national and provincial 
for government paper. 
Fund program and possible 
into Schools IDF Grant (97) 
external shocks. Confidence also 
levels, increase formality and reduce 
Increase X/GDP. 
emergency financing. 
Financial Sector (98) 
weakened by poor public sector 
tax evasion. Continue with trade 
Operations to support state 
Fed. Financial Management 
efficiency and transparency and 
reforn effort 
modemization, public ethics Review (98)
weak judiciary. Need to resist 
and judiciary. 
Policy Options (00)
protectionist pressures 
Labor Market (00)
Anti-Corruption IDF (00)
Judicial Assessment (00)
Competitiveness (00)
Anti-Corruption Strategy (00)
Provide AAA for continuing Transport Assessment (01)
reforms, especially for 
Country Procurement
integration of informal 
Assessment (01)
sector into social security 
SMEs (01)
and health systems, and to 
Financial Sector update (02/03)
reduce evasion 
MERCOSUR/Trade (03)
Competitiveness (03)

Labor cost and market rigidity 
undermines productivity 
improvements and contributes to 
high unemployment. Significant 
parts of economy operate in black. 

Collective bargaining 
decentralized and severance 
program initiated. 
Unemployment in single 
digits 

Promote the liberalization of labor 
markets and reduce labor taxes. 

Labor Markets 

Policy Notes (04)

Annex B9

IMF monitoring, IDB lending
in support of public sector
modernization and personal
security issues.

(D

0o

8

Diagnosis 

Strategy/Actions 

Country Performance 
Indicators

Self-Evaluation Indicators 

Instruments

World Bank Group 

Niajor Related Activities of
Other Donors

Annex B9

Financial/Private Sector
Development

Financial system has reduced its 
vulnerability to extemal shocks but 
intermediation is weak, with 
domestic credit at only 25% of 
GDP. 

Reduce crowding out by improving 
fiscal performance, increase 
competition by reducing the role of 
public banks and broaden and deepen 
capital markets. 

Small and medium sized firmn in the Support development of instruments 
provinces (SMEs) lack access to 
to accelerate credit access, improve 
intemational capital, technology 
project formulation and export 
and markets lag behind larger firms strategies by SMEs. 
in taking advantage of trade and 
economic liberalization. 

Increase level of credit to 
Support ongoing 
private sector relative to GDP privatization of provincial 
and depth of capital market in banks through PRLs. 
line with other upper-middle Continue BanktlFC AAA 
income economies. 
support for broaden capital 
markets. 

Increased SME exports and 
access of SMEs to banking/ 
credit system 

Expanded IFC focus on 
SME financing in the 
provinces 

Project Financing 
IDB support for restructuring
Public Sector Management and of SMEs.
Performance (ex-Y2K) (00)
Judicial Reform (03)
IFC operations in domestic
financial markets (incl. Support
for SMEs).
IFC financing of middle-
market firms.
IFC support for credit
enhancement structured
finance, and information
technology.
Supervision
Public Sector Investment
Strengthening (96)
Pension TA (97)
SyNTIS (99)
SSAL/REPO (99)
Model Court Pilot (99)
IFC operations in capital

markets and credit. Lines for
SMEs.

(D

o

9 

Annex B9

Diagnosis 

Strategy/Actions 

Country Performance 
Indicators

Self-Evaluation Indicators 

Instruments

Reduce Pollution

World Bank Group 
World Bank 
GroupOther 

Niajor Related Activities of
Donors

AAA
Increased growth and urbanization Coordinate management at national 
Pollution abatement targets 
Pilot integrated pollution 
Pollution Study (96) 
have not been matched by 
and subnational levels, and strengthen and compliance schedule 
management approach 
Ntunicipal Environmental Mgt. 
establishment of an environmental 
regulatory analysis and participatory 
agreed between polluters and 
introduced at municipal 
IDF Grant 
framework with clearjurisdictions processes. 
govemment in two or three 
level. Increased use of 
Water Resources Mgt (00) 
and enforcement, nor effective 
polluted areas; incorporation public hearings under Bank Hazard Waste Mgt (00) 
tools to promote responsible 
of cost-effectiveness analysis operations. 
BA City Flooding (00) 
environmental behavior, 
and monitoring framework. 
BA Air Quality (00) 
particularly in industry. 
Municipal Finances and 
Services (01) 
Project Financing 
GEF-Coastal Contamination
(01)
Continued building of GEF Municipal Reform (02)
pipeline, including 
Uranium Decontam. (04)
preparation of GEF-for 
Supervision
biodiversity conservation, Municipal Development 11(95)
global warming and 
Mining TA 1(95) and 11(98)
intemational waters 
MP-Reduction of Ozone-
objectives. 
Depleting Substances (96)
BA Urban Transport (97)
Pollution Mgt.(98)
GEF-Climate Change
Mitigation /Overlay(99)

Meeting commitments under Completion of Montreal 
global environmental 
Protocol with adoption of 
agreements. 
local regulations. 

IDB supporting specific site
clean-ups, petroleum
environmental mitigation, and
institutional development of
the Federal Environment
Secretariat. UNDP-Phase 11 of
the GEF Project on Patagonia
Coastal Zone Management
Plan. OAS initiative for
Guarani Aquifer.

10

00

1 0

Annex B9

Diagnosis 

Strategy/Actions 

Country Performance 
Indicators

Self-Evaluation Indicators 

Instruments

Conserve Natural Resources

World Bank Group 

Najor Related Activities of
Other Donors

IDB active in rehabilitation of
irrigation system.

Increased private investment in 
Promote sustainable management of 
Comprehensive approach to 
Provide examples of how to AAA 
natural resource development 
natural resources and protection of 
natural resource management address critical natural 
Forest Sector Review (94) 
requires clear regulatory 
biodiversity by redefining and 
developed at national level, 
resource management in a 
Rural Poverty (98)
framework and strengthened public modemizing role of the public sector. with effective management 
variety of sectors, keeping 
Environ. Impact (98)
sector oversight capabilities 
programs in forestry, mining, abreast of the country's 
Fisheries (98)
water, and fisheries 
emerging natural resource Water Resources Note (99)
issues, most notably, 
Water Sector Mgt (00)
fisheries, protection of 
Project Financing
sensitive areas in Patagonia, Fisheries GEF (01)
etc. Adding the poorer 
Indigenous Bio-diversity GEF
Andean to the areas in 
(01)
which we are active on 
Deserfication GEF (02)
promoting conservation. 
Small Farmers GEF (02)
Fisheries Mgt 11(03)
Agreement on a long-term Watershed Pilot (03)
agenda for watershed 
Supervision
management and at last one Yacyreta/SEBGA (93)
pilot 
Forestry Development (96)
Mining TA 1(95) and 11(99)
Increased confidence in the Native Forests (97)
Bank's supervision of the 
Provincial Agriculture (97)
Yacyreta project. 
Small Farmers (97)
Bio-diversity GEF (98)
Indigenous Peoples (00)
Fisheries Mgt LIL (00)

tDx

00

1W

0

CAS Annex BIO - Argentina
CAS Summary of Development Priorities

Annex BIO
Page 1 of 1

Country 

Major issueb 

Country 

Bank Reconciliation

Network area 

performance' 

pnontyc pnontyc of country and

Bank

pnontiesd

Poverty Reduction & Economic

Management

Poverty reduction 
Economic policy 
Public sector 
Gender 

Human Development Department
Education 
Health, nutrition & population 
Social protection 

Environmentally & Socially

Sustainable Development

Rural development 
Environment 
Social development 

Poor 
Good 
Fair 
Good 

Poor 
Fair 
Fair 

Fair 
Fair 
Fair 

Unemployment, safety net 
High 
Vulnerability to shocks 
High 
Govemance, sub-national reforms High 
Health/Poverty 
Low 

High
High
High
Moderate Ongoing dialogue

Efficiency/quality 
Coverage/effectiveness 
Coverage/effectiveness 

High 
High 
High 

High
High
High

Rural poverty 
Jurisdictional/institutional 
Civil Society 

Low 
High 
Moderate Moderate
Moderate Moderate IDB

Ongoing dialogue

Finance, Private Sector & Infrastructure
Financial sector 
Good 
Private sector 
Good 
Energy & mining 
Excellent 
Infrastructure 
Fair 

Capital markets 
High 
High
SMEs/Corporate govemance High 
High
Distribution/environment 
Moderate Moderate
Financing/regulation 
High 
High

a. Use 'excellent,' 'good.' 'fair,' or 'poor.'

c. To indicate priority, use 'low,' moderate," or 'high.'

b. Indicate principal country-specific problems (e.g., for poverty reduction, 'rural poverty;' for education, "feniale secondary completion;- br environment, 
'urban air pollution").

d. Give explanation, 
If priorities do not agree; for example, another MDB may have the lead on the issue, or there may be ongoing dialogue.

Template created on 51/100

MAP SECTION

IBRD 29348

J20 

70' 

0° 

206-
2

40 2 

BOLIVIA 

j 

I F~-~"PARAGUAY 
\ 'u0Son~Ivjodor 
°*o< 

/

X 

B R A Z I L

SALTA 

, 

_,Frm 

o

*tANLjmdn 
CH 
-9 ZT \, 4 @SoSntio del 'Im.. _ 
. SANTIAGO- 

PosodACC)

Li -. 

rie 

es 

r

orrientes

Uj 

0 C~iorco 
m~.

DE 

~ 

-

, 
,,t, 
-f 
.<13C°, mrESTERO 
~~iJ >, Lo Ri'0 
_
_ 
_C'
- , 
I O J A\' 

-'. 

0(cid:143)

/ 

0

~ 

SAN, 

3A

S AN \, 

/A--

u r JUAN 

C6rda 
O RDOBAI 

F3onto 

'

( 0 SonJAs, 

I 

oC 0 

Sno--

-
mendozo Sn / 

Fe ®Fron6 

? 

R 

/

URUGUAY

1 

\ SAN/-

LUIS 

r 

Buenos Aires

fMENDOZA: 

r 

BUENCOS

Santa Rosa0

LA 

AIRES

NE -1. 

PAM PA

NEUOUEN 1 ,.
N Neuqu6n,-.

2 RIO

-AO' 

N E G R O 

Viemo 0

40_ 

NEGRO 

ARGENTINA

,0Rowson

' C H UB UTr
C 
U 

0 

PROVINCE CAPITALS

.> 

i3 NATIONAL CAPITAL

t 

- PROVINCE BOUNDARIES

j -*- 

INTERNATIONAL BOUNDARIES

' 

SANTA

f 

CRUZ 

-

ND 

ND-

-Rio Golle8os s 

0 100 200 300 400 500 600 KILOMETERS

|I 

-

0 

100 

200 

300 

400 Mile

This mop was produced by the Map Design Unit of The World Bank.
The boundaries, colors, denominations and anyother informotion shown
on this mop do not imply, on the port of The World Bank Group, any
judgment on ilse geglstotus of any territory,or any nmdorsemenl or
oaceptnce of such boundaries.

-80-huai 

R 

- -

~ TIERRA 

DEL FUEGO 

70' 
_ I 

6 

50'

I' 

1A 

IL

APRIL 1998

